Authors
Lars Lindahl
Number of Reviews
71

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Directed by Anthony Minghella
Written by Anthony Minghella
Starring Matt Damon, Jude Law, Gwyneth Paltrow, Cate Blanchett, Jack Davenport,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Philip Baker Hall, and James Renhorn.
The last movie I reviewed was Milos Forman's "Man on the Moon." Jim Carrey
fabulously portrayed the mysterious comedian Andy Kaufman as a character who
was a master at becoming anything but himself. Due to the ambuguity of
Kaufman's persona, people were forced to make up for themselves who he actually
was. "The Talented Mr. Ripley's" Tom Ripley is a character with the same
chameleon-like ability of transforming himself into whatever he pleases.
However, he does not let those he encounters decide who he is, instead he
judges for himself what people should believe and know. Although Kaufman and
Ripley are quite similar, the movies they star in are far from that. While "Man
on the Moon" relies on the comedic talents of Carrey to entertain the audience,
"The Talented Mr. Ripley" is a grim analysis of civilization in the 1950's
which contains elements of trust and deception. When these two adjectives go
together in the description of a film, it is expected that tragic chaos will
erupt from the combination and strong feelings will develop for the victims and
doers. The result of Anthony Minghella's masterpiece is certainly that as
eruptions frequently occur during the fabulously suspenseful plot. The film
throws its audience around with unique plot twists during every scene creating
a thrilling unpredictable atmosphere. 
The story  follows the adventures of Tom Ripley (played chillingly well by Matt
Damon) who finds himself on a journey to Italy where he is being paid to try to
convince a young man, Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law in a breakthrough performance)
to return to America. Once he arrives, Ripley finds he is greatly attracted to
Greenleaf's style of life. He becomes so obsessed with Greenleaf that
eventually his desires take over his morality. "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is a
presentation of several classes from the snobby, selfish rich American to lower
class Italians. Its wide range of analysis rather than just on Ripley makes it
more interesting and disturbing in how social structure creates people.
However, Ripley's obsession is the central point and for good reason. This
villain is very unique because the majority of the public watching the movie
can relate to him more than any other character. We all know that what he is
doing is sick and wrong but for some reason we understand why he is doing it.
Bonding with Ripley is what makes the film so frightening. 
Both the script and the directing are responsible for non stop tension. The
dialogue written by Minghella is so fresh and engaging that the film's 160
minute running time seems to fly right by. When one segment of the film begins
to drag on too long, the film quickly shifts to a newer, fresher scene. Some
very memorable lines and some clever sexual references make this one of the
best scripts written this year, if not this decade. The directing also is
flawless. Minghella was most likely influenced by Alfred Hitchcock, from his
"Psycho"-like format for the opening credits to his very effective ability of
spinning the camera to a point of near dizziness like that of "Vertigo."
Minghella shows that without special effects a film can still be frightening. 
Anthony Minghella utilizes the skills of each actor (most of them Academy Award
winners) perfectly. Damon is superb as Ripley. Hidden behind some thick
glasses, he looks harmless but once he is overtaken by desire his face
completely transforms to a harsh coldness. Jude Law, who has given some decent
supporting performances in films such as "eXitenZ" and "Gattaca", takes a
surprisingly perfect turn as Dickie Greenleaf. As a snobby, rich kid who hates
America, its hard to like him but it's even harder to hate him and to see him
suffer from Ripley's wrath. His performance was accurate in creating mixed
emotions for his character. Gwyneth Paltrow was also great as Greenleaf's
suspicious girlfriend, Marge. Marge starts off a bit slow and underdeveloped
but as the film continues Paltrow is given the chance to bloom and she does.
Other supporting actors also contribute their talents such as Philip Seymour
Hoffman as one of Greenleaf's friends. Hoffman is beginning to dominate
Hollywood as he appears in three movies currently out in theaters and thanks to
his talents gives three great performances. 
The script, the direction, the acting; all are top notch in this thriller that
plays with your mind by playing with the characters' minds. From the very first
scene to the very last, "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is perfection.

Title
Review for Screwed (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Norm MacDonald, Dave Chapelle, Elaine
Stritch, Sherman Hemsley, Daniel Benzali, and Danny
Devito
The most popular trend of the last couple of years has
been the twist ending. Watching one of these movies,
everything seems to make sense until suddenly you are
blown away by an unexpected surprise. When the film
ends, there is a moment of confusion, then
recollection, then some more confusion, then possibly
a second viewing for clarification. This is a
description of an ideal twist that perfects everything
it sets out to do and more. Good surprises make movies
fun to watch. Then there are the bad twists. You
either know what is going to happen ten minutes into
the movie (I'm talking about you Reindeer Games) or
you did not guess the ending because it is so
outrageously stupid. Screwed perfectly suits the
latter description. What starts out as a dumb guilty
pleasure which should be fun to mock with a group of
friends ends with a complex finale with way too much
going on. 
By the writers of Man on the Moon and The People Vs.
Larry Flynt, Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
leave Milos Forman behind and take a stab at film
directing. Whoops. Screwed is an inane Christmas Carol
gone berserk with few genuine laughs and many acting
embarrassments. Norm MacDonald stars as Willard
Filmore, a hard working chauffeur who just wants a
little respect from his rich, old, insidious boss,
Miss Crock (Elaine Stritch). When he overhears her
plans to fire him on Christmas day, Willard is
convinced by his best friend Rusty (Dave Chapelle) to
kidnap Crock's beloved dog and hold it for a ransom of
one million dollars. Too excited to pay any attention,
the hapless losers' plan goes awry when the dog
escapes and returns home. Now Crock thinks Willard has
been kidnapped and the two friends, realizing they can
make even more money, decide to stage the fake
kidnapping. Of course, everything that could go wrong
does. 
The first forty-five minutes of Screwed is harmless
entertainment - a guilty pleasure that should be
enjoyably bad. But the convoluted script eventually
builds into a disaster that is impossible to bear. The
more idiotic these characters get, the more reckless
the script becomes. At one point, I wanted to get out
of my seat and yell at these characters: "No, you
idiot!" I'm not just talking about Willard and Rusty,
who were extremely annoying, I'm also talking about
the cops in this film. A monkey could have solved this
case within an hour but these guys (headed by Murder
One's Daniel Benzali) were just too clueless to
forgive. They give real cops bad names. 
Also poor Danny Devito apparently does not know how to
turn down a role these days. Looking almost identical
to his Penguin in Batman: Returns, every time he
appeared on the screen I had to shake my head in
disbelief. He just didn't belong in this movie.
MacDonald and Chapelle are veterans at these kinds of
movies but Devito made the film much worse than it
already was, gross out humor is certainly not his
forte. 
If you're a fan of Norm MacDonald's other chaotic
comedy, Dirty Work, you might actually love this
near-sequel. Otherwise, don't get screwed out of your
hard-earned money. 

Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
by Lars Lindahl, high school student
Directed and written by Barry Levinson
Starring Joe Mantegna, Adrien Brody, Ben Foster, Bebe Neuwirth
Barry Levinson can safely be called "the master of Baltimore cinema". He has
done exceptional work in the past focusing on this city, from "Tin Men" to
"Avalon" to "Diner". And he has also been able to bring this sixth sense to the
small screen with the mesmerizing "Homicide: Life on the Streets". It's no
wonder Levinson has written and directed yet another film to his recognized
collection. 
"Liberty Heights" follows two generations of an average Jewish family living in
Liberty Heights, Baltimore in the 1950's. The family faces racism and rejection
at the local swimming pool, in the court house, and by the police. The
nostalgia presented is a terrifying look at how are society was function less
than half a century ago. The film contains some hilarious and some heart
wrenching scenes but over length seriously hurts the mood and nothing big
happens to keep the audience truly entertained and attentive. It plays like an
episode of a dramedy television show-however it is like the episode before the
finale, where everything is built up very specifically but nothing huge comes
out of it because it will be shown in the finale next week. However, this is a
movie. There are no episodes and therefore the plot must not only be developed
but something must come out of this development. In "Liberty Heights" there is
no distinct climax.  
The film is broken up into three sections, following three members of the
family. The father, Nate, (Joe Mantegna) runs a strip joint which is not
drawing profits from its desired range of customers. In order to change the
gloomy future of his failing business, Nate decides to add gambling for his
customers to enjoy. This plan, however, backfires when an unemployed man wins
five hundred thousand dollars and Nate is unable to pay. This section of the
movie was the least developed and seemed out of place from the other teen
romance subplots. If Levinson was trying to make the film about the Jewish
family as a whole, then why did he leave out a section focusing on the mother
(Bebe Neuwirth) and her interaction with society? Instead Neuwirth is an
automaton who's only purpose in the film is to comfort or scold the male family
members when they are misbehaving or troubled. 
The oldest son, played by Adrien Brody, is seriously in love with a girl he is
not supposed to go near. After he and his friends sneak into a non-Jewish
party, Brody is swept away by a mysterious girl who he soon after cannot stop
thinking of. This story, at first starts out very vibrant and vivacious, but as
it drags on there are no surprises to maintain interest. Brody is excellent in
another wonderful performance, but the supporting cast is very cliched and
dull. 
Ben Foster plays the youngest son fittingly named Ben. This is the most
interesting of the three stories because it is funny, tragic, and romantic
without one of these elements dominating the others. Ben is a curious boy who
wonders what the world is like outside of the Jewish community. This curiosity
leads to a forbidden friendship with an African American girl played superbly
by Rebekah Johnson. Together they learn more about each other and about
themselves. Racism plays an important role in this subplot as the characters
must fight against it in order to remain bonded. A powerful message is given by
Levinson stating that the youngest generation is the most open- minded and the
most mature. One obvious problem is that Levinson, out of nowhere, adds a
completely unnecessary scene containing, you guessed it, bodily fluids. Is this
a requirement now for films in the 90's? You know there is a serious problem
when a film trying to explain the seriousness of discrimination adds a scene
which can be directly compared to a scene in "There's Something About Mary."
Levinson's most recent film contains many superb performances and an important
story line which educates the audience. There were just too many scenes with no
importance and too many characters with no importance. If Levinson had cut some
of these scenes and characters out and had focused more on creating a better
ending, then "Liberty Heights" would have been an interesting, entertaining,
educating movie.

Title
Review for Steel Helmet, The (1951)
Starring Gene Evans, Robert Hutton, Steve Brodie, James Edwards, Richard Loo,
Sid Melton, and William Chun.
Sam Fuller's rarely seen masterpiece, The Steel Helmet, is a film that should
be included with Platoon and Saving Private Ryan, among others, as one of the
great war films of the twentieth century. Although it is not as violently
graphic as others, its anti-war message is just as powerful. With an extremely
brief eighty-four minute running time, Fuller proves his point without any
unnecessary characters or subplots and manages to avoid any major cliches that
plague most war films. 
The Steel Helmet is a frighteningly hypnotic tale, set during the Korean War,
following a group of American soldiers, separated from their unit, who hide out
in a Buddhist temple. In this temple we meet the diverse characters who find
they have very little in common with everyone else: an African American medic
who realizes that back home his family and friends are treated disrespectfully,
a Japanese American soldier who notices the same discrimination, a young naďve
North Korean boy who ecstatically joins the group on their quest for safety,
and a veteran Sergeant who luckily survived a bullet to his head thanks to his
steel helmet. Fuller's use of different races and ages truly show the war's
wide ranging effects on society. From this ambiguous group, there is hatred,
friendship, innocence, and criminality. Fuller later introduces a South Korean
character and he shows that the same traits apply for the opposite side. By
doing this, Fuller leaves a powerful message that the war is completely
meaningless and detrimental because it is either fought by soldiers with
complete unjustified prejudice towards another race or by soldiers who don't
know exactly why they are fighting. Since the film was made in 1951, Fuller
boldly delivered his message to Americans who fought or cheered on the war.
It's almost like releasing Saving Private Ryan the day after D-day; he was
showing people what horrible things were happening at the exact time that they
were happening. It comes as no surprise to hear that Fuller was at the time
harshly accused of being a Communist. 
Sam Fuller's incredible utilization of black and white was so impressive that
it was even emulated by Martin Scorcese in his beautifully shot black and white
Raging Bull. His use of external factors, such as smoke or sound effects, is as
convincingly realistic as his perfect use of the musical score. The film also
has some fantastic acting to fill all of the characters' roles, from Gene Evans
as the Sergeant who reacts like any human being would, whether right or wrong
to William Chun as an ingenuous young boy who does not notice the seriousness
of the war he is in the middle of. This short film has a lasting impact on the
horrors of twentieth century wars.

Title
Review for Untouchables, The (1987)
Starring  Kevin Costner, Sean Connery, Robert Deniro, Andy Garcia, Charles
Martin Smith, Billy Drago, and Patricia Clarkson.
    The ultimate match up between good and evil, "The Untouchables" is an
excellent movie because it looks deeper into an already examined rivalry. Based
on the 1959 television show of the same title, "The Untouchables" may be an
exaggeration of the real life events that took place, but it fits together
perfectly with some beautifully filmed action sequences, some excellent acting,
a memorable score, and a clever script. The film takes place in Chicago during
the prohibition era where mobsters led by the ruthless Al Capone run an
underground market of liquor to the demanding public. Elliot Ness and a small
force of men known as the untouchables attempt the impossible by trying to stop
Capone and trying to maintain peace and order. However, as Ness soon learns, in
order to stabilize peace, you have to bend a few laws. 
The fact that Capone is evil is very apparent from the first few scenes. The
film begins with Capone, played perfectly by Deniro, declaring that he is not a
violent man and he is a firm believer in following all laws. The film then
quickly transfers to the next scene in which one of Capone's men bombs a
restaurant that contains many innocent people including a little girl. From
this point we know Capone is evil, not only because he kills without
hesitation, but also because he is a lying bastard. Right from the first five
minutes of the film, De Palma has created a hatred towards Capone and he shows
that this man must be brought down at all costs. This developed hatred is
before the film's hero, Ness, is even introduced. I found this approach to be
very clever because in a small duration of time there is a great amount of
admiration for Ness and an equal amount of hatred for Capone. The film only
gets better from this point. 
With the formation of the untouchables, there is a group of men wearing long,
dark overcoats and hats. They walk in unison and they only look forward. As
they walk down the streets they are observed and feared by citizens. Holding
shot guns and pistols in their hands to stop criminals, this image of
vigilantes must have influenced future films. One that comes to mind is "The
Matrix" when Neo, Morpheus, Trinity, and the rest of the gang first come into
the virtual world. Wearing more futuristic outfits of the same 1930's style,
the similarities between these two are countless. "The Untouchables" has some
of the hippest, bravest heroes in any action film. The four members were the
only ones willing to go against Capone's army. 
Each member of this special group also had their own characteristics that
separated them from others. Elliot Ness, played with perfect ingenuity by Kevin
Costner, is a character that surely grows during the course of the film. He
begins as a man who is determined to follow all laws no matter how unfair they
may be. However, as the film develops so does Ness. His beliefs involving the
law are shattered when he realizes that those he trusted are actually members
of the other side. He also begins to lose his stability when his adversaries
begin to murder his friends. His anger becomes so thunderous that he can no
longer hold it in. Sean Connery, who won an Academy Award for best supporting
actor in his role, plays Malone, an aging cop who decides to make one final run
as a member of the untouchables. Malone acts as a mentor to Ness. He teaches
him "the Chicago way" to do things; when they attack with a knife, you attack
with a gun. Connery plays his character with the exact amount of wit and
experience needed. Andy Garcia does a wonderful job as George Stone, a young
man who is just becoming a police officer. As Ness grows, he begins to teach
Stone some valuable lessons that Malone once taught him. Charles Martin Smith
is also fantastic as the final member who attempts to use an income tax offense
against Capone. Smith is perfect for his role as he adds some valuable comic
relief to the film.
The action scenes are also some of the most beautifully choreographed I have
ever seen. Also very similar to "The Matrix," they are exciting and intense.
>From a Western-like battle to the famous confrontation at the train station
steps, the scenes are well thought out and well executed. The score during
these scenes ingeniously adds to the excitement. Its pounding drum beats act as
a rhythm for the actors. The combination of image and music is very impressive
and also very effective. 
Although the real life untouchables may have been excessively glorified, this
film is pure entertainment and contains a unique blend of great acting, great
directing, and great action. Some scenes (Capone and the baseball bat, the
train station) have stuck in my mind for years and seeing them again will only
make them more vivid.
http://www.angelfire.com/ny3/larsattacks

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Starring Tom Hanks, David Morse, Michael Duncan, Doug Hutchinson, James
Cromwell, Bonnie Hunt, Patricia Clarkson, Barry Pepper, Michael Jeter, Sam
Rockwell, Graham Greene, Jeffrey DeMunn, Dabbs Greer, Eve Brent, Harry Dean
Stanton and Gary Sinise.
It is simply amazing how "The Green Mile" developed in its three hour running
time. Based on the Stephen King series of the same title, the film starts out
painfully slow, with underdeveloped characters and idiotic dialogue. However,
as the plot begins to progress, the film turns into pure perfection with
outstanding performances and wonderful direction. Frank Darabont, who
masterfully followed a prisoner's story in "The Shawshank Redemption", this
time follows the perspective of a prison guard, Paul Edgecomb (Tom Hanks).
Through Edgecomb's experiences on a cell block known as the green mile where
death row prisoners wait and repent, the audience sees good and evil on both
sides of the law. From an evil prison guard to an evil prisoner, "The Green
Mile" is successful in creating sympathy for kind-hearted hard working guards
and hard thinking prisoners. The plot follows Edgecomb and four other guards as
they meet a variety of prisoners  and after having strong relationships with
each eventually are forced to execute them.  
The performances by veterans and new comers to back up these original
characters are superb. The ensemble acting in the film is perfect. Hanks, David
Morse and Barry Pepper as guards are wonderful and are fitting for their roles.
They are the characters we most relate to because of their calm less extreme
roles. They are given the positions to make rational decisions at difficult
times and they are the ones who fulfill the demands of the audience.  The more
unique characters perfectly create friction on the green mile and make the
story interesting and exciting. Some particularly note worthy roles of the
unique characters include Doug Hutchinson, Sam Rockwell, and Michael Duncan.
Hutchinson, playing Percy Wetmore, a cowardly guard who hides his true feelings
by tormenting others gives the greatest performance of the movie. Every time he
appears on the screen, the attitude of others is very uncomfortable and the
creepy expressions he is able to create are effectively terrifying. It would
come as no surprise if Hutchinson was nominated for an Academy Award as best
supporting actor, not only because he did a wonderful job as Wetmore, but also
because he stole every scene he was in away from veteran Oscar winner Tom
Hanks. Rockwell, an independent film veteran, plays his role as Wild Bill
Wharton to perfection. As a prisoner who taunts and harasses the guards at all
hours, he really gets under your skin and irritates you for having to watch him
torture others. This irritation he creates makes his performance so believable.
The last noteworthy performance belongs to Duncan, as the enormous convicted
killer John Coffey who happens to hold the power of curing the ill. Duncan does
a wonderful job playing a frightened child-like behemoth, very similar to
Lennie Small in Of Mice and Men. His desire for love and the extinction of hate
evokes the most compassion because it is very obvious that he is suffering for
no just cause. His pain creates pain for the viewer. 
However, it takes over an hour for Duncan to be introduced completely in the
film. The film opens with a ridiculous present day setting which contains a
scene that jabs at "The Jerry Springer Show." The scene, containing one old man
complaining about how all guests on the show are inbred and rednecks. Not only
is this observation entirely pointless and out of place, but it is also
hackneyed beyond all belief. As the film flashes back to 1935, Graham Greene is
quickly executed without any introduction. His death seems very rushed and
without any knowledge of who he is, the scene is neither sad nor convincing.
Greene is not even given a final word, like some of the other characters, and
we don't even see him walk the infamous green mile. However, as the film begins
to specifically introduce more characters, such as Coffey and Eduard Delacroix
(Michael Jeter) as well as the five prison guards, the film becomes more
interesting. The speed in "The Green Mile" is perfect. If time was a matter of
concern and the film was edited to the two hour mark, it would have been
unsatisfactory because we would not be able to know the characters as they are
or as they treat others. The three hour running is perfect for plot development
and by the end of the film, a great amount of love or hate is attached to each
character. "The Green Mile" is so good following the rough beginning, that when
the pivotal moment at the very end finally comes, it is almost impossible not
to feel some sort of sadness for every person in this scene. Fighting back
tears was a difficult task that I barely succeeded in doing. If you survive the
first third of "The Green Mile" sit back and enjoy the remainder for some
priceless entertainment.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"High Fidelity" (2000) *** (out of four)
Directed by Stephen Frears
Written by D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, John Cusack,
and Scott Michael Rosenberg
Starring John Cusack, Iben Hjejle, Jack Black, Todd
Louiso, Lisa Bonet, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor,
Joan Cusack, Natasha Gregson Wagner, and Tim Robbins
Just look back two years ago at the Coen Brothers'
comedic gem The Big Lebowski, change the actors, take
away the bowling alley, add a record store, and you've
got High Fidelity (or maybe the other way around since
Nick Hornby's novel High Fidelity came first). Either
way, it's been done before, a trio of losers cracking
jokes and complaining about their failed romances, yet
it remains consistently funny. Why is this? Maybe
because you know your life is much better than this,
you know these guys are more pathetic than you are,
and you know its ok to laugh at them because they're
fictional. Director Stephen Frears, possibly not
intentionally, has created a movie that makes you feel
good about yourself and even that ostensibly no good
uncle who watches television twenty four hours a day.
When watching High Fidelity, expect to laugh at
someone else's pain, realize what you are laughing at,
and then laugh again. 
I laughed at Dick (Todd Louiso), the shy, timorous,
Steve Buscemi character of Lebowski, who seems to know
what he is talking about but either can't put it into
words or is harshly rejected by his friends. I laughed
at the John Goodman character Barry (Jack Black), an
exact replica of the comic bookstore owner on The
Simpsons, pudgy, egotistic, and obnoxious at the same
time. And I laughed at Rob (John Cusack), the Jeff
Bridges type, whom the story revolves around. Rob is
the character easiest to relate to, but he is nothing
like you at all. He uncontrollably cheats and lies,
then is unable to realize why he can not hold onto a
woman. And like his other miserable friends, pop music
is where he inevitably goes for comfort. 
He spends the afternoons at his job quizzing his
coworkers with obscure trivia or listening to new
music and either deriding it or praising it. Whatever
human emotions The Clash, Aretha Franklin, and Bruce
Springsteen records hold, Rob and co. grasp them and
help fill voids in their social lives. Rob has built
an extensive collection in his record store as well as
his home and he organizes them depending on what mood
he is in. During this confused stage of his life in
which the movie focuses on, Rob is trying to cope with
numerous rejections over the years by visiting past
girlfriends and eventually asking why they dumped him.
But these aren't any girlfriendsthese girls made the
all time top five break ups in the history of Rob
(Rob's incessant use of lists show how pop music has
played a major role in his life). The plot in three
words is: women and music.
The approach director Stephen Frears takes by having
the charismatic Rob speak directly to the camera is
very effective. It gives High Fidelity a quickly
paced, informal structure, adjectives which perfectly
parallel Rob's own lifestyle. It also helps open the
viewer's eyes as to how annoying Barry is. Jack Black
steals the show with a hilariously realistic
performance as a total sleaze ball. Just listening to
him speak for five minutes makes the audience
immediately sympathetic for Rob, who must work with
him every day of the week. What Frears does so well is
that he makes us feel sorry for Rob while laughing at
his misfortunes. John Cusack plays his character
convincingly but it is the strong supporting cast,
consisting of big stars and character actors, that
really defines Rob. Now instead of Rob just talking to
the camera, after he explains something, the remaining
cast members physically and humorously create what he
is trying to say. 
The only problem with High Fidelity is that it doesn't
end when it should have ended. Instead the movie goes
on for a torturous twenty minutes that seem a lot
longer than that. Also Bruce Springsteen is completely
wasted in a brief cameo halfway through the movie. 
High Fidelity is a cheerful, old fashioned comedy with
a voluminous soundtrack and as many laughs. I just
hope Hollywood keeps creating losers on the big
screen, they make everyone look and feel great. 

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Samuel L. Jackson,Tommy Lee Jones, Bruce
Greenwood, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne Archer,
Blair Underwood, and Philip Baker Hall. 
The military courtroom drama called Rules of
Engagement is missing something crucial from its
story: an ending. The film just stops out of nowhere,
crushing the little excitement it had built up in its
previous hour and a half. It felt like the filmmakers
ran out of film and were forced to release whatever
they had taped. The script just contained an
expedient, lazy finish. The poor ending was upsetting
because I sat through the monotonous first three
quarters of the movie hoping for a thrilling,
unpredictable conclusion. All that was given were some
words on the screen explaining what eventually
happened to each of the main characters' lives.
Warning: don't expect a grand finale. 
Featuring an all star cast, the movie has an
interesting premise. When anarchy erupts in the Middle
Eastern country of Yemen, a group of marines led by
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) rush to the
scene in order to evacuate the embassy containing the
ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family. At the heat
of the moment, things get out of hand when three
marines are shot down. The question is who shot them?
Childers thinking it was citizens with guns protesting
below, orders his men to fire at the civilians. The
marines kill eighty three civilians and when no guns
are found on the civilians, America is forced to
explain what happened. In order to make it seem like
America was not to blame, top officials (including
Bruce Greenwood, doing his usual role) frame and
prosecute Childers saying he made an incorrect order.
When evidence is destroyed and witnesses hushed, it is
an innocent Childers against the government. Only
Colonel Hays Hodges (well acted by Tommy Lee Jones), a
Vietnam pal of Childers and retired lawyer doing one
more case, can defend Childers and prove to the jury
that he is innocent.
Rules of Engagement is an ok movie. I didn't feel sick
once it was over but I didn't feel like celebrating
either. For a film that brags about its intensity,
there was not much present besides the chaotic, loud,
and ultimately exciting scene which the trial revolves
around. The courtroom scenes in which the characters
cursed and screamed at each other were nothing new or
edge-of-your-seat.  Every member of the cast had done
something like this before; Samuel L. Jackson does
this type of movie every year (think A Time to Kill
meets The Negotiator), and Tommy Lee Jones and Bruce
Greenwood played rivals in Double Jeopardy just last
year. The organization of the film may have hurt the
excitement level expected from moviegoers. With the
incident in Yemen occurring during the first half hour
of the film, the rest of the movie seemed very dull
and bland in comparison. 
The little things in Rules of Engagement distracted me
more than the plot holes and boring speeches. Guy
Pearce's ridiculous overacting as the prosecuting
lawyer is a prime example of the little things hurting
the overall picture. Another distraction is a
pointless scene in which Childers and Hodges bond
together by beating each other up until blood shows,
Fight Club style. Worse than that, Childers now has an
annoying black eye for the rest of the movie which
caught my attention more than his speeches declaring
innocence. Another mistake is the disappearance of
some of the actors halfway through the movie. The
ambassador and his wife (Anne Archer) as well as a
marine who was skeptical of Childers decision (Blair
Underwood), although they are very important
characters, appear very briefly in the film just
adding the feeling like the movie wasn't really
finished when the producers released it. 
Rules of Engagement is something you've seen before
except without an ending. That is the best way to
describe it.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Matthew McConaughey, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon
Jovi, Bill Paxton, Erik Palladino, Tom Guiry, T.C.
Carson, David Keith, Jake Weber, Jack Noseworthy,
Matthew Settle, Will Estes, and Dave Power.
I had lost all faith in PG-13 movies that are intended
for teenagers and adults. The last dozen or so that I
have seen have all felt incomplete, as if the most
crucial scene was deleted in order to obtain a more
lucrative rating. However, after seeing the creative
Frequency last week and now the exciting U-571, my
bias is beginning to go away. Both films are as
innocuous for younger viewers as they are intellectual
for older viewers. Even better, I didn't think either
one of these films would be any good from first
instincts. Everyone loves surprises. U-571 looked like
another action film using an actual war as an excuse
to shoot torpedoes and bullets. This may be true, but
the action is so extraordinary that it is clear
director/co-writer Jonathan Mostow completed his
ultimate goal; to blow the audience's socks off. 
Set during the early stages of World War 2 when the
United States struggled to break the codes of the
technologically advanced German U-boats, U-571 follows
a small crew of American men who swipe the typewriter
necessary to solve the enigma from an enemy ship.
There's only one problem: the American ship they came
from and hoped to return to has been shot down
stranding the men on a German submarine known as (you
guessed it) U-571. It is now up to the mostly young
and inexperienced sailors, led by an interim captain
named Tyler (Matthew McConaughey), to return the
typewriter to America without getting sunk by far
superior German ships. 
The film starts off very slowly with a somewhat weak
opening action sequence and another uneventful half an
hour to introduce several of the sailors (most of whom
die when the mission goes awry or just inexplicably
disappear). Once the crew gets on the U-boat, the
movie shifts to another level and never leaves this
high energy level until the ending credits roll down.
As soon as the action starts, it does not stop and
luckily, because it is so exciting, I didn't want it
to stop. This is not a movie for those wanting to
avoid loud noises, from the wonderful, heart-pounding
score to the constant yelling of panicking men, make
sure you see this at a theater with
surround-soundotherwise, do not see it all.  
The best parts of U-571 are when Tyler is forced to
make impromptu decisions on how to escape seemingly
impossible situations. Throughout the movie, several
morals or characters are introduced to make Tyler's
job as stressful as possible. Germans gun down their
own men, Tyler's mentor Captain Dahlgren warns him
that a captain has to be prepared to sacrifice even
the most beloved soldiers for a victory, another
sailor (Erik Palladino) threatens mutiny. All of these
examples, and several others, increase the chaotic
atmosphere and the importance of Tyler's every move.
They also make U-571 one of the most exhilarating
movies I have seen in a while. 

Title
Review for Joe Gould's Secret (1999)
Starring Ian Holm, Stanley Tucci, Hope Davis, Susan Surandon, Patricia
Clarkson, Steve Marting, and David Wohl.        
Joe Gould's Secret is the third directorial effort from prolific character
actor Stanley Tucci. Similar to his previous films, Big Night and The
Impostors, Tucci continues his trend of focusing on unique relationships
between two male characters of the past. Unlike his previous films, Joe Gould's
Secret is based on a true story that occurred during the 1950's within
Greenwich Village, New York City. The acting in the film is particularly
impressive especially from the two leads, Tucci and Ian Holm. Their
performances clearly show the vast research and accuracy they brought into
their difficult characters. However, the film's dull script eventually grows so
tiresome that the outstanding performances are unable to save it. 
The characters in Joe Gould's Secret are so irregular that it is almost a
mystery how this film is as it boring as it is. First there is the ostensibly
simple Joseph Mitchell (Tucci). A well-known writer for New Yorker magazine who
can create a masterpiece on paper but can barely speak a full sentence in
person without the occasional uhhh's or ummm's in between words. Mitchell,
speaking with an acute Southern accent, is so kind, it is fascinating he is
able to survive and succeed in a hectic city such as New York. Looking for a
story that will make him a writing legend, Mitchell finds himself following and
writing about the adventures of a homeless man named Joe Gould (played
wonderfully by Ian Holm). Gould is loud, annoying, and rude but Mitchell finds
that this man is something different. The loquacious Gould, it turns out, is
writing a book called The Oral History. Consisting of  random quotes that Gould
has heard from diverse people around the city, the book currently holds three
times as many words as the Bible. As Mitchell follows Gould, he learns that
Gould is very popular among the upper class art lovers, who enjoy his company
because of his wildly eccentric characteristics. Mitchell searches for the
majority of the film Joe Gould's secret. He tries to solve the enigma that is
Gould. Is Gould an ignored genius with a lot on his mind or is he a phony just
trying to cheat the upper class out of their money?
The script at first is excellent. It does a fine job setting up the characters
and building a solid relationship between Gould and Mitchell. However, what
made the script unsatisfactory was that the main plot was constantly
interrupted by pointless characters or scenes. Small roles from big actors such
as Steve Martin and Susan Surandon hurt the film more than helped it because
they were so distracting and out of the ordinary. Hope Davis' character as
Mitchell's wife was not fully developed so the scenes in which Mitchell spends
time with his family seem very pointless and unnecessary. These scenes were
incredibly dull especially when compared to the intense and exciting action
that Ian Holm brings to the screen. Because of the distractions that plague the
main plot, the script loses its steam about two-thirds of the way into the
film, once Mitchell has written his article about Gould. At this point,
Mitchell becomes just as tired of Gould as I am. Sitting through the final
third of the film was like torture. It never seemed to end.
See this film for the acting. I have never seen Ian Holm better than this in a
barely recognizable role. He gives out the perfect message that his character
is someone you admire greatly but because of his lack of manners, you don't
want to eat lunch with him. If Joe Gould's Secret becomes widely recognized, I
beg the Academy not to forget him next year. 

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
Starring Campbell Scott, Rebecca Pidgeon, Steve Martin, Ricky Jay, Ben Gazzara,
and Felicity Huffman.
I was originally going to give The Spanish Prisoner two and half stars. From my
first viewing, I noticed that David Mamet's film was intense and clever at
times but boring and cliched at other times especially at the beginning. From
my second viewing however, I noticed that Mamet's script was actually a
masterpiece. The Spanish Prisoner, like The Usual Suspects or Chinatown, begs
for the viewer's complete attention. Miss a scene or even a small detail, and
you could miss the meaning of the entire film. Also like the aforementioned
films, it rewards its viewer for paying attention by delivering a surprising
and memorable ending. Mamet is success doing again what he once tackled in 1987
when he wrote and directed House of Games. Like his past gem, The Spanish
Prisoner fools the audience as much (or even more) than the victim. Because we
were deceived just like the victim, we feel a strong attachment to the main
character and consequently are more interested in the film. Mamet has the
talent of not completely ending a film gift wrapped, but rather leaving some
ambiguity towards the end. The power that he has in forcing the viewer to
determine who the good guys and bad guys are once the film is over, without
giving a right answer, is unique and ingenious. The Spanish Prisoner will leave
you seriously puzzled and intrigued. After seeing the film again, I noticed
that the details Mamet uses are so incredibly accurate it is frightening. His
direction is very subtle; as he leaves so many clues explaining what is going
on and who is who but it is still very difficult to tell what exactly is
happening even if you see all of them, or think you see all of them. 
The story follows a young up and coming businessman, Joe Ross, (Campbell Scott)
who has just created a mysterious and lucrative "process" that everyone is
trying to get their hands on. Soon Ross does not know who he can trust or who
is after his "process." Through his journey Ross meets a number of mysterious
characters: The rich and popular Jimmy Dell, a secretary who has a huge crush
on Ross, and Ross' boss Mr. Klein. Played by Steve Martin, Rebecca Pidgeon, and
Ben Gazarra respectively, the supporting cast is very solid especially Martin,
who deserved an Oscar nomination for his commanding and manipulative role. The
most interesting character in the film, though, was Campbell Scott's Joe Ross.
The character's transformation from an ingenuous and polite rookie to a
paranoid veteran is very apparent and justifiable. 
David Mamet's script is so interesting because we know people don't actually
talk like the characters in the film, yet we feel so connected to some of them.
His beguiling style could fool any viewer up for the challenge. This is a must
see, for those interested in solving a complex puzzle of a movie.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
Starring Tobey Maguire, Michael Caine, Charlize Theron, Delroy Lindo, Paul
Rudd, Kathy Baker, Jane Alexander, Erykah Badu, Kate Nelligan, Heavy D, Kieran
Culkin, K. Todd Freeman, and J.K. Simmons.
Towards the end of The Cider House Rules, a dying character informs protagonist
Homer (Tobey Maguire) of the most important lesson in life: "Sometimes you
gotta break the rules to put it straight." The quote sums up the moral of the
entire film. Individuals are so unique that they must create their own rules to
survive and never become enslaved by what someone else thinks is suitable.
Tagging along and depending on another person for an enjoyable existence can
only make you blind to the rest of the world, you can only see through their
eyes, you see what they want to see and don't want to see. Homer at first is
blind to the rest of the world. Working in an orphanage performing illegal
abortions with his kind mentor Dr Larch (Michael Caine), the bright ingenuous
Homer has never seen a city or the ocean or anything at all outside of the
small town in Maine where he was born and raised. Even though Homer knows his
life contains nothing but joy in which younger orphans lionize him and nurses
respect him, he inexplicably yearns for more in life. From the books he has
read or from the only film he has ever seen (King Kong), he knows there is much
more out there to explore and cherish. When a young couple seeking an abortion
visit the orphanage, Homer decides that leaving town with them is the best
chance he'll have to answer his curiosity. 
The message of the story is very clear, that this boy wants to discover what
the world is like by himself, without having to lean on another for assistance.
However, throughout the movie, in my opinion, Homer never actually completes
his true goal. There are very few times in which he is actually by himself
discovering and learning something different from before. It seemed like he
left the orphanage to avoid Dr. Larch's protectiveness, yet when he is on his
trip, he is always around someone else, as if this other person is a valid
replacement for the doctor. Homer hangs around co-workers during work time and
at night, around the beautiful and confused Candy (the ubiquitous Charlize
Theron) at other times, and around Candy's WWII pilot boyfriend Wally (Paul
Rudd) when he is in town. Wasn't the whole point of Homer's travels to discover
who he actually his as an individual? Or to make some decisions without asking
another person's opinion first? There were a some moments in which Homer takes
control but certainly not enough. Another irritating section of the story is
that Homer does not even leave the state of Maine in his journey for
self-clarification. It doesn't seem like much of an effort if you barely travel
a day's worth of time. Supposedly an attempt to "see what the world is really
like," Homer doesn't even change time zones. With such a short distance of
travelling, it is really hard to believe that Homer has really changed. 
These unsatisfactory elements of the plot fortunately have no harm on the
fantastic acting from the splendid cast. Delroy Lindo and Michael Caine were
particularly superb as completely different men teaching Homer completely
different lessons. Tobey Maguire, who understandably is starting to get the
same roles in his films, is also perfectly naďve as the main character. The
only problem with the acting was that there were so many characters that some
talented actors, including Jane Alexander and Kate Nelligan, were underused. 
John Irving, adapting his own novel of the same name, writes a fine script,
which contains a number of examples of characters breaking the traditional
rules to become happier in life. At times the message is a little too obviously
thrown in to conversations  but at other times it is perfectly subtle and
thought provoking. Lasse Hallstrom (My Life As a Dog, What's Eating Gilbert
Grape) adds his talented directorial skills to the picture. The New England
scenery is beautifully detailed and colorfully attractive to the eye. 
Some unbelievably realistic acting, directing, and screenwriting make The Cider
House Rules fun to watch, but afterwards when trying to identify the true moral
of the story, some of the details are downright disappointing. 

Title
Review for In the Heat of the Night (1967)
Starring Sidney Poitier, Rod Steiger, Warren Oates, Lee Grant, Scott Wilson,
Larry Gates, and James Paterson.
As African American detective Vergil Tibbs questions a suspected white murderer
inside a jail cell, there is a wonderful, eye-catching shot which
instantaneously presents the main message of the entire film. The shot has
Tibbs' face completely covered by the shadows of the prison bars. To see these
bars blocking his face, we see how separated Tibbs is from the rest of the
characters in the film. As a black detective conducting an investigation in a
Southern town full of violent white bigots, no matter how innocent Tibbs is, he
is still seen by these bigots as a threat simply because of the color of his
skin. The bars show that Tibbs has not been given a fair chance to show exactly
who he is, instead others have chosen him as different and dangerous. This one
shot amazes me because it captures a whole theme in a matter of seconds. It
perhaps may be the most powerful image I have seen in a film.        
"In the Heat of the Night" was the first and the best of the three films Norman
Jewison directed concerning racism in America. Jewison has a very keen style of
displaying various cases of racism as he is neither pedantic nor overly
sentimental. In these three films he does an excellent job creating very
detailed equal analyses of characters from the abused to the abusers. He is
also not afraid to tell the absolute truth about how corrupt society was in the
past and is in the present. Preceding the very original "A Soldier's Story" and
the recently released "The Hurricane," "In the Heat of the Night contains some
classic lines and some very memorable characters. The film, which won best
picture in 1967 focuses on Vergil Tibbs, played superbly by Sidney Poitier as a
fearless African American police officer from Philadelphia who refuses to give
up on an investigation in a white town where is he not wanted. Tibbs is a man
who rarely loses his temper and that is worth mentioning because he is
constantly facing abuse from those around him. As a hero who is not afraid to
face off against five men with chains, Tibbs is the perfect protagonist.
Poitier also gives an excellent, noteworthy voice to his character. Never
nervous and always commanding, his speech patterns are very manipulative as
they range from stentorian to soothing. 
However, unlike "The Hurricane" where Denzel Washington dominated over the rest
of the cast, Poitier shares the spotlight with Rod Steiger, who won best actor
for his excellent performance. As a sheriff who helps Tibbs and warns him of
the dangers around him, Steiger shows a great amount of skill in his role. He
starts off as racist and blind as the other townspeople. He would refer to
Tibbs as "boy" and would always suspiciously keep an eye on him. As the film
progresses though, there is a very gradual change in the sheriff. He begins to
see the hardships Tibbs faces and he sees the foolishness of his own neighbors.
What I really enjoyed about Steiger's character was that he did not completely
abandon his friends or connect with Tibbs at the end of the film. He still
could not refer to Tibbs as Mister Tibbs or Officer Tibbs but rather settled
for Virgil. Instead, it was apparent that he was eventually going to see the
world differently in the future. Most movies would have a character reversing
all of his beliefs and influences in a matter of minutes. This action would not
have been realistic at all since it is nearly impossible for someone to believe
something one day and believe something else the next day. Jewison's
determination to make this film as realistic as possible is very obvious here
and also very appropriate. 
"In the Heat of the Night" shows the difference between the North and the South
or a major city and a small town in the United States during the 1960's. It
displays this perfectly. However, the actual investigation, although it is not
the main focus of the film, lacks interest. It seemed rushed especially towards
the end as if Jewison had given his message about racism and did not feel like
giving a credible explanation involving the murder victim. There were way too
many characters added during the last fifteen minutes and some of the scenes
during this time period were inane (police officer Sam being a suspect was not
needed). Also, it is given that Tibbs is a vigilant homicide detective who is
the best at what he does, but some of his discoveries came out of nowhere and
how he found out some of the important case details towards the end were never
answered. 
The rushed ending was the only mistake of this otherwise memorable Jewison
classic. (A congratulations has to be given to actor Scott Wilson. He managed
to be in the two best movies of 1967, "In the Heat of the Night" and the even
better "In Cold Blood.")
visit my new web site: Lars Attacks!
http://www.angelfire.com/ny3/larsattacks

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Gladiator" (2000) ***1/2 (out of four)
Starring Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie
Nielsen, Derek Jacobi, Richard Harris, Oliver 
Reed, and Djimon Hounsou.
Imagine this. You're given a sword and a shield and
very basic, minimal training. A man you don't know
tells you that this will be the last day that you will
live. You are thrown into an arena with thousands of
spectators wanting to see you die. You frantically
monitor several closed doors which, in seconds, will
release vicious enemies prepared to destroy you. You
watch as the innocent friends you made in the last few
days are murdered in cold blood. If you are lucky
enough to survive this chaos thrown at you, you know
you're going to have to do it all over again tomorrow.
Eventually know matter how strong or skilled you are,
you're going to die. This is the life of a gladiator.
You'll never have to be a gladiator and after seeing
Ridley Scott's powerful Gladiator, you'll be thankful
for that.  
With his new film, Scott has returned cinema to the
fascinating age of the ancient Roman Empire. And like
those preceding it, Spartacus and Ben Hur, Gladiator
has nearly everything going for it - a strong lead
actor, a wonderful supporting cast, eye-catching
special effects, and a great script. Since the two
aforementioned films came out before the prime target
viewers of Gladiator (teenagers to thirty-year-old
males) were around, a whole new genre may just be
reborn and revisited. 
>From a weak beginning, the film starts off extremely
gloomy and inauspicious. Rome's best general Maximus
(Russell Crowe), who has helped the Empire conquer
nearly everywhere they have attempted, is currently
(in the year 180 A.D. that is) waging a war against
Germania. Scott shoots the gory battle in an awkward
style, similar to that of Saving Private Ryan but much
less effective. It's blurry, in slow motion, and the
sound is muted. As soon as this artistic method began,
it was hard to tell what was what and who was who.
It's a good thing Scott stops this after the first
twenty minutes or else Gladiator would have been
torture to watch. Instead, the general swears he will
get out after this battle. He wants to go back to his
family and his crops, he wants a quiet life. But,
unexpectedly, he gets anything but that. The dying
emperor of Rome, Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris),
decides to have Maximus appointed new emperor of Rome
once he dies. He asks Maximus to restore the Republic
by giving more power to the senators. All of this does
not go well for Aurelius' son, Commodus (Joaquin
Phoenix) who was expecting his father to name him the
new emperor. Jealous and upset, Commodus kills his own
father, names himself emperor, kills Maximus' wife and
son, and attempts to kill Maximus. But Maximus is able
to escape his own death and vows to kill Commodus and
fulfill Marcus Aurelius' wishes. Now a slave, the only
way he can win his own freedom and complete his goal
is to become a winning gladiator, who eventually are
released for their success. 
A story of betrayal and promises, Gladiator is more
than just a mindless action flick. You actually care
about the characters, sometimes even the evil villain
Commodus, who is just a young man as determined to
make Rome one way as Maximus is determined to make it
the other way. Phoenix plays his character
brilliantly. Think of Commodus as the Percy Wetmore
(of pant-wetter The Green Mile) of the Roman Empire -
a whiny, sleazy,
"respect-me-because-my-father-was-a-good-man" brat who
hates when he's not the center of attention. Every
scene we see Commodus, he's either crying or he looks
like he has just been crying. Phoenix has definitely
matured as an actor since To Die For, and Gladiator
shows he's more than just River's little brother.
Crowe is also excellent as the film's grisly-faced
hero. Maximus is one of the few characters in recent
cinema who actually has emotions. This guy actually
acts like a anyone in his situation would act, he's no
invincible superhero who only blurts out one-liners,
he (believe it or not) acts like a human being! The
rest of the cast, including Richard Harris, Djimon
Hounsou, Walter Hill, Derek Jacobi, and Connie Nielsen
are also first rate. 
Ridley Scott, using outstanding special effects, has
brilliantly recreated the Roman Coliseum, the loudness
of the Roman Mob, and the city of Rome in general. The
visuals are breathtaking and voluminous, like a
Cleopatra of the year 2000. The costuming is also
wonderful from the detailed shields and armor to the
exquisite dress of the upper-class politicians.  
Gladiator is another movie you have to see on the big
screen to get the most out of the experience. Along
with U-571, action fans should have plenty to see in
theaters this week and should expect much more
excitement to come this summer of 2000. 

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, Liev
Scheiber, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Laurie Metcalf, Jada Pinket, Omar Epps,
Timothy Olyphant, Duane Martin, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Rebecca Gayheart, Portia
de Rossi, Joshua Jackson, David Warner, Lewis Arquette, Heather Graham, Luke
Wilson, and Kevin Williamson.
Similar to the release of Scream, I was skeptical about how good this movie
would turn out. As this sequel so blatantly proves through its horror - buff
college students, sequels are never better than the original. In fact, they
could not only be terrible, but they could also make a viewer doubtful of how
good the first one was. Scream 2 is certainly not better than Scream because it
lacks the perfect setting from the original. The teenagers living in your
traditional suburban neighborhood who attend your classic chaotic house parties
is a horror movie's dream setting. In Scream 2, the surviving kids from the
first one have grown up and now are attending a larger college. However, they
are still being attacked by a mysterious murderer in a "ghost face" mask. The
question is: who is the killer? Most of the characters have matured and now
share a stronger connection with adults living in the same town as them. The
maturity is what Scream 2 should have avoided. The fact that the kids were
nothing but "stoned dudes" in the first film made it so funny. The only real
contact the kids had to the adult world in Scream, besides the cops, was their
authoritative principal (the ubiquitous Henry Winkler) who didn't really care
about any of his students' safety. This is what was so funny about Scream, it
had your stereotypical trouble-maker teens and your basic adult who harshly
reminds these kids to behave. This is something we've seen many times before at
the theaters and can now laugh at how embarrassingly bad it is in this parody
of a horror movie.  In Scream 2, the only real adult introduced, besides cops
and reporters, is main character Sydney's drama teacher (David Warner). They
share a few pointless bonding scenes together that show that these once no good
kids are now respectable young adults. Who wants respectable young adults to be
your main characters? Not me. 
Now that the kids have grown up and hold more responsibilities, the jokes just
aren't as funny as the original. The only amusing sections are when Randy
(Jamie Kennedy) recites the rules of a sequel; there are more deaths, they are
bloodier, and anyone can be a suspect, and even these parts seem tacked on and
unnecessary to the plot. I thought screenwriter Kevin Williamson could have
added more lines about how black characters never survive in the sequel. He had
the perfect opportunity with a cameraman (Duane Martin who shines in every
scene that he is in) but unfortunately is underused. The fact that the sequel
has a lot more violence could have diminished its script from completely
shining. Williamson has the potential of a witty screenwriter but whenever he
seemed to launch a grand punch line, an outburst of violence suddenly
interrupted his train of thought. When thought over a number of times, it could
be possible that Williamson made a dissatisfactory script on purpose to prove
that sequels are always worse. Intentionally bad or not, the script is still
overwhelmingly disappointing.
Wes Craven still makes Scream 2 a pleasing attempt. The violence that he uses
may hurt the script, but it is still incredibly intense, particularly a scene
involving a police car crash. The film never drags on, its quick pace, very
similar to that of Scream, never hits a bump in the road allowing for
edge-of-your-seat action throughout. 
Scream 2 is a decent film placed at the middle of the Scream trilogy. Those
looking for mindless violence will find it, however those looking for a clever
script like the first one, may be let down.  

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Eye of the Beholder" (2000) ** (out of four)
Written and Directed by Stephan Elliot
Starring Ewan McGregor, Ashley Judd, k.d. Lang,
Patrick Bergin, Genevieve Bujold, and Jason Priestley.
With a better ending it might have worked. Eye of the
Beholder grabbed me with its perfectly unattractive
images and held me tightly for quite a long time but
ultimately took no advantage of its overpowering
control. About three quarters of the way through I
suddenly lost all interest. I can even pinpoint the
exact moment this voyeuristic cat-and-mouse obsession
film self-destructed: the unfashionably late entrance
by Jason Priestley. In possibly the worst acting
performance of the year, Priestley ruins this movie.
His overacting is intolerable, his physical appearance
is repulsive, his portrayal of a drug- addicted abuser
is inexcusable. Thankfully, he only has a brief cameo
role or else Eye of the Beholder would have been
torture to watch. Priestley doesn't deserve all of the
blame though. Writer/Director Stephan Elliot never
takes his story to the next level. He skillfully
throws you into the movie as quickly as possible, but
he does little after that. 
Elliot stretches the simple outline of the plot (man
chases woman) farther than it should be stretched and
because of this, the movie really goes nowhere during
its one hour and forty minute running time. After a
while I stopped caring about the characters in the
movie because Elliot gave me no reason to. Every
person in this movie is bland and one- dimensional --
the dreaded combination that makes a movie almost
impossible to enjoy. 
Should I have cheered for Ashley Judd's Joanna or
booed her? This woman is a cold-blooded serial killer
but to me Elliot wants us to root for her anyway.
There are zero moments where I could have related to
her, zero moments where she did something humane. 
Then there is Ewan McGregor's spy character known as
"The Eye." Is he the guy I should have admired?
Following Joanna around, "The Eye" becomes obsessed
with her and her killing habits. There are three
reasons why I despised "The Eye." First off, he
predictably falls in love with Joanna, a horrible
person who only attracts him because of her beautiful
looks. Second, he's not the brightest "hero" around.
Customarily, you'd think that a spy would wear all
black or disguises to hide their presence, but our
friend "The Eye" walks around with a brightest red
jacket you'll ever see. This seemingly minor annoyance
is actually incredibly irritating. The third problem
with the miserable "The Eye" is that we learn
throughout the movie that his wife and child left him
because he spends so much time on his computer. So
you'd think the solution to that problem would be to
stay away from the computer. Does "The Eye" do this?
Of course not. In fact, he spends even more time on
the computer and whines even more about his loss.
Arrggh. 
An appropriate ending could have made these characters
more interesting. Perhaps if we learned more about why
they did what they did, they would be more realistic
and believable. But Eye of the Beholder abruptly
finished as if the camera ran out of film. 
What I did like was the constant eye/blind/sight
imagery Elliot uses. The Australian filmmaker who
brought you the colorful Prescilla: Queen of the
Desert seems to be a more talented director than
writer. The visuals prevent Eye of the Beholder from
getting the lowest grade possible, but little else is
recommended. This possible cult film should have gone
straight to cable or video. 
Lars Attacks has moved!
A teenager attacks past and present cinema
http://www.geocities.com/larsattacks00/

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Mission: Impossible 2 (2000) ** (out of four)
Starring Tom Cruise, Dougray Scott, Thandie Newton,
Ving Rhames, Brendan Gleeson, Richard Roxburgh,
William R. Mapother, and Anthony Hopkins. 
In 1996, Mission: Impossible confused the heck out of
me. A movie way too complex for its own good, only the
heart-poundingly superb action sequences by director
Brian De Palma made it worth watching and remembering.
When I heard that John Woo would direct the inevitable
sequel, I was somewhat excited - it's pretty much one
great director replacing another. But my primary
concern with Mission: Impossible 2 was that the script
would once again outwit the visuals and when Robert
Towne (who co-wrote the first one) signed onto the
project as screenwriter, my worries failed to go away.
You see, Towne also wrote the script for Chinatown,
without a doubt an excellent movie, but one even more
confusing than M:I. To me, Chinatown is the epitome of
confusion; one of those movies you have to see
multiple times to understand the basic plot. The night
before M:I 2 opened, I prayed I wouldn't have to watch
a movie that felt like solving a Rubik's cube. 
To my surprise and chagrin, it turns out that in order
to dumb down a plot, suspense, excitement, and twists
all have to be sacrificed. The movie spends so much
time trying to explain and re-explain the rudimentary
premise that for the first hour and a half, mainly all
there is on screen is lots and lots of talking. A lot
of dialogue can, if executed correctly, make a film
work but if you're expecting a loud, action packed
summer popcorn flick and you get a lot of bland
conversations - it is very difficult to sit through.
Unlike the original Mission: Impossible that
forcefully grabs your attention with a mission gone
fatally awry, there is nothing in the sequel to get
the audience pumped and excited for the final act. To
start off the film, there is a plane crash and then
some beautiful shots of daredevil spy Ethan Hunt (Tom
Cruise) climbing a massive rock without a helmet,
ropes, or even a pair of gloves. But both of these
scenes are lacking; the brief incident involving a
plane crash is far from interesting and the rock
climbing scene is held back by a ridiculous and
distracting folk song playing somewhere in the
background. 
Hunt, conveniently cured from all of the tragic events
that happened in his past, is assigned a new mission
by his mentor (a cameo appearance by Anthony Hopkins).
It turns out that another spy, Sean Ambrose (Dougray
Scott), who occasionally substituted for Hunt to
complete especially dangerous missions, has turned bad
stealing a cell destroying virus called Chimera from a
Russian Scientist. It is Hunt's job to find out what
Ambrose is up to and who his business partners are.
Why does this seemingly routine stand out from others
(or why is this movie-worthy material)? Well there is
a girl involved. Hunt is ordered to use the angelic
and mysterious thief Nyah Hall (Thandie Newton), an
ex-girlfriend of Ambrose, to get closer to his arch
nemesis. The catch is that, in the process, Hunt
almost hypnotically falls for her beauty and really
never wants to let her go. M:I 2 is much more romantic
than its predecessor when it asks the question - which
guy is going to get the girl. The attractive Newton
outperforms Hollywood Hot Shot Tom Cruise and is
definitely the best part of this movie. Her character
contains a certain amount of power that you would
never find a female character hold in, say, a James
Bond movie and change like this is great to see. But
when the plot starts heading into the category of
predictable romance story, I knew that this Mission
Impossible would not have the paranoia and
double-crossing that the original one had. 
When something finally happens (during the last half
an hour of the movie), it seems particularly out of
place from the mild story that started the movie. 
John Woo, whose unique style of choreographed battle
scenes reached its zenith in Face Off, just does not
have control over the film. He makes this movie way
too serious, when it really should have been a guilty
pleasure. For example, instead of Hunt just hitting a
guard in the neck and dragging them into an alleyway,
he does a cheesy Matrix-style back flip/ jump kick in
the air first. After Hunt does this ten times in a
row, it is no longer absorbing, just annoying. Another
aggravation in this movie was the excessive use of a
character wearing a mask and looking like another
character in order to fool everyone except,
unfortunately, the audience. 
The good news is that Towne made the movie
comprehensible. The bad news is that the movie is just
not interesting enough to recommend. A dull first and
second act and an unsuccessfully exaggerated boost of
energy in the third act, makes Mission: Impossible 2
the kind of movie that tries too hard to be what is
should never have even thought of. 

Title
Review for Thick as Thieves (1999)
Starring Alec Baldwin, Michael Jai White, Andre Braugher, Rebecca De Mornay,
Bruce Greenwood, Julia Sweeney, and Janeane Garafolo.
 A sometimes entertaining, mostly confused film, "Thick as Thieves" never made
it in the theaters outside of Sundance. It may have done well at the box
office, but maybe after similar films bombed, such as "Clay Pigeons" or
"Goodbye Lover," executives decided to send it straight to cable. Oh well.
Despite its talented cast and interesting premise, the movie lacks a big scene
or a memorable climax to help bring everything together at the end. The film
introduces  plenty of promising characters but never develops them or the
scenarios they are involved in. It is very hard to determine if "Thick as
Thieves" is an attempted satire of an Elmore Leonard crime novel or a cheap
imitation of one. Either way, it fails at what it tries to become, a clever
black comedy. There is not one character the viewer can relate to, mainly
because we only receive glimpses of who these individuals really are or because
they are so cliched and predictable that they are uninteresting. The only good
guy in the film who comes close to an "average Joe" is a cop who spends the
whole film investigating the bad guys. There are no scenes of the cop's
personal life outside of her job so we never learn anything about the
character. Rebecca De Mornay plays her terribly flat with absolutely no
emotions and she looks so much like Hillary Clinton that at times it is very
distracting. Sometimes films succeed without any normal characters (see "Pulp
Fiction") because the situations they are in are so outrageous and irregular
that they are enjoyable. "Thick as Thieves" is not enjoyable because nothing
happens. No interesting twists, no funny jokes, no decent subplots, and
especially no originality. Nothing.
The straight forward plot is a fight between a car stealing gang, led by
Michael Jai White, and an infamous thief (Alec Baldwin), known as the thief.
The thief is angry at the gang because they tried to set him up and get him
killed over twenty thousand dollars worth of food stamps. The rest of the movie
has the two sides playing tricks on each other in order to entertain
themselves. The plot was interesting because it started out very unusual. The
fact that they are fighting over food stamps is funny because it is pathetic.
However, as the film dragged on and the same food stamp joke remained, the
funniness eventually died off. The pathetic aspect though never disappeared.
>From the opening point, writer-director Sanders should have elaborated into new
grounds. He should have thrown in interesting secrets about the characters or
maybe another reason for the two sides to fight each other. In other words, he
should have made a different movie after the first twenty minutes.
Alec Baldwin and Michael Jai White are supposed to be wild unique bad guys.
This notion is somewhat examined at times when we see Baldwin's obsession with
his dog or with music records and White's obsession with French food. However,
there is certainly not enough of this humorous eccentricity in the film.
Sanders also had a very talented cast of supporting actors to fill the roles
but they were not used to their full potential. Jeneane Garafolo had a blink
and you missed her appearance. Andre Braugher, so effective and memorable on
the television show "Homicide: Life on the Streets" is supposed to be an Iago
character to White's leadership, but it is terribly confusing as to what side
he is on and what he believes in especially at the end of the film.
"Thick as Thieves" is an unsuccessful attempt at repeating the comedic
cleverness of  crime stories such as "Get Shorty" or "Out of Sight."  As a
feature debut for Sanders, it was a respectable first try.

Title
Review for Boys and Girls (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Directed by Robert Iscove
Written by The Drews
Starring Freddie Prinze Jr., Claire Forlani, Jason
Biggs, Amanda Detmer, and Heather Donahue
When it comes to the average teenage romantic comedy,
I expect negative reviews from critics left and right.
Predictable, unoriginal, and forgettable will most
likely be the three adjectives to haunt the Down to
You's and the Drive Me Crazy's released by the dozens
these last couple of years. What I really look for in
this kind of movie is the entertainment value while
I'm sitting in the theater. Am I enjoying myself? Is
this a comfortable break from my week of finals? This
is why I have given films like Final Destination or
Road Trip high marks; I had a party of a time wasting
my money on something I won't remember next week.
So last week I opened up the New York Times - and, no
surprise, Boys and Girls got a negative review. Daily
News? Negative. Reelviews? Negative. Epinions.com?
Negative. This was nothing new. American Pie, Final
Destination, Road Trip didn't get such hot reviews and
I loved those guilty pleasures. Same goes for She's
All That, a formulaic but enjoyable Pygmalion
adaptation that got unjustly pounded. Since Boys and
Girls reunites She's All That director Robert Iscove
and actor Freddie Prinze Jr., I predicted déjŕ vu al
over again. But, still curious, I asked around my
school and from the one or two people who had seen it,
the reactions were far from positive. I had made up my
mind; I'll catch it on video or cable in a couple of
years. But, soon after, following a series of
unexpected events (we couldn't get into Shaft because
it is rated R), I found myself watching Boys and
Girls. Whoops. 
Boys and Girls is about a "nerdy, smart" boy named
Ryan (Prinze Jr.) and a "popular, flirt" girl named
Jennifer (Claire Forlani). Briefly meeting as
pre-teens and now attending the same college, the two
bump into each other so many times that eventually
they become best friends. But in the movies, a male
and a female cannot be friends without having that
nagging feeling of attraction for each other. With
advice from their roommates (Amanda Detmer, Jason
Biggs), Ryan and Jennifer attempt to discover the true
meaning of their relationship. 
The film definitely lives up to the dreaded three
adjectives - and mindless entertainment is nowhere to
be found. I could hardly sit through the 93 minute
running time for several reasons. The dialogue is
probably the worst I have ever seen in any movie,
mainly because the whole movie depends on the boring
script and the ridiculous words these characters use
is what Hollywood thinks kids can relate to. It is
almost offensive. An example of an insightful
conversation:
(Well it's not as bad as Wing Commander I guess)
The supporting cast is also painfully useless. Detmer
and Biggs stand in the way for anything interesting to
happen with their own boring, pointless subplots. And
although this is supposed to be from both perspectives
of the human sex, Prinze Jr's Ryan dominates the
screen while Forlani's Jennifer simply acts as a
dilemma for him to work with. We never learn anything
about Jennifer which is a shame too because Forlani is
the only actor to bring any life into her character. 
Teenager or not: you'll hate this movie, I guarantee
it. Maybe I should rent She's All That again. Is it
really as good as I think it is? 

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Keeping the Faith" (2000) **1/2 (out of four)
Starring Ben Stiller, Edward Norton, Jenna Elfman,
Anne Bancroft, Eli Wallach, Ron Rifkin, Hollan Taylor,
Lisa Edelstein, and Rena Sofer.
Edward Norton burst into the movies with his memorable
award winning performance as a young choir boy accused
of murder in Primal Fear. He proved he wasn't a one
hit wonder after impressive acting in American History
X and Fight Club. How does Norton fair in the romantic
comedy Keeping the Faith? Well he once again shows off
his acting skills except this time he shows them off a
little too much. In a very simple movie like this,
Norton just overacts and brings an excessive amount of
emotion into his character. By also directing the
film, it's as if he is trying to create his own Hamlet
and direct himself to an Oscar. Keeping the Faith is a
classic case of an actor bigger and better than the
picture. Co-star Ben Stiller, on the other hand, is
perfect for his role in the film. Much like his
character in There's Something About Mary, Stiller
plays a normal, likeable guy who has the worst luck
when it comes to the ladies. Maybe he isn't the best
actor on the planet and he most likely will be
typecast in these roles for the rest of his life, but
Stiller saves the movie. With as many one liners as
physical comedy, he just seems so comfortable in his
"everyman" role. No wonder he appears in more scenes
than the critically praised Norton, when it comes to
these types of movies, Stiller is the true
professional. 
Keeping the Faith follows two successful, popular,
iconoclastic best friends, one a priest (Norton) and
the other a rabbi (Stiller). The two have known each
other since the pre-teen years and their relationship
is seemingly unbreakable. However, their friendship
becomes somewhat turbulent when a female friend, Anna
(Jenna Elfman), who grew up with the two boys, comes
back to town and both guys find themselves attracted
to her. Not only do their sudden feelings for Anna
endanger their relationship, but also respect of
others in their professional fields. The priest
shouldn't even be thinking about Anna and because she
is not Jewish, the rabbi fears he will be widely
scrutinized. 
The mistake Keeping the Faith makes is that it spends
way too much time trying to teach the moral that you
must have faith in yourself and others equally in
order to make it in this world. In order to convey
this message, screenwriter Stuart Blumberg constantly
interrupts the quickly paced premise with long, boring
conversations that are neither romantic nor comedic.
In a romantic comedy, everything should be one or the
other. Don't get me wrong, I laughed several times
during the movie but even though the jokes were many,
they were very far between. The movie just dragged on
to a point where it was nearly unbearable, then
Stiller would appear in top form and pump some energy
into the story, then back to the dragging. A number of
segments during the movie contained little or no
development. 
The supporting cast is superb. Anne Bancroft, in
particular, is great as Stiller's mother who pressures
him into dating only Jewish women. Lisa Edelstein is
also noteworthy as one of the annoying girls who
Stiller is set up with. As "the date from hell,"
Edelstein's slapstick performance provides a number of
laugh-out-loud moments.
As for Jenna Elfman, she definitely brings some of
Dharma into her character. Honest, gregarious and
loquacious, Anna has everything the two men are
looking for. Elfman believably plays Anna and makes it
easy for the audience to understand why they instantly
go gaga for her. Like Stiller, she seems fit for roles
like these and dives right into her character with
complete control. 
Keeping the Faith won't be the funniest comedy of the
year but it is recommended for a few chuckles. And
Norton, I expect him to win an Oscar within five
years, maybe even two. Just not for movies like these.


Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
Directed by Chris Buck and Kevin Lima
Written by Bob Tzudiker and Noni White
Starring the voices of Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Lance Henriksen, Glenn
Close, Rosie O'Donnell, Wayne Knight, Alex D. Linz, Brian Blessed, and Nigel
Hawthorne.
For the forty-ninth celluloid addition of Tarzan, Disney has created a
sometimes excellent, mostly below-par animated translation. The main concern
that this film has to worry about is that it may not succeed in satisfying its
target age ranges. The gruesome deaths of a number of characters may distract
younger viewers and the overall sappiness Tarzan has may distract teenagers.
(Tarzan can swing and slide throughout the jungle like a skateboarder on a
half-pipe, an obvious attempt to make teenagers forget about the saccharine
mood of the film). Another problem is that this film is nothing new. The
animation may have advanced over the years, but the story of a character who
does not know where to fit in has been used to death by Disney (see The Little
Mermaid, The Lion King, Aladdin, etc.). These films ostensibly may seem
different from first glance, but in reality, they're all the same; Same ending,
same characters, same ultimate morals.  Tarzan is no exception to this trend.
The movie is unoriginal and predictable. The aforementioned films above share
these negative adjectives with Tarzan, but they are not as blatantly obvious
or, for some reason, as painful to sit through. 
Also those Disney classics all have very memorable characters that carry the
whole movie. The Little Mermaid's Sebastian, The Lion King's Timon and Pumbaa,
and Aladdin's The Genie all shined with excellent supporting roles. Tarzan
attempts to add some comedic flair to its cast with friends of Tarzan named
Terk and Tantor. Voiced by Rosie O'Donnell and Wayne Knight respectively, they
are both underused and not as funny. The only noteworthy voice from the cast
was that of Minnie Driver as Jane. Perfectly cast as the British researcher who
falls in love with the protagonist, Driver's confused, stuttering voice is very
convincing when she first meets Tarzan and as the film progresses, she still
maintains the same justifiable uneasiness of where she is and who she is
talking to. 
The story, of course, follows Tarzan, a boy raised by gorillas and his attempts
to fit in with his family by copying their exact mannerisms and gesticulations.
When he discovers humans for the first time, he must decide where he belongs in
life. Tarzan is, as mentioned before, irritating in some areas, particularly in
the beginning and the end. It takes way too long for Tarzan to meet Jane and
since you know exactly what will happen at the end, it is almost unbearable to
sit through.  For an alternative to this Disney feature, check out the
under-appreciated Warner Bros. flick The Iron Giant.

Title
Review for My Dog Skip (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"My Dog Skip" (2000) **1/2 (out of four)
Starring Frankie Muniz, Dinae Lane, Kevin Bacon, Luke
Wilson,Peter Crombie, Clint Howard, and the voice of
Harry Connick Jr.
Two young boys fail to become friends due to racism in
their hometown. A father, injured during the Spanish
Civil War, fears that his son may live the same life
as him and thus becomes overprotective. A recent high
school graduate is sent off to fight Hitler but comes
back an alcoholic trying to drink his troubled
experiences away. These examples and many more are all
introduced in My Dog Skip, then you never hear about
them again. Instead director Jay Russell takes the
easy way out and makes a simple movie about a boy and
his dog. Sure the terrier is cute and you feel good
once the movie ends, but this could have been much
much more. Introducing these subplots must have been
Russell's idea of playing a joke on the audience. He
holds them out like carrots in front of a donkey but
he never rewards you by completely developing them. 
For a film that takes place in Mississippi during the
second World War, My Dog Skip does not take enough
advantage of the time and place it is set in.
The movie should entertain young viewers though.
Although they might not understand any of the World
War two references, they will surely enjoy the
charismatic little dog that stars in the film. As for
adults, the movie may recreate some nostalgic moments
for them and the dialogue isn't too amateur like other
child flicks. I wasn't disappointed with My Dog Skip,
except, like its dog, it's too small of a movie to
stand out from others with similar plots. This should
sound familiar a nine year old boy, Will, (Frankie
Muniz), scrawny and friendless, is the target for your
average cliched school bullies. However, once he
receives a dog for his birthday, Will's confidence
soars allowing him to get the girl, friends, and
respect from everyone in his hometown of Yazoo,
Mississippi. But can he and his dog stay out of
trouble?
I'll be honest, it was difficult seeing the titular
character of Malcolm in the Middle, Frankie Muniz, 
playing another character in another time period. To
be honest, his performance as Will was not very
convincing. The southern accent Muniz uses seems fake
and at times he lacks any emotion (no nine year old
would have a blank look on his face if a drunk looter
through an empty beer bottle at him). Muniz has shown
extraordinary talent on his television show but he
seems to lack it in this role. Other actors are wasted
in My Dog Skip. Kevin Bacon and Diane Lane, as Will's
parents, are wonderful but rarely used. Luke Wilson,
playing the athletic Dink Jenkins, Will's idol living
next door, is never given complete closure. The real
star here is the dog, who instantly captured the
hearts of every member of the audience.
My Dog Skip is a very small movie. There is nothing
extravagant here but it still should be fun to watch.
If only Russell had dug deeper into the plot and made
it a little more specific. He had so many chances to
do this, with so many different subplots asking to be
developed. Oh well. 

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
Starring Tim Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Alan Rickman, Daryl Mitchell, Tony
Shalhoub, Sam Rockwell, and Enrico Colantoni        
"Galaxy Quest" is a funny and clever spoof on "Star Trek" and its many spin-
offs. After seeing numerous television programs and movies imitating William
Shatner's bizarre speech patterns, this is the only film that overtly satirizes
the whole crew, the ship, the aliens, the trekkies and the gadgets of the
infamous 1960's television show. Don't be mistaken, there are plenty of Shatner
jokes in "Galaxy Quest" but the film is more than just a simple mockery; it is
as much a derision of "Star Trek" as it is a celebration of the show's
longevity. My mom, a serious trekkie who also saw the film, found it more
amusing then I did mainly because the film holds countless inside jokes
designed specifically for die hard fans. The film is still enjoyable to those
who do not appreciate "Star Trek" not only because it contains several
intelligent jokes that everyone should understand, but also because it has a
great deal of exciting action and adventure elements. 
The acting in the film is very light and an enjoyable alternative to the
heavily dramatic performances from the likes of Matt Damon's Tom Ripley or
Denzel Washington's Rubin "Hurricane" Carter. The actors are having fun playing
their parts and because of their mirthful attitudes, the audience has the same
amount of fun watching them. Playing actors who star in "Galaxy Quest" a
popular sci-fi show of the past, the cast is full of stereotypes immediately
identifiable with those on "Star Trek." Tim Allen is perfect as the pretentious
Shatner captain who always receives credit for a job well done. Allen is
basically doing a live action Buzz Lightyear, which is fine because he is so
good at it. Sigourney Weaver plays your traditional scantily dressed crew
member whose only real purpose on the show is to look beautiful and to attract
male viewers. Weaver makes her character work, although it would have been nice
to see her break out of the constant sexism she faces at all times. The biggest
surprise from the cast was Alan Rickman's hilarious performance as a Spock-like
character who is tired of saying the same "Live Long and Prosper"- like one
liner. Rickman shows that these actors are forever doomed to their characters
on "Galaxy Quest," they can never have another role again without the
comparison of "Galaxy Quest" by their audience. The rest of the cast is
enjoyable, including Sam Rockwell as the paranoid unnamed actor who dies on the
show before the opening commercials. Although Rockwell tended to overact at
times, like he did in "The Green Mile," he certainly has his moments especially
towards the end. 
"Galaxy Quest" does an excellent job grabbing the viewer's attention with a
memorable opening scene set at a sci-fi convention. The movie not only
perfectly satirizes "Star Trek" episodes and characters, but it also portrays
fanatics with perfect accuracy. Once the actors actually go into space to fight
real life combat against real evil bad guys, the momentum dies down a bit,
especially when compared to its opening twenty minutes. However, the film
remains constantly enjoyable and humorous. "Galaxy Quest" is a short and
refreshing break from the myriad of three hour movies releasing for Oscar
consideration. This is a must see for Trekkies.

Title
Review for Singin' in the Rain (1952)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Singin' in the Rain" (1952) **** (out of four)
Directed by Stanley Donen and Gene Kelly
Written by Betty Comden and Adolph Green 
Starring Gene Kelly, Donald O'Connor, Debbie Reynolds,
Jean Hagen, and Rita Moreno 
Very rarely does a movie have it all. It's almost
impossible to find a film (or anything for that
matter) 
that contains a perfect mixture of whatever elements
it attempts to combine. Whenever one of these gems is
released, word of mouth travels quickly and you've got
yourself a classic. The perfect film must attract all
types seeking all styles of film genre; Singin' in the
Rain is the perfect film. With the best choreography I
have ever seen, the most pleasant songs I've ever
heard in a movie, a sweet romance that is simple and
believable, a pair of
laugh-til-you-can't-see-straight performers, a
flawless plot structure, an amazingly creative set
design, bright colorful photography, the unmatchable
wit and charm of a consummate Hollywood hero, and a
bearably brief (but not too brief) running time,
Singin' in the Rain is the ideal model for a complete
picture. It's not missing anything, because 
it has everything.
What I love about this movie is that despite being
known as primarily a-song-and-dance production, the
plot is actually as interesting as the main
attraction. Unlike other pictures that create some
lame 
excuses to have a variety of characters tap dance on
tables, this movie actually makes sense. And also
unlike other movies which try to hard to create a
decent plot and thus widen the gaps between musical
numbers, Singin' in the Rain is as balanced as can be.
There was never a point where I grew tired of the
dialogue and prayed for the music to start up again or
a point where I prayed for the music to end and the
dialogue to proceed, it felt like the director built
the movie customarily for me and my desires (And the
fact that this movie was made almost half a century
ago and still is a joy to watch just shows that
quality can survive for an eternity).
 The film begins with Don Lockwood (Gene Kelly) and
Lina Lamont (Jean Hagen), two famous silent movie
stars thriving in the 1920's with the same amount of
popularity as a Backstreet Boy in our present time.
But there careers are endangered when technology in
filmmaking has advanced and the two actors are forced
to face the ultimate test:  having to star in one of
the first talking pictures ever.  Both actors
eventually progress on different paths; Lockwood has
an innate knack for carrying a film, talking or not.
Lamont, on the other hand, an annoying, selfish,
pompous brat with an unusually high pitched voice that
would kill her career if heard on film, has a little
more difficulty with the transition in cinema. When
the two actors make a disastrous film that bombs at a
test screening, changes definitely must be made before
a wide theatrical release. At the last moment,
Lockwood and friends decide to meticulously edit the
film by making it into a musical with Lamont's voice
replaced by his non-celebrity girlfriend's Kathy
Selden(Debbie Reyolds). But how will Lamont respond
when she hears about this change?
The acting in Singin' in the Rain is first rate. Gene
Kelly is excellent as the big-time movie star who 
just wants to be treated like an average Joe. And
because of his character's desire and mannerisms, it
is quite easy to relate to him. Donald O'Connor steals
the show as Cosmo Brown, friend and co-worker of Don
Lockwood. Providing comic relief, O'Connor completes
his job with a huge smile on his face the whole time.
Delivering one liners with the same dexterity as a
Marx Brother (when responding to the command `Call me
a cab,' Cosmo quickly responds: `OK, you're a cab'),
every time he is on the screen, even without any
lines, he is the center of attention - and every time
he's not present, you wonder where he is. Cosmo has
got to be one of the most likeable characters in any
movie. Jean Hagen is also extraordinary in a
villainous role that is both funny and evil at the
same time. One noteworthy scene places Lina Lamont at
the hands of a speech teacher with hilarious
consequences a la Pygmalion.
Even if you haven't seen the movie, you know the
songs. You've watched the main characters in A
Clockwork Orange or North By Northwest imitate Gene
Kelly's famous `Singin' in the Rain' bit and you've
probably uncontrollably whistled the tune at the sight
of a raindrop. I know I have. Other ballads accompany
the titular song that are equally `whistle worthy.'
`Make Em Laugh,' `All I Do Is Dream of You' `Good
Morning,' and `Moses' are all unforgettable. The only
major complaint in this category is that you may have
some of these songs stuck in your head for an
unbearably long 
amount of time.
Most of the songs are supplemented by unbelievable
dancing. It is the dancing that makes these tunes 
look even better then they already are. The
choreography is stunning, period. The three main 
characters, Gene Kelly, Donald O'Connor, and Debbie
Reynolds each show their amazing talents with
extremely fast feet gliding accurately synchronized
with the person dancing alongside of them. Kelly is a
natural at what he did; when he accomplished the most
difficult moves, it seemed like he had not trouble at
all. O'Connor is just as good as his co-star and
during his hilarious `Make Em Laugh' solo, watching
this slapstick performance in which he runs up walls
and dances with inanimate objects, you'll have a huge
smile plastered on your face guaranteed. Reynolds also
shows she can work right next to these two virtuosos
during the `Good Morning' segment. Never missing a
step, she gets brownie points for accomplishing the
routine in high heels. But nothing compares to Gene
Kelly's renowned `Singin' in the Rain' performance. As
he swings his umbrella and stomps in puddles, you know
exactly how he feels the whole time  he's in love,
who cares about the weather?
I'd dance and sing in the rain for Singin' in the
Rain. Each time I see it, I am forced into happiness.
Any movie that does this has to be perfect. Otherwise
what other reason is there to see a movie?

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C.
Reilly, Diane Lane, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, William
Fichtner, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Janet Wright, Rusty
Schwimmer, Dash Mihok, Michael Ironside, and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio
Wolfgang Petersen's latest, The Perfect Storm, is like
a pineapple. It only tastes good after arduous peeling
and digging - if you try to eat the fruit, spikes and
all, it's going to hurtquite a bit. OK, maybe that
was a confusing analogy, so here's my main complaint
about the latest man battles nature flick: there isn't
really much of a story to tell. Basically, a
Massachusetts fishing crew goes out to sea on a small
boat, called the Andrea Gail, and gets stuck in the
middle of "the storm of the century." How much time
does it take for Petersen to tell this story? Not
nearly enough. So he spends the majority of the film
developing pointless side stories which all eventually
become superfluous. Audiences want to see the storm,
they want to see a fight for survival but what they
get is a lot of cliched, maudlin drivel. The last
quarter of The Perfect Storm is utterly perfect in
every aspect, but just try lasting the first
three-quarters. 
I have yet to read Sebastian Junger's The Perfect
Storm, but from what I have heard it is an
unforgettable tale. Based on a true story, the book
must have found some other way to introduce the
characters because in the movie version, the approach
is weak. Using a wonderfully patriotic score by James
Horner, Petersen almost hides the in-your-face
banality. Right away the central characters are
introduced: the gritty, determined captain (George
Clooney), the ingenue (Mark Wahlberg) torn between his
job and his girlfriend (Diane Lane), the loving father
(John C. Reilly), the comic relief who's always trying
to get laid (John Hawkes), the new guy (William
Fichtner) who immediately antagonizes a crewmate and
the quiet, French guy (Allen Payne). So many problems
strike the opening segment of the film that the
remaining portions directly suffer. It is not the
all-star cast's fault, just the characters designed
for their portrayal. Allen Payne's character never
speaks in the entire movie, not because he is mute,
but because he's never given any lines! Are we
supposed to root for a guy whose face and voice we are
never given a chance to interact with? Fichtner's
character is terribly underdeveloped - we don't know
what he's doing there, where he's from, or who he's
supposed to be. The remaining four fishermen are all
cardboard stereotypes (Hawkes says to a female
stranger in one scene "You know what would look good
on you? Me!" Ooooh real creative).
As the script advances and the Andrea Gail floats
farther out into the waters, the crew continues to not
feel human. Only when the storm takes center stage
does the movie jump out of its sleepwalk. The
computer-generated images of gigantic waves crashing
against a helpless boat are thunderously real. I can
only imagine if this was an IMAX film, this city kid
would surely never go in the water again. This is
loud, jolting entertainment - adjectives that
completely negate the rest of the film. 
The Perfect Storm was unfortunately a disappointment.
The maelstrom lived up to its potential but everything
else failed to do so. I guess I'll stick to that other
Survival spectacleyou know the one on CBS?

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
Starring Xander Berkely, Julian Sands, Salma Hayek,
Golden Brooks, Steven Weber, Holly Hunter, Stellan
Skarsgard, Alessandro Nivola, Jeanne Tripplehorn,
Saffron Burrows, Kyle MacLachlan, Aimee Graham, Leslie
Mann, and Viveka Davis.        
Before I review Mike Figgis' extremely unique new film
Time Code, it is necessary to list the reasons for why
this is one of the most original films ever created. 
1)Time Code is one of the first films to be entirely
filmed using a digital video camera.
2)Time Code is shot in real time. It is filmed under
one take lasting 93 minutes.
3)Time Code is filmed using four different cameras.
Each camera follows certain characters around Los
Angeles. To show all of the cameras, the screen is
divided into four segments. 
4)Time Code has no script. The actors improvised based
on an outline written by Figgis.
5)Time Code was shot fifteen different times. Figgis
then chose the take he was most pleased with (the
fifteenth).
6)Time Code is synchronized to the second. Since the
four cameras interact with each other (sometimes a
character in the third quadrant calls another via cell
phone in the first quadrant), the timing must be
perfect for the film to make any sense. 
7) Time Code's outline was written on a sheet of music
paper, with four different lines, each line telling
each camera where to go at every moment.
8)Time Code, in order to avoid confusing the audience
contains a soundtrack in which three of the four
segments are muted or at a low volume, while the
fourth is at normal volume. 
Despite the small errors in the film's plot, Time
Code, receives a perfect score for its fabulous acting
and overall creativity. Figgis' picture is certain to
inspire future works and for this reason alone, it is
recommended. It is always great to see big time
directors and actors trying something complete
different from the mainstream, and in the case of Time
Code, it is even better to see them create a memorable
film at the same time. Time Code is a different
experience at the movie theater than most films. It
took a while for me to adjust to its format almost
like it is uncomfortable to sleep in a brand new bed
or live in a new house. However, once I grew more
accustomed to its layout, what seemed impossible to
enjoy (four cameras on one screen; how would I
understand what is going on? How would I be able to
follow everything?) turned out to be a mesmerizing
display. Time Code glued my eyes to the screen in
fascination from the dazzling opening credits to the
equally dazzling closing credits. 
The film is an examination of Los Angeles at its most
chaotic (every once in a while there is a brief
earthquake that simultaneously shakes the four cameras
and the myriad characters). More specifically, Time
Code revolves around a small movie production company
called Red Mullet. At Red Mullet, executives ponder
upcoming movie ideas, beautiful women audition for
film roles, and people gossip among many other things
including sex and murder. With all of this occurring
during a mere hour and a half, one can hardly imagine
how crazy a day in this place must be or even a week.
There are some flaws in the film including
underdeveloped roles or cliched characters, but the
outstanding acting covers the mistakes up very
efficiently. It is important to realize that these
actors were not given complete scripts but just
outlines of who they are supposed to be. Figgis
depended on the actors' charismatic qualities in real
life to fill the roles in the film. All of the actors
bring their talents into the ensemble cast including
Salma Hayek and Jeanne Tripplehorn as a lesbian
couple, Stellan Skarsgard as a sex and drug obsessed
executive, and Saffron Burrows as his troubled wife.
Other supporting actors bring a needed comedic aspect
to the movie including Julian Sands, Allesandro
Nivola, and Steven Weber. 
Time Code's release in the year 2000 is a harbinger
for new technological age in filmmaking.  The use of
digital video is expected to increase dramatically in
future years in households and in movie studios. I
really hope Time Code becomes the next Blair Witch
Project and not just another limited release doomed
for a short life in the movie theaters. This is a film
you have to see on the big screen. 

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Nia Long, Vin Diesel , Nicky Katt, Scott Caan, Jamie
Kennedy, Ron Rifkin, and Ben Affleck.         
While watching Boiler Room, I was constantly reminded of last year's
masterpiece Fight Club. Both films consist of a predominately male cast. Both
films follow young men as they illicitly fight the traditional system for their
own desires. And both films are seen through the eyes of one narrator, who
eventually realizes that these men have to be stopped. While Boiler Room
writer/director Ben Younger does not get his point across as well as David
Fincher does for Fight Club, he does contribute another impressive work to a
series of films aiming to represent the new generation. A generation which has
seen the internet prosper and where everyone wants to be a millionaire. Paying
homage to Oliver Stone's 1987 classic Wall Street, Younger is almost
modernizing the tale by using younger, hipper actors to play the greedy
villains as opposed to the older, more experienced types. As is true in real
life, younger minds are becoming richer and richer from their knowledge of more
standard technology. Boiler Room dismisses the notion of ingenuity and shows
that greed and desire for power come in all ages. 
Another similarity with Fight Club is that both films are not action flicks.
Some people are convinced that an all-male cast automatically means there must
be gory violence, here is proof that this is not true. If you want to see an
action movie starring Ben Affleck, go see Reindeer Games this weekend. If you
want to see a smart, insightful film with excellent acting and a clever script,
see Boiler Room. 
Giovanni Ribisi gives an outstanding performance as the film's narrator, Seth.
After dropping out of college and running a lucrative gambling center for
college students in his apartment, Seth is offered a high paying job by a
wealthy man (Nicky Katt). He agrees to take the job (in which you are
guaranteed to become a millionaire within three years) of selling stock to
well-off Americans from the mid-west over the telephone and begins to fit in
quite well with his co-workers. Learning tricky techniques to deceive innocent
people into buying shares of a good in production, Seth figures this is too
good to be true. After stumbling into a room at the wrong time, he knows there
is something no good about this company. At this point, Seth is left with the
ultimate choice; continue with the American dream and make millions or tell the
authorities that something fishy is going on.
Ribisi is believable as Seth especially when he shares scenes with Ron Rifkin,
playing Seth's dad. The two have perfect chemistry as a troubled father and son
trying to impress each other and simultaneously impress themselves. The
transitions from anger to sympathy that these scenes contain are the standout
segments of the entire film. The supporting cast of greedy co-workers is also
flawless. Ben Affleck shines in a short but sweet performance as a recruiter
for the company, Nicky Katt is fabulous as the ostensibly friendly boss who
eventually becomes extremely jealous of Seth, and Vin Diesel gives his best
performance of his career as the foil character of Nicky Katt. The energy of
the cast as a whole makes Boiler Room well paced and never boring.  
The only major error in the film is that nothing major happens. There is no big
plot twist or climatic point to make the film more memorable. Due to the lack
of a major event, Boiler Room never finds a suitable genre to fit into. The
movie is not intense enough to be a thriller, the romantic segments involving
Seth and Abby (Nia Long) are not properly finalized, and the dialogue isn't
funny enough to make it a comedy. In having trouble to characterize the movie
as a whole, Boiler Room is slightly confused at times. It doesn't seem to know
which category to fit itself into. One satisfying concluding scene could have
changed the whole film for the better. Otherwise, the movie is fun to watch
thanks to its lively cast of young actors. 

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Starring Phillip Baker Hall, Melora Walters, John C. Reilly, Melinda Dillon,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jason Robards, Tom Cruise, Julianne Moore, Jeremy
Blackman, Michael Bowen,  William H. Macy, Ricky Jay, Henry Gibson, Felicity
Huffman, and Luis Guzman.
The film "Magnolia" can be compared to a simple flower as its title and movie
poster suggests. The dozens of characters introduced and developed are like the
petals on the flower. They all come from the same stem and as the flower begins
to develop they grow farther and farther apart. The numerous characters in the
film are all closely connected no matter how different they are from one
another socially. From a humiliated but kind cop to an aging game show host,
each one of these characters is suffering the same kind of pain. They are each
seriously lonely and seek the perfect companion to end this loneliness. Whether
this companion is a distant family member or a spouse, each character begs for
one and spends the whole film searching for the perfect one. 
"Magnolia" is a clever, well thought out film from prodigy director-writer Paul
Thomas Anderson of "Boogie Nights" fame. The detailed character analyses and
the powerful script make "Magnolia" memorable.  However, what really is
impressive is that even though there are tons of characters in several
unrelated stories, the film is never confusing. Anderson's control over
transitioning from one story to another story is masterful. He also knows
exactly when to cut to another subplot since not one of "Magnolia's" scenes
drag on too long. Any three hour film that does not deliver even one
uninteresting scene is definitely worth recommending. From the fascinating
beginning to the risky yet surprisingly satisfying ending the film just doesn't
get boring.  It is obvious that Anderson put a lot of time into connecting each
subplot. This is the ultimate game of six degrees of separation. Every
character is connected to every other character by at the most two degrees. For
example, cop John C. Reilly is connected to game show host Phillip Baker Hall
through Hall's daughter Melora Walters who once went on a date with Reilly. The
fact that each character is so different from the others yet so similar shows
that there are universal pains that all classes, races, and genders suffer.
Anderson's explanation to prove this point is both accurate and convincing. The
only mistake Anderson made in trying to connect his characters was by making
his actors all sing an Aimee Mann song simultaneously. This was foolish not
only because it was unbelievable and hilariously erroneous but also because it
had a Broadway musical feel to it and this movie is about as far apart from
your typical Broadway musical than you can get.
The performances in "Magnolia" are perfection. This is a classic example of
flawless casting and flawless ensemble acting. Anderson allows many of
Hollywood's best supporting actors to blossom at what they do best, character
acting. All of the main characters in each story are perfect because they are
able to reveal more emotions and attitudes in their brief time on the screen
then most movie stars can do in a feature length film. Worth noting is Tom
Cruise, who stepped out of his usual superficial starring role and into a funny
but depressing tour de force performance. He was probably noticed more than the
other actors in the film by award givers because his role here is so much
different and impressive than those in the past (however any actor in this film
could be nominated for best supporting actor without any complaints) The only
problem I had with the acting was that a few of the characters felt seriously
edited down such as Melinda Dillon's character as Phillip Baker Hall's wife.
She seemed to be thrown in towards the end and I felt very little sympathy for
her because I had not seen her enough earlier in the film.
"Magnolia" uses several effective metaphors to describe its characters.
Anderson has the talent to make the audience sympathetic towards numerous
people in only a few hours. To see that Anderson is able to perfectly portray
this many different types of people shows that he has a keen sense of
diversity. Diversity is what makes a director successful for a long period of
time. I predict a lot of diversity and success from Anderson in the future.

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
House on Haunted Hill (1999)
Starring Taye Diggs, Geoffrey Rush, Ali Larter, Famke Janssen, Peter Gallagher,
Bridgette Wilson, Max Perlich, Lisa Loeb, James Marsters, and Chris Kattan.
Directed By William Malone,
Written By Dick Beebe,
"House on Haunted Hill" initializes itself to the audience with a scene
involving zombie-like mental patients attacking and murdering doctors in the
goriest ways possible. One doctor is killed instantly after having a pencil
rammed completely through his neck. A nurse has her head forced into a barrel
of water. These mobs of zombies presented are like those in previous B-horror
flicks, with grunting noises and cadaverous movements. Except this time, at the
end of the millenium, the film is given the power to show exactly how horrific
these creatures can be. In past horror films, the actual murder scenes are left
out or not shown forcing the viewer to assume their own nasty bloody deaths for
the hapless victims. "House on Haunted Hill" doesn't want their audience to
have an imagination, everything is provided for them to watch and squirm, not
think. This nonsense violence thrown out of nowhere is unfortunately the most
refreshing part about this film.
        "House on Haunted Hill", which is based on the 1958 film of the same title,
introduces a handful of characters as quickly as it can, following the opening
blood fest. The film has no intention of providing character development or a
laudable plot. The aim here is to scare the audience with chilling, unexpected
shots of blood, guts, and mayhem. However, the film is neither scary nor
unpredictable. The plot involves five people who are dared to spend the night
in a haunted house for one million dollars by an amusement park owner (Geoffrey
Rush). Each character is a failure in the external world and acknowledges that
they would do anything for that money. Since the characters are immediately
generalized as either greedy or caring, the expectations of who will survive or
not is killed five minutes after you meet them. The problem is that every
character is not likable. The two who come closest to being civilized are a
womanizer (Taye Diggs - who should be doing films a lot better than this with
all of his talent) and a businesswoman who accepts being womanized (Ali
Larter).  The characters presented are so annoying and pathetic, that it is
hard to cheer for them or scream them. The worst character in this film, or
maybe in any film released this year, is Chris Kattan's Watson Pritchett. He
spends the whole film whining about the spooky house in a tone so irritating
and inappropriate, that he unintentionally begins to seem more evil than the
house itself. Waiting for Pritchett to die, was a strenuously difficult act to
sit through. The most humorous actor of the bunch is Geoffrey Rush playing
Steven Price (an homage to Victor Price who starred in the original). Playing
the rich man who supposedly organized the party, he plays the role perfectly in
a twisted way where it is obvious that he is up to something just by the
expressions on his face. However, Rush is pretty much wasted in a confusing
subplot involving a hateful marriage with Evelyn Price , played by Famke
Janssen. 
        The main problem is that "House on Haunted Hill" is not scary. To top off that
huge disappointment, every actor was wasted and the script was completely
ludicrous.  If the annoying characters and hilariously bad dialogue were
intentionally underdeveloped (similar to "Deep Blue Sea"), the goal for
creating a creepy, suspenseful action film was completely missed.

Title
Review for 12 Angry Men (1957)
Twelve Angry Men (1957)
Directed by Sydney Lumey
Written by Reginal Rose
Starring  Martin Balsam, Ed Begley, Ed Binns, Lee J. Cobb, John Fielder, Henry
Fonda, Jack Klugman,  E.G. Marshall,  Joseph Sweeney, George Voscovec, Jack
Warden, Robert Webber
    A flawless masterpiece. "Twelve Angry Men" tells the story of one juror
(Fonda) and his attempt to convince 11 others, that a young man should not be
executed for a crime he might not have committed. The 11 jurors are positive
that the boy is guilty of killing his father from the evidence given during the
trial, but Fonda, in a truly believable and inspirational performance, explains
to the men that there are two sides to every story. This ambiguity creates a
creepy and thought provoking plot. If the jurors decide he's not guilty, they
could have let a cold blooded killer out on the streets of New York again. If
they decide he is guilty, the jurors could ruin an innocent boy's life. Fonda
never says that the boy is not guilty, he just states that there is a
possibility he is not guilty and he reminds the men that there decision can
determine a man's entire future. No matter what the outcome of the verdict is,
the truth is never given to the audience or to the desperate, tired jurors.
       Filmed in one room on a hot day in New York City, "12 Angry Men" begins
with very little information but as the film progresses the superb script
addresses every detail of the trial, each jurors background, and the tensions
and differences
between them. The focus is not on a few characters but rather on all the
characters in the movie. All twelve jurors are examined from every angle
including whether they wear glasses or not or their employment status. The
convicted boy is shown in a silent, poignant shot in which he begs the jurors
not to stereo type him. This innocent face must have provoked Fonda to attempt
to dig deeper into the murder. Even the security guard who guards the room
which holds the jurors is given a purpose. When he gives the twelve angry men
the murder weapon which they requested to inspect, he briefly looks back at the
room and, with his facial expressions, asks what is taking so long and why
haven't you figured out the obvious conclusion that he is guilty. The guard
represents the world outside the court room. He is similar to the 11 other
jurors besides Fonda in that he immediately made his decision based on the
background of the young boy.
"Twelve Angry Men" challenges the way court systems function by raising an
issue of prejudice in which some of the men believe the boy is guilty only
because someone like him had caused grief in their lives or because the
neighborhood he was brought up in must have influenced him into becoming a cold
blooded killer. What is frightening about 12 Angry Men is that the men,
nameless and only
referred to as juror # _, could easily represent any person in our
society including ourselves, even if they are all white males. 

Title
Review for Violon rouge, Le (1998)
Written by Francois Girard and Don McKellar.
Starring Carlo Cecchi, Irene Grazioli, Christoph Koncz, Jean-Luc Bideau, Jason
Flemyng, Greta Scacchi, Sylvia Chang, Liu Zifeng, Don McKellar, Colm Feore, and
Samuel L. Jackson.
The titular violin is more than just an instrument. Any object that survives
for centuries and plays an integral role in the lives of numerous people from
numerous cultures is something more than just a piece of wood and some strings.
In The Red Violin, the violin is a manipulative device which society revolves
around. The beautiful violin, as it passes into the hands of several different
kinds of humans, is coveted, cherished, envied, and rivaled to a point where it
controls the emotions and actions of the individuals around it. There is
something uniquely vivacious in such an inanimate object. 
The Red Violin is not only a film which celebrates the power of music in past
and present society, but it also, using the violin as a central focus, examines
cultures from around the world, just how different and similar they are. The
similarity is that music is an influential factor of their lives, however the
motive of why it is so influential differentiates the cultures. Some people
desire the violin because they desire money, fame, and ultimate power. Others
lust for the violin because it is a way of expressing their true self. A way to
speak out to others that is not possible with the use of words or gestures. The
violin, which enters the lives of the supporting characters, is almost like a
genie in a lamp. Inside it contains the answers to all of their problems.
However, when these victims get their hands on something so potent the outcome
is either total greed or grief. 
This Canadian film, from co-writer/director Francois Girard, parallels the
creation of the violin in Italy to its highly anticipated auction in Montreal,
Quebec. At first, we know there is something special about the violin. Created
by a skilled Italian merchant in the 1600's, the instrument is originally made
for his newborn son. However, when his wife and child die during the delivery,
the merchant finds the most obscure way of putting his late family into his
work. In Quebec, during present time, many different nationalities including
the Chinese, Italian, French, and English are bidding top dollars for the
merchant's work. From these two scenes, we know the violin has traveled a long
way before it has reached the auction. The Red Violin tells of its journey. 
The film is split into five sections, each in a different language because the
settings are in different countries. This type of universal style reminded me
of Jim Jarmusch's creative Night on Earth, which follows the lives of taxi
drivers in different countries. Unfortunately like Night on Earth, The Red
Violin contains some memorable segments and some awful segments.  The parts
with the more famous actors, Greta Scacchi and Samuel L. Jackson were both dull
and banal especially in comparison to the remaining segments, such as the
Austrian boy pressured into performing well and the Chinese Communist woman who
secretly adored Western music. 
The Red Violin frequently displays the violin staring back at you with a
particularly creepy appearance. The violin, which gradually gets more fragile
as it travels through time, stands out from others of the same structure for
some inexplicable reason, maybe because we know of it's energetic past or of
its odd Frankenstein-like creation. For some mysterious reason, it is
frightening to watch. 

Title
Review for Army of Darkness (1993)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Army of Darkness" (1993) **1/2 (out of four)
Starring Bruce Campbell, Embeth Davidtz, Ian
Abercrombie, Marcus Gilbert, Richard Grove, and
Bridget Fonda. 
Army of Darkness, the third film in the Evil Dead
trilogy, is as close as you'll get to seeing a comic
book transformed into a movie. Full of cheesy one
liners you'd normally hear Superman declare, the
script is extremely terse and unspecific compared to
others of the same genre (The story Teenage Mutant
Ninja Turtles 2: The Secret of the Ooze presented
feels like James Joyce's Ulysses compared to this
one). The acting is horrendously bad, even for an Evil
Dead film. Bruce Campbell, as the "everyday joe"
turned macho superhero, looks like he's reading off
cue cards while "damsel-in-distress" Embeth Davidtz is
given a few lines and still seems to screw it up. 
So why didn't this movie get zero stars? Because
director Sam Raimi is making a bad movie on purpose!
He wants his audience to recognize how stupid the
script is and how bad the acting is, then he wants his
audience to laugh their brains off. To some extent,
Raimi succeeds. I laughed hard at some scenes; they
were just so asinine, you really can't help but laugh.
However, having seen Evil Dead II just a few days
before, the third installment wasn't nearly as
impressive as its immediate predecessor. I'll invent a
term to better explain my dissatisfaction with Army of
Darkness: Austin Powers Syndrome, or APS. Movies with
APS at first seem very funny. Though, as the film
progresses, an uncontrollable feeling of familiarity
begins to emerge in the back of your brain. It takes a
few minutes, but once you realize it, your enjoyment
for the movie is no longer there. The jokes are
exactly the same as the last film in the series, only
slightly modified. Not modified enough to hide the
fact that nearly everything in the movie you're
watching has been recycled by another movie you
cherished. It's a terrible feeling. I got this feeling
watching Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me and I
recently during Army of Darkness. 
Raimi attempted a very difficult task and ultimately
failed: He tried to satire the same subject using the
same characters and the same story twice. The slight
modification is, instead of alone in a cabin in the
middle of the woods, our hero Ash (Campbell) is
fighting evil ghosts and monsters during 1300 A.D.
with a large army of soldiers. As continued from the
point where Evil Dead II left off (although some
scenes from the end of Evil Dead II are oddly left out
of the beginning of Army of Darkness), Ash is sucked
into the past along with all of the evils that
terrorized him in the present. Conveniently, he finds
himself in the middle of King Arthur's castle (the
only hip place to be during 1300 A.D. according to the
movies). Arthur promises to send Ash back to the
present as long as he recovers the infamous book of
the dead from the woods, an environment inhabited by
dangerous spirits. 
The sense of familiarity begins to come out when Ash
finds himself in a cabin preparing to find the book.
He is first humorously attacked by miniature Ash's,
then by another, larger monster that could pass as his
evil twin. As all of these events, no matter how wacky
or unique they sound, are almost exactly staged and
presented like in Evil Dead II when Ash was being
attacked by his own right hand. I would have enjoyed
Army of Darkness a lot more if I had not seen Evil
Dead II. 
It is fitting that Army of Darkness is not titled Evil
Dead III, because, overall, it is very different from
its two prequels. The budget is more than the first
two films combined, the number of actors is more than
the first two films combined, and the movie lacks the
horror element that the others shared and cleverly
ridiculed. As a guilty pleasure, Army of Darkness is
great to watch with a group of friends. Everyone
involved in the film knew they were making a bad movie
and they had a lot of fun doing it. As it turns out,
they made one of the best B-movies of the 1990's. But
the ASP sticks onto the movie very early on and not
once does it show signs of letting go.  

Title
Review for Hamlet (2000/I)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Ethan Hawke, Julia Stiles, Bill Murray, Sam
Shephard, Kyle MacLachlan, Diane Venora, Liev
Schreiber, Steve Zahn, and Dechen Thurman. 
There have been countless remakes of William
Shakespeare's most celebrated drama Hamlet. Everyone
from Laurence Olivier to Mel Gibson has stepped into
the shoes of the titular character with a fair amount
of success. Now indie writer/director Michael
Almereyda (Another Girl, Another Planet), with an all
star cast, has tried something a little bit different
with the bard's masterpiece. The ultimate question
facing Almereyda is whether this difference can
attract the same viewers who have seen the play filmed
to death. Is this play the thing? In many ways, yes.
The unique visual flare of the director and the
ability of making the story work in a time period it
doesn't belong are both reasons to see and enjoy this
film. However, many walls stand in the way of
perfection. 
Meet the new Hamlet; a New Yorker, a loner, a hip
stylish artist in his twenties who has lived to see
the dropping ball introduce the year 2000. He has a
cell phone, a video camera, and a Blockbuster card and
he also has a lot on his mind. His father, the "king"
of the Denmark Corporation, died and his mother,
following the funeral, immediately married his uncle.
All of this seems fine until the ghost of Hamlet's
father visits him in his apartment and tells him that
something evil is going on. Poor, confused Hamlet now
doesn't know if he's just imagining the ghost, or if
his father was actually betrayed by his own greedy
brother. 
Although not as witty or impressive as Baz Luhrmann's
similarly contemporary Romeo + Juliet, this remake
stands out for its overall cleverness in presentation.
Very dramatic with periods of laugh out loud humor,
Almereyda creates new meanings to words written
centuries ago. Some of the scenes will have you
wondering how the heck anyone could have thought of
something this original. Instead of a theatrical play
to determine whether Claudius is guilty or not, Hamlet
creates a short film entitled Mouse Trap with blatant
images of death, greed, and corruption. The short is
memorably funny and makes the film Hamlet much more
interesting. There are plenty of satisfying scenes
like this which liven up the movie but at some points,
it feels like Almereyda takes the easy way out. He
leaves out scenes (possibly because they are too
difficult to complete?) and he leaves out characters
(two talented actors - Jeffrey Wright and Casey
Affleck are in the movie for seconds as the
gravedigger and Fortinbras, a case of too much
editing). But there is more to like than to hate while
watching this movie and I guess that's a good thing.  
My major complaint is with Almereyda's obsessive use
of product placement. Sure, using real companies is
another clever way of reminding the audience that this
Hamlet is living in the same world as you are, but
eventually it becomes very distracting. For example,
Hamlet delivers the famous "To be or not to be" speech
inside a Blockbuster Video store. The speech is
extremely important in understanding exactly how
Hamlet is responding to the visits of the ghost or his
troubles with girlfriend Ophelia, but the whole time I
found myself uncontrollably spotting familiar video
boxes in the background or watching the television
behind Hamlet's head display previews of upcoming
releases. Not once did I look at Hawke and very few
times did I hear what he was saying. This happens
several times during the movie; by the end I really
wanted to rent a video, drink some Pepsi, shop at Key
Food, and call Movie-Fone.  If this adaptation is
paying tribute to Shakespeare's brilliant writing
skills by updating it, then why are there so many
visual distractions that detract the audience's
attention from the script? The visuals are stunning
and creative but the text is what has made Hamlet so
respected - what has inspired this film to be made in
the first place. 
The cast left me with several mixed impressions.
Despite hearing that Hawke was a disappointment as
Hamlet, I found him to be very effective and
convincing. You could feel his pain each time he is
betrayed (which is about a billion times) and it is
very clear that as the film progresses, his character
becomes more and more doomed for tragedy. Julia
Stiles, as Hamlet's illicit lover Ophelia, is not as
successful in her performance. It seemed like her part
was much less important than in other versions, maybe
because Almereyda cut some scenes or because she put
very little life into her role. Either way, I felt
very little sympathy for her. Bill Murray is also a
bit of a disappointment. It felt like he was reading
off cue cards - he would pause after every sentence
and look off over the shoulder of his counterpart like
someone was feeding him words. The rest of the cast
positively contributed to the film: Sam Shephard was
brilliant as the ghost, Diane Venora and Kyle
MacLachlan ideal as the mischievous relatives Gertrude
and Claudius, and Liev Schreiber right on target
playing the vengeful Laertes. You have to give credit
to these actors no matter how they faired, these roles
were very difficult to master. Mixing old lingo with a
contemporary background is tough to do.
The most recent Hamlet to add to the voluminous
collection of Hamlet's is a near-hit. At some points
you will be shocked with entertainment and other
points frozen in boredom. Check it out for some decent
experimental filming and laugh at Bill Murray doing
Shakespeare. 

Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
Liberty Heights (1999)
Directed by Bartry Levinson
Written by Barry Levinson
Starring Adrien Brody, Joe Mantegna, Ben Foster, Bebe Neuwirth
Barry Levinson can safely be called "the master of Baltimore cinema". He has
done exceptional work in the past focusing on this city, from "Tin Men" to
"Avalon" to "Diner". And he has also been able to bring this sixth sense to the
small screen with the mesmerizing "Homicide: Life on the Streets". It's no
wonder Levinson has written and directed yet another film to his recognized
collection. 
"Liberty Heights" follows two generations of an average Jewish family living in
Liberty Heights, Baltimore in the 1950's. The family faces racism and rejection
at the local swimming pool, in the court house, and by the police. The
nostalgia presented is a terrifying look at how are society was function less
than half a century ago. The film contains some hilarious and some heart
wrenching scenes but over length seriously hurts the mood and nothing big
happens to keep the audience truly entertained and attentive. It plays like an
episode of a dramedy television show-however it is like the episode before the
finale, where everything is built up very specifically but nothing huge comes
out of it because it will be shown in the finale next week. However, this is a
movie. There are no episodes and therefore the plot must not only be developed
but something must come out of this development. In "Liberty Heights" there is
no distinct climax.  
The film is broken up into three sections, following three members of the
family. The father, Nate, (Joe Mantegna) runs a strip joint which is not
drawing profits from its desired range of customers. In order to change the
gloomy future of his failing business, Nate decides to add gambling for his
customers to enjoy. This plan, however, backfires when an unemployed man wins
five hundred thousand dollars and Nate is unable to pay. This section of the
movie was the least developed and seemed out of place from the other teen
romance subplots. If Levinson was trying to make the film about the Jewish
family as a whole, then why did he leave out a section focusing on the mother
(Bebe Neuwirth) and her interaction with society? Instead Neuwirth is an
automaton who's only purpose in the film is to comfort or scold the male family
members when they are misbehaving or troubled. 
The oldest son, played by Adrien Brody, is seriously in love with a girl he is
not supposed to go near. After he and his friends sneak into a non-Jewish
party, Brody is swept away by a mysterious girl who he soon after cannot stop
thinking of. This story, at first starts out very vibrant and vivacious, but as
it drags on there are no surprises to maintain interest. Brody is excellent in
another wonderful performance, but the supporting cast is very cliched and
dull. 
Ben Foster plays the youngest son fittingly named Ben. This is the most
interesting of the three stories because it is funny, tragic, and romantic
without one of these elements dominating the others. Ben is a curious boy who
wonders what the world is like outside of the Jewish community. This curiosity
leads to a forbidden friendship with an African American girl played superbly
by Rebekah Johnson. Together they learn more about each other and about
themselves. Racism plays an important role in this subplot as the characters
must fight against it in order to remain bonded. A powerful message is given by
Levinson stating that the youngest generation is the most open- minded and the
most mature. One obvious problem is that Levinson, out of nowhere, adds a
completely unnecessary scene containing, you guessed it, bodily fluids. Is this
a requirement now for films in the 90's? You know there is a serious problem
when a film trying to explain the seriousness of discrimination adds a scene
which can be directly compared to a scene in "There's Something About Mary."
Levinson's most recent film contains many superb performances and an important
story line which educates the audience. There were just too many scenes with no
importance and too many characters with no importance. If Levinson had cut some
of these scenes and characters out and had focused more on creating a better
ending, then  "Liberty Heights" would have been an interesting, entertaining,
educating movie.

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
By Lars Lindahl, High School Student
Š 1999 Lars Lindahl
"End of Days" (1999)
Directed by Peter Hyams
Written by Andrew Marlowe
Starring Arnold Scwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Kevin Pollak, Robin Tunney, Rod
Steiger, Miriam Margoyles, CCH Powder, Udo Kier
Well Arnold has completed the seemingly impossible task. He has made three
consecutive unsatisfactory action films. In a domain that he owns, it is very
surprising that this Goliath of an action star can not tell a good action
script from a bad one. Eraser, back in 1996, was a confused film that made no
attempt at all to make sense. Batman and Robin, in 1997, was the black sheep of
the Batman series with ridiculous acting, idiotic action scenes, and painfully
flashy costumes. Now in 1999, "End of Days" (not "The End of Days") is the
third strike in a tough at bat for Arnold. Is this the end of a powerful action
star's long-lived career? Will Arnold ever give us another unforgettable
performance in another unforgettable classic like those in the past
("Terminator", "Terminator 2: Judgement Day", "Predator")? Or an unforgettable
performance in a great guilty pleasure like those in the past ("Commando", "Red
Sonja", "True Lies")? It doesn't look that way. 
"End of Days" begins with the birth of a baby girl in 1979 who inexorably, due
to the formation of the stars on that night, will be the carrier of Satan's
baby the hour before New Year's of 2000. Fortunately for the movie's sake, the
girl grows up and now resides in Manhattan with skyscrapers, subway trains in
dark tunnels, and a myriad of inept NYPD officers. It's an action film's dream
come true when the director is given tons of cool stuff to blow up. Imagine if
the girl had lived in Anytown, USA, where the only thing to destroy is a Dairy
Queen and a post office. Arnold Schwarzenegger (Jericho Cane), in a series of
boring events finds himself in the middle of a religious battle between the
church, who is trying to hide the girl (or in some cases trying to kill her),
and Satan (Gabriel Byrne) who is trying to make her pregnant. If the Devil is
successful, the world will no longer exist as we know it. Jericho feels it is
his duty to protect the girl from everyone because 1) he once had faith but no
longer does and 2) his wife and daughter were killed and he feels responsible
for it.
Jericho Cane is your cliched, by-the-numbers hero right up to his name. Arnold
fittingly plays the character as cliched as he can. He shouts at everyone, from
cops to priests, to the Devil. In one truly hilarious scene, which was supposed
to be the ultimate dramatic high point, Jericho screams to the Devil; "You are
a @#$^%!& choir boy! You are a choir boy!" Those two lines marked the high
points of this film. 
A movie can still be enjoyable when the supporting cast is more effective than
the main actor. "End of Days" fails to contain any memorable performances with
the exception of Gabriel Byrne. Byrne, playing a man who has been made the
manifestation of the Devil, seems to be the only one who is having fun in this
whole movie. He wonderfully plays a manipulative villain with the power to
control everyone at any time. The annoying thing about his character, however,
is that he has the power to kill any human with a simple punch in the face, yet
he finds it impossible to seriously hurt Jericho. I can not count the number of
times he could have killed Jericho and taken the girl from his custody. The
other actors in the film give very weak and unconvincing performances. Kevin
Pollak, who plays the partner and close friend of Jericho, is the supposedly
funny character in the film (every action movie has one). The one problem is
that Pollak does not deliver one funny line. Robin Tunney plays the chosen
mother of Satan's baby with extreme annoyance. She gets no sympathy from any of
the characters in the film, except Arnold who pretends she is his wife and
daughter, or any of the viewers in the audience. In one unnecessary scene,
Tunney walks out of her room and takes her top off. Is this her job in the
film?
The actors are not to blame entirely because the script is terrible. You can
tell a script is terrible when you are able to predict what will happen minutes
before it does. This little prediction game is a very fun exception to trying
to sit through this nonsense of a movie. In a last attempt to make this movie
good, special effects are used to try to entertain the audience. But without a
memorable action scene in the whole film, the director has not done his job
successfully. This film would have gotten a C+ if Arnold stood in front of a
camera and shouted "You are a !$@^@*^ choir boy!!" for two hours. 

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
Starring Ben Stiller, William H. Macy, Hank Azaria, Paul Reubens, Jeneane
Garafolo Greg Kinnear, Geoffrey Rush, Claire Forlani, Kel Mitchell, Wes Studi,
Pras, Eddie Izzard, Tom Waits, Artie Lange, Lena Olin
It should have been a classic. A great cast of respected supporting actors. An
interesting premise of loser comic book characters. However, "Mystery Men"
proved to be one of the great disappointments of 1999. The jokes were bland and
hackneyed from talents who have previously made audiences laugh with their
unique rituals. The number of cliches and shallow characters made the film
difficult to sit through seriously hurting its attempt of having a fast paced
premise. The script tried to deliver a series of small jokes throughout the
film but without a big laugh-out-loud joke and mediocre small jokes, it failed
miserably at being entertaining at all. The jokes were not funny for a number
of reasons. They had been used a number of times before in previous films, the
best ones, which were mediocre to begin with, were ruined in the trailer, and
the expectation of laughing at clever, unique gags from clever unique comedians
when there were none to laugh at greatly damaged the film. "Mystery Men" might
have worked if it was an ensemble cast of newcomers trying to break into the
business. But with veterans doing this kind of junk, it really questioned
whether their other work was as funny as originally thought. Thankfully most
actors in this movie will appear in five other movies before the new year
arrives to help viewers forget this little movie. 
The film follows a band of wannabe superheroes living in a wannabe Gotham City
who are ridiculed by their fellow citizens and villains because of their
clumsiness and failure to save they day and capture the bad guy. The fact is
these pathetic losers are not needed because their city already has a
successful superhero, Captain Amazing, who has recently captured every
evil-doer in the city. Captain Amazing (played terribly by an uninspired Greg
Kinnear), because of his success in the past, is worried that he will lose
popularity. After freeing one of the most notorious bad guys in the city
(Geoffrey Rush, overacting just a bit too much) to keep himself busy, things
get out of hand when Captain Amazing is captured. It is up to the wannabe
superheroes to save the day. By the time this section of the plot is finished,
the interest for what happens (if you haven't already figured it out) is very
low. There are very few scenes which catch the viewers complete attention. The
first scene in the film, which shows the wannabes trying to save the day, feels
like it was seriously edited down. Right when it was beginning to become
slightly funny seeing these actors get humiliated at an old folk's home by some
masked goons, Captain Amazing comes in and saves the dayor ruins the movie.
Instead of editing this scene, more editing should have been done in areas such
as the unnecessary romance between Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller) and Monica, a
waitress(Claire Forlani) or the vast majority of the film, which is the heroes
talking at a coffee table about how their day was. A simple rule: More silly
action is needed in order to make a silly action movie work. 
Another major problem with "Mystery Men" is that every actor in it seemed very
uncomfortable and consequently gave terrible performances. The film depended on
its cast to work fluently together, like a bunch of old friends working
together in an amiable reunion. However, most characters seemed like they did
not even want to be in this film or at least the script made it seem this way.
To pull one of the actors in this film randomly out of a hat, Paul Reubens, who
disappeared from acting to everyone's joy, returns here leaving very little to
be impressed about. As a wannabe who uses flatulence for a weapon, all of his
jokes must therefore be fart jokes. Fart jokes that have all been heard before
and will inevitably be heard again in future films thanks to the success of
"American Pie" and "There's Something About Mary." 
"Mystery Men" drags on towards the end to a point where anything else in the
world is more entertaining. Anyone with a brain knows each one of the heroes is
going to be successful at their talent in the end and each one is going to
contribute in a helpful way. So why continue to watch? This film is far from a
worthy guilty pleasure. "Mystery Men" indeed does this and every time a
character succeeds another one congratulates him and says "I knew you could do
it!" "Mystery Men" fails in every category it attempts to pass. What makes this
film so bad is that it had the potential to be wonderful and unforgettable.
Terrible acting, terrible script, and a terrible waste of time changes opinions
about all of these actors. "I'm unpredictable!" an overexcited Ben Stiller
shouts out. No Ben, you're the complete opposite.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Starring Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Kerr Smith, Kristen Cloke, Seann William
Scott, and Tony Todd. 
Directed by James Wong
Written by Glen Morgan, Jeffrey Reddick, and James Wong        
Even if I did not know that director and co-writers James Wong and Jeffrey
Reddick of the creepy Final Destination helped create the hit television show
The X-Files, I would have inevitably made a connection. The similarities are
very apparent from the inexplicable phenomenon- like plot, to the mysterious
characters, to the overall dark, ominous settings. It would have been perfectly
fitting to see FBI Agents Mulder and Scully investigate this case, they witness
stuff like this on a weekly basis (in fact Mulder and Scully would have been a
much more welcome change to the bland one dimensional FBI agents seen in this
movie). Another more important similarity, is that both succeed in entertaining
and thrilling at the same time. This is a great accomplishment for a teen
horror movie, especially when compared to some of the trash, of the same genre,
released in the last couple of years (Urban Legend and I Still Know What You
Did Last Summer are classic examples from the bunch). 
What helps Final Destination is its unique premise. Unlike your average horror
flick in which some invincible psycho with a knife chases blonde cheerleaders,
the villain presented is unusual, it's the Grim Reaper. This being already has
predestined when and how you will die. According to the brief history lesson
given in this film, everyone was meant to die at a certain time, some people at
100, others at 17, whatever Death chooses. What is unique about Death is that
it's already dead, so you can't really kill it. The only way to defeat Death is
to cheat it; the question is how do you do that? This dilemma is what faces
Alex and a group of teenagers. Alex has been having some dreams that the
airplane which will take his class on a trip to Paris will crash, leaving no
survivors. Alex begins to realize that his dreams are a little too real and
eventually gets himself and six others kicked off the plane right before it
takes off. Shortly after, the plane does indeed crash leaving some of the seven
survivors confused and others feeling immortal. However, Death isn't through
with them yet. It gradually kills off the seven one by one, leaving those
currently still alive frantically trying to trick Death again.
The plot allows for some of the most creative, original death scenes I have
seen in a while.  Some scenes build up the perfect amount of tension until an
elaborate climax, others are so unexpected they will leave your jaw wide open
in shock. Creativity and originality are two adjectives lacking in most horror
films nowadays but Final Destination is not like most horror films. Sure, it
has your traditional share of jerks and outsiders (Ali Larter's character is
particularly annoying), but the shocks, from the beginning to the end, are
extremely entertaining. Also director Wong has the sense not to take the movie
too seriously. He knows its just another entertaining guilty pleasure that
won't win any Academy Awards (not even a Golden Globe). The myriad of inside
jokes and gags (the characters are named after famous horror directors, one
character who plays a jerk is named Carter, like X-Files creator Chris Carter,
and a song by John Denver, who died in a plane crash, plays whenever Death is
near) show this movie is a bunch of guys having a good time making a movie. And
from this, I had a great time watching the movie.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Me, Myself and Irene" (2000) Grade: B-
Did you guffaw watching Edward Norton give his own
face a black eye in Fight Club, or better yet, Jim
Carrey "kick his own a-" in Liar, Liar? If so, Me,
Myself, And Irene may be just the cup of tea you've
been looking for. See Carrey punch himself. See Carrey
kick himself. See Carrey throw himself out of a moving
car. And that's only a small segment of the latest
Farrelly Farce. Enough gags for five movies, Irene,
like all of the Farrelly Brothers films, should be
great fun if you leave your respectability at the
front entrance. 
Jim Carrey takes a break from Oscar quest and returns
to the roots that made him larger than life. He plays
Charlie, a kind, passive wimp that's suffered from a
lot of stress over the past couple of decades. His
beautiful wife fell in love with another man, leaving
him all alone to take care of their three African
American children (see movie for an explanation).
Instead of getting angry or taking revenge, Charlie
just lets it be. As a member of the Rhode Island
police department, Charlie is picked on and bossed
around by everyone in the community, young and old.
Once again, Charlie lets it be. Until one day, Hank
enters the scene. 
Hank is the other half of Charlie's split personality;
he's the one trapped inside the body unable to come
out for a little payback. But when Hank finally busts
loose, revenge has never been funnier. Soon the two
personalities are fighting over the same girl, Irene
(Renee Zelwegger), an innocent golf course supervisor
all of the stereotypical baddies are after. 
Me, Myself, and Irene starts off with some huge laughs
and doesn't let up until half way through.
Unfortunately, the second half loses so much energy
that compared to the first half it will be hard to sit
through. Sure there are some clever quips here and
there but it is nothing like the rapid fire of jokes
thrown at you during the first forty five minutes. The
film just takes a wrong turn towards conventionality,
and from the Farrelly Brothers past work, this is
unexpected.
Carrey gives a wonderful performance; both physically
and verbally. As Charlie, he is hysterical because he
is so pathetic; a bumbling oaf of a protagonist who
couldn't be more of antihero. As Hank, the character
is to Rhode Island what Shaft is to New York. He's got
an exaggerated "cool guy" voice, a bible full of one
liners and he takes the law into his own hands. But
poor Hank is stuck in a puny body; with a figure like
this - how is he supposed to win any bar fights?
The rest of the cast does a nice job settling for
second place to Carrey's dominance. Like There's
Something About Mary, Kingpin and Dumb and Dumber, odd
supporting characters are inevitable. Charlie's
triplets are very funny as geniuses who are heavily
influenced by the vocabulary of foul mouth comics such
as Richard Pryor or Chris Rock. And there are others 
(humans and animals) who should remain nameless to
heighten your enjoyment. Zelwegger is satisfying
enough as the girl Charlie/Hank go gaga over. She is
never given a chance to deliver any funny lines but
she sets up Carrey for quite a few and I suppose that
is her purpose in the film. 
This is Carrey's show though and he knows how to
control a movie like the best of them: 
Who's the cop that will cop out when there's danger
all about? Hank! Can you dig it?

Title
Review for Evil Dead II (1987)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Evil Dead II" (1987) ***1/2 (out of four)
Starring Bruce Campbell, Sarah Berry, Dan Hicks,
Kassie DePaiva, and Denise Bixler
Is Evil Dead II a bad movie? It's full of terrible
acting, pointless violence, and plot holes yet it
remains a cult classic nearly fifteen years after its
release. Explaining why this movie stands out from
others with similar plots (including the original Evil
Dead) is extremely difficult.
`Five people stranded in a log cabin in the middle of
nowhere struggling to survive vicious attacks from 
a variety of ugly, hairy, wart covered monsters.'
`Come on I saw a movie just like that on Monster
Vision last week. Why should I see it again?'
`No Evil Dead II is different, it's funny.'
Maybe I am and maybe director Sam Raimi is as well to
create such an enigma of a movie. His unique execution
is as sarcastic as subtle, as disturbing as it is
hilarious. An example of Raimi's odd approach: a
monster (formerly protagonist Ash's girlfriend of all
people) is cut in half by a chainsaw and a tidal wave
of blood comes from the open wound. Sure it's
over-the-top, but it is so over-the-top that it is
laugh out loud funny; just try watching Ash with a
straight face as he unexpectedly is showered with ten
gallons of blood, staining his face and knocking him
back a few feet. The whole movie is like this, watch
Ash get beat up, watch Ash defeat the monster, watch
Ash get beat up again by another even zanier monster.
The more repetitive and unrealistic the movie gets,
the more amusing it becomes. No matter how sick it may
sound, it is funny to watch Bruce ampbell's Ash get
his butt kicked every five minutes.
And Raimi takes advantage, he has Ash tormented by the
head of his girlfriend, by the body of 
an old lady, even by his own right hand. Like the less
superior Idle Hands, we watch Ash uncontrollably hit
himself over and over again until he is forced to cut
off his own body part. But it doesn't end, Ash now has
to fight his severed hand which now moves with the
same celerity as Thing from The Addams Family. All of
these events, thrown at you from minute one with
roller coaster- like camera movements, at first become
shocking, then inexplicably funny. Raimi expects the
audience to laugh and as the film progresses, he seems
to be enjoying himself even more by borrowing the
classic mirror scene from the Marx Brothers' Duck
Soup, then bringing more characters into the picture
to comically kill them off. With a running time of
less than an hour and a half, Raimi gets away with the
impossible, making a horror film with more gore than
plot and intentionally more laughs than scares. Ending
Evil Dead II with an opening for the third film in the
series, Raimi obviously had a lot of fun making this
movie and couldn't wait to make it's sequel.


Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Starring the voices of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Wayne Knight, Joan Cusack, Kelsey
Grammer, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, Jim Varney, Don Rickles, Annie
Potts, Laurie Metcalf, John Morris and R Lee Ermey,
Prior to the showing of "Toy Story 2", a Pixar short from 1986 appears on the
big screen as an extra for coming to the theater. It is a very simple, basic
clip of two lamps playing with, and eventually popping, a plastic ball. The
short displays the origins of this outstanding computer generated genre and it
shows, after viewing "Toy Story 2", how far Pixar has progressed nearly 15
years later. The short is very satisfying even though it is a very ordinary
premise and because it was made the way it was made, it gives the feeling that
it was an experiment for something big in the future; A test to see if this
kind of animation is possible and is lasting. The viewing of the latest Pixar
flick proves that it is certainly lasting and, with the film's outstanding box
office success, it is certainly dominating.
"Toy Story 2" is a visual masterpiece. Every scene is wonderfully detailed from
a young boy's room, to an airport, to a vast toy store. The remarkable
detailing makes the film fun to watch and it gives the overwhelmingly
satisfying feeling that you must explore every image to really appreciate how
much hard work was put into it. What makes this sequel even more outstanding of
an accomplishment is that it remains as enjoyable as the original even though
the basic plot outline is exactly identical. Both films follow one character as
they struggle to identify who they are and where they belong. Also both films
follow a group of toys trying to rescue this troubled character from danger.
The overall message from this incredible series is that friendship lasts
forever, no matter how badly it is endangered. "Toy Story 2" starts out very
fast and from this point keeps you interested and vigilant. The opening scene
gives the adventures of Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) when he must face off, in a
pretend video game, against the evil Zurg, his arch nemesis. The action
presented here is very similar to the classic beginnings of "Raiders of the
Lost Arc" and, even more recently, "The Matrix" which leave a lasting
impression on the viewer throughout the whole movie. The opening scene of "Toy
Story 2" is definitely pleasing but it does not leave a lasting impression
because the action never stops after the video game. Immediately after, there
are a number of toys searching for Woody's (Tom Hanks) cowboy hat in a very
upbeat mood. The action never dies down, it just keeps coming at you from all
different directions. The animation helps this interminable action because it
creates a limitless atmosphere where anything can happen. 
"Toy Story 2" tells one story in the wild adventures of being a toy. Woody,
Andy's favorite toy, is stolen by a greedy toy store owner (Wayne Knight)
because Woody is supposedly a valuable antique during the pre-Sputnik days. It
is up to Buzz Lightyear and company to try to help Woody return safely home.
Every actor providing their unique voices in "Toy Story 2" seem to be having
fun. This is a good thing because "Toy Story 2" is trying to be a fun movie and
only a fun movie. Every character from the original reprises their role here
with the same playful animosity as before. The new characters added, such as
Jessie the cowgirl (Joan Cusack) and The Prospector (Kelsey Grammar) from
Woody's past, fit right in with the original cast. The most notable newcomers,
however, are two "Seinfeld" veterans, Estelle Harris and Wayne Knight. Both
fantastically bring their loud obnoxious characteristics into their
intentionally obnoxious roles. 
The only dull moment in "Toy Story 2" is an unnecessary musical number about
Jessie's past. It just seemed out of place from the quickly paced format of the
rest of the movie. However, this song was only a couple minutes long so it did
not hold the film back for too long. Another small irritation was the title of
the film. "Toy Story 2" is the easy way out of titling a sequel. I find it hard
to believe these imaginative geniuses could not think of a replacement title.
These are small complaints against a big movie. "Toy Story 2" is a great amount
of fun for all ages. Multiple viewings do not hurt the enjoyment of this movie
because you will discover new tributes to other movies such as "Star Wars",
"Jurassic Park", and the other Disney/Pixar film "A Bug's Life". This one
should not be missed. 

Title
Review for Rebel Without a Cause (1955)
Starring James Dean, Natalie Wood, Sal Mineo, Jim Backus, Ann Doran, Corey
Allen, William Hopper, and Dennis Hopper.
"Rebel Without a Cause" is such an important film in American history because
it is a true analysis of youth in America that everyone of all ages can relate
to. Everyone feels that they are different in some way, that they don't belong
in some places and "Rebel Without a Cause" successfully shows on screen these
universal emotions. No matter what generation you belong to, these feelings are
present. This is why James Dean is admired by America, because in this film he
represents us all and his actions are actions that we would also execute. In
our minds, we just try to do the right thing just like Dean's Jim Stark does.
Not only does "Rebel Without a Cause" display these universal emotions for all
to relate to but it also shows that America has suffered a uniqe pattern in its
social structure. Each generation looks at its past generation without a strong
connection. This is because times change and in response people change. No
matter how popular you were once, as your generation grows older, newer breeds
look at you in a different light. This is why Stark and his friends never could
form a strong relationship with their parents. Even if their parents insisted
that they were also rebellious and troublesome in the past, the teens could not
believe this. In one humorous scene, Stark, his girlfriend Judy (Natalie Wood),
and his pal Plato (Sal Mineo) pretend they are adults. They use upper class
British accents and in their conversations they make it out to appear that kids
are no good and should be ignored. This scene shows that what was once cool in
a past generation is the complete opposite in another. Speaking on behalf of my
generation, I feel that Dean has lost a lot of his coolness from our
perspective as the years have grown by.  The only ones who seem to still
lionize him are those members of his generation.Same goes for Brando, Redford,
even Deniro. I can only imagine how vaguely Matt Damon, Ben Affleck, and Brad
Pitt will be viewed at the mid point of the twenty first century. Will Dean
even be remembered when these newcomers are forgotten?
Any film that sparks this kind of thought is certainly a milestone in American
film. Even if "Rebel Without a Cause" has some ridiculous scenes (the game of
chicken - did people really act this way?), an unbelievable conclusion (how did
everyone end up at the abandoned mansion at the end?), and a silly romance
(Wood declares her love for Dean after talking to him for a couple hours) it
still is a fabulous film. The acting is so believable that it is no wonder that
Dean was considered the epitome of cool. Now, however, the coolness is
fading...
visit new website - Lars Attacks
 http://www.angelfire.com/ny3/larsattacks

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
Starring Woody Harrelson, Antonio Banderas, Lolita Davidovich, Tom Sizemore,
Robert Wagner,Lucy Liu, Kevin Costner, James Woods, George Foreman, Rod
Stewart, and Mike Tyson.
        Play it to the Bone, the newest addition to Ron Shelton's sports - themed
repertoire fails in numerous ways. Like most of Shelton's other great films
(Bull Durham, White Men Can't Jump), this dud unsuccessfully attempts to use
athleticism as a method of connecting characters and creating interesting
subplots. Shelton's films are not considered sports films, but they do heavily
revolve around a specific game to tell a story. Shelton has been so good in the
past at using sports to analyze the structure of society that from his
collection of films we are given an examination of different classes and races
living in various different regions. Play it to the Bone is unsuccessful
because not only is the boxing theme dull, but the side story of the two guys
and a girl travelling across the country is even worse. The film has no social
message like its predecessors. 
The relationship between the friends, two failed boxers who must face off
against each other in the ring for 50 thousand dollars, is very confusing for a
number of reasons. The whole film, since it is primarily a "buddy picture,"
depends on the strength of the friendship the two characters have for each
other. Unfortunately, it is a very weak bond for the reasons listed below.
1) We never see how Cesar (Antonio Banderas) and Vince (Woody Harrelson) meet.
The two are so different from each other, that a scene of how this odd
friendship developed should have been mandatory. 
2) Vince and Cesar argue every moment possible on their trip to Las Vegas.
There is not one convincing moment dedicated to seeing the characters laugh
together or actually agree on something. 
3) The third character on the trip, Grace (Lolita Davidovich) stands in the
way. She is in nearly every scene with them, making it impossible to understand
the difficulty the two male characters are going to have when they fight each
other. 
4) There are two many interfering, irrelevant side stories. Vince is convinced
that he sees Jesus on a regular basis, Cesar yells at the sky in Spanish when
he is angry, and Grace tries to sell her inventions to hotel owner Robert
Wagner. These boring tales only hurt the central plot.
5) When it comes to time for the two men to fight, they don't even hesitate to
pound each other. Wasn't the whole point of the road trip to show that these
two are friends who could never hurt each other?
By the time the road trip part of the movie is over with, the film wants to be
over. Shelton, on the other hand, continues to tell his story. Forty five
painful minutes remain. The boxing scene between Cesar and Vince starts out
very powerful and interestingly different from other boxing movies. However,
the fight goes on for way too long and becomes very repetitive and predictable
after awhile, kind of like the whole film. 
Lars Attacks!
http://www.angelfire.com/ny3/larsattacks
Play it to the Bone is Play it to the Bo-oooooring. (sorry I couldn't help
myself).

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Directed by Jay Roach
Written by Mike Myers
Starring Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Mindy Sterling, Seth Green, Robert Wagner,
Rob Lowe, Elizabeth Hurley
It makes perfect sense why Mike Myers decided to make another "Austin Powers"
film.         The original was a box office hit which introduced new phrases into
our pop-culture vocabulary. It made Mike Myers an independent household name
without the accompaniment of Dana Carvey or the black baseball cap and the torn
blue jeans he wore in "Wayne's World". With "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged
Me", Myers has permanently left his name on a select list of comedic geniuses
of the 1990's. Genius is an appropriate word. Only geniuses would use the same
jokes that earned them big bucks in the past for future events. This strategy
takes advantage of the pleasures of target audiences and gets as much money as
it can out of these viewers until their act grows tiresome. Myers has followed
this lucrative code by appearing as his Austin Powers creation in a number of
ads, an MTV awards show, a Madonna music video, a trivia computer game and now
in the sequel "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me". Luckily for him, his
British spy has not grown tiresomeyet. 
The sequel is almost a carbon copy of the original. The same characters and the
same gags are used in both films. In the sequel, however, the jokes are taken
to a higher level meaning the duration of time each joke requires to execute is
a bit longer. This makes the film enjoyable but it leaves an uncomfortable
feeling of déjŕ vu. Although the title ostensibly suggests that Austin Powers
is the star of the film, Mike Myers' second creation, Dr. Evil, is the main
focus of the film with numerous jokes, one after the other. Austin's titular
character is just a formulaic character who inevitably gets the girl and saves
the day. Dr. Evil is also formulaic indeed, as he is destined to attempt to
take over the world but fail in the last ten minutes, but he is responsible for
the true laughs in the film. His clueless rhetoric on how to use slang in his
sentences is very memorable. He's just trying to fit in. When he incorrectly
makes a statement or when he embarrasses himself physically, he uses his
powerful status to try to prove what he is doing is right, no matter how wrong
he is. For example, when he gets some foam from his Starbucks drink on his nose
and chin, Dr. Evil immediately replies, once realizing it is there, that that
is how they drink it in Belgium. "We call it the Belgium Dip." Dr. Evil is so
frightening that no one could argue with him. What is so amusing is Dr. Evil, a
supposedly powerful and audacious, is like a little Teddy Bear, innocuous and
fearful. In order to hide this secret, Dr. Evil hires a number of hilarious
henchmen. Mustafa (Will Ferrell) plays a hit-man who can not stand to be asked
a question three times in a row. Mini-Me (Verne Troyer) is an exact replica of
Dr. Evil, except he is one eighth of his size. Fat Bastard (also played by
Myers) weighs a metric ton who eats because he is sad and is sad because he
eats. These characters are all highlights of the film as they add their own
unique personalities.
Come to think of it, "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" when compared to
"Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery" is almost like Dr. Evil when
compared to Mini-Me. It's an identical copy, but bigger and powerful. 

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Starring Jet Li, Aaliyah, Isaiah Washington, Russell
Wong, DMX, and Delroy Lindo.
For those expecting a clever masterpiece of an ancient
Shakespeare play, Romeo Must Die will not be
satisfying. The only real similarity is that both
contain rival gangs from rival families. That's it. In
this "adaptation" you won't find any monologues, any
romance, any dukes, nor, for that matter, any
characters named Romeo or Juliet. You will find a lot
of violence, rap music, curse words, and bad acting.
This is not necessarily a bad thing; the soundtrack
and beautifully choreographed fight scenes add a much
needed Matrix-like environment while the bad acting
reminds its viewers that this is a movie that doesn't
require much thought, just pointless eye-candied
entertainment. And when star Jet Li shows off his
impressive Martial Arts talent, the movie is extremely
fun. He is so graceful at his job that he makes
beating up huge gun-carrying gangsters look extremely
easy. 
The elaborate plot made simple follows Han (Jet Li) as
he escapes a Hong Kong prison to find out who killed
his brother. When Han reaches America, he finds that
two gangs, one African American the other, led by his
father, Chinese, are in the middle of a nasty battle.
As Han continues to search for the truth about his
brother, he meets Tricia (singer Aaliyah) the daughter
of the opposite gang's leader (Delroy Lindo). The two
find they have much in common while the gangs do all
they can to separate them. 
The real problem with Romeo Must Die is that Li is
rarely given a chance to show off his skills. The film
is held down by a confusing subplot involving the NFL,
in which the two families try to profit off of the
league. Also there are way too many characters in this
movie. In a pleasing action movie, there should be
five main characters max: the hero or the two heroes,
the person they try to rescue, and a couple of
villains. There are so many actors in this film that
Li has to wait large portions of the running time
before returning for more action. The other actors do
a fine job, they just stand in the way of the main
point of the film. Russell Wong and Isiah Washington,
in particular, add perfect charisma to their "2nd in
charge" characters. Other Martial Arts flicks with
thinner (almost nonexistent) plots are entertaining
because what is expected, creative fighting scenes,
are shown one after the other. Rumble in the Bronx is
a good example of a ridiculous plot cured by the
expertise of its star (Jackie Chan). 
Another problem is that Han and Tricia never give a
convincing case that they care for each other. They
both disobey their families by secretly meeting to try
and find out who killed Li's brother but there is no
real reason why they do this. Missing is a scene where
the two bond and understand their partner's struggles
in life. Would you risk your life for someone you
hardly knew? These people would at the blink of an
eye. 
The scenes in which Jet Li skillfully gets himself out
of danger are highly recommended, but unfortunately
they are not given the center spotlight. Rent Rumble
in the Bronx and save yourself some money. 

Title
Review for Minus Man, The (1999)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"The Minus Man" (1999) ** (out of four)
Written and Directed by Hampton Fancher
Starring Owen Wilson, Janeane Garofalo, Mercedes
Ruehl, Brian Cox, Dwight Yoakam, Dennis Haysbert, Eric
Mabius, Larry Miller, Brent Briscoe, and Sheryl Crow.
I remember first seeing the preview to this low budget
serial killer indie with a sold out crowd in front 
of The Blair Witch Project. The trailer was strikingly
original compared to most plot-revealing
advertisements today. There were no clips from the
film, just a young couple intimately discussing what
they had just seen at the theater. In fact, their
discussion was so intimate that the young lady
involved forgot about her life guarding
responsibilities at a local pool.  Arriving late to
her job, she finds two huge cadavers floating in the
pool. The laughter, following this bizarre moment,
roared throughout the theater. After this disturbing
event, words flew across the screen, accompanied by a
Danny Elfman-esque score, first declaring that you
will talk about this movie for a long, long time, then
listing a cast of familiar names including Janeane
Garafolo, Merecedes Ruehl, and rock star Sheryl Crow.
>From this experience, I told myself I had to see this
movie and I'm sure everyone else around me did the
same but for one reason or another no one did,
including myself.
I finally got a chance to catch this one on video a
couple of days ago and, sadly, it was not worth the 
wait. I think I understand why there wasn't a scene
from the movie in the preview  there is not one 
interesting or stand out moment in the whole film, not
one surprising turn in the plot, not one particularly
noteworthy acting performance, not one musically
charged instant. Not one of anything really, except a
lot of torturously slow paced dialogue.  From
beginning to end, everything remains consistently
low-key.Writer/director Hampton Fancher tells an
original story but he does nothing else. My only
reaction when The Minus Man ended was `So? Is that
it?' Fancher spends so many pointless scenes doing
nothing that, as time goes by, the movie begins to
drag and drag. The movie is way longer than it has to
be and still there is little to get out of it once it
is over. For a film that guarantees to be a
conversation starter, the only thing my viewing
partner and I had to talk about were the numerous plot
holes left annoyingly (and ntentionally?) unfilled.
The film starts with a questionable casting choice.
Thankfully Sheryl Crow is only in Minus Man for a 
couple of minutes because her acting skills are very
limited. She plays an innocent victim to a serial
killer by the name of Vann Siegert. Played
ndifferently by Owen Wilson, Vann is the last man
you'd expect to be a murderer. He has deceivingly
sunny blonde hair, he's sober, and he's a text book
example of a polite do-gooder. So when he rents out a
room in the house of the emotionally troubled husband
and wife Jane and Doug (Mercedes Ruehl and Brian Cox),
he is quickly taken in as the child the aging couple
wished they had. Vann immediately after arriving at
this ghost town ironically takes on the stereotypical
job of a post office worker, meets a girl (the
unpredictably banal Janeane Garofalo), and whenever he
feels like it, poisons a resident of the town.
Very similar to American Psycho, except without all of
the gory murder scenes, The Minus Man is full of
superfluous voiceovers by Vann. Sometimes interesting
but mostly irrelevant, these glimpses at a serial
killer's mind never tell us why he does what he does.
Fancher occasionally hints that mentally unstable Vann
feels a certain amount of power when he kills, but
unfortunately nothing is for sure.
Some of the scenes in which the viewer enters the
chaotic imagination of Vann are wonderfully eerie. 
Our narrator has dreams about two police detectives
(Dennis Haysbert and Dwight Yoakam) interrogating him
with cruel language and violence. But, like most of
the movie, nothing ultimately comes out of this part
of the story.
The Minus Man is not as depressing or disturbing as
claims it is. I wanted to like this movie and its 
actors but no matter how hard I tried, I could not.
Kudos to Artisan Entertainment. This is an example of
clever advertising attracting me to something I should
have avoided.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Directed by Milos Forman
Written by Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
Starring Jim Carrey, Danny Devito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti, Vincent
Schiavelli, Caroline Rhea, Norm Macdonald, Jerry Lawler, Marilu Henner, Jeff
Conaway, Christopher Lloyd, Judd Hirsch, David Letterman, Lorne Michaels, Paul
Shaffer, Bob Zmuda, and George Shapiro.
`Man on the Moon' is a very entertaining documentation of the life of eccentric
comedian Andy Kaufman. Played with amazing accuracy by Jim Carrey, Kaufman is
portrayed as the man who broke all the rules to make people laugh, or in some
cases to make people extremely upset. In a series of hoaxes and controversies
concerning whether the audacious performances Kaufman put on were real or not,
we learn that Kaufman was a pure genius at what he did. The director, Milos
Forman, shows us that Kaufman's whole life was one big joke with twists at
every corner that left audiences surprised, embarrassed, and eventually wanting
more of him. We learn that Kaufman's ability to fool the public made him one of
the greatest entertainers in American history. Forman shows us act after act to
plaster this statement into our minds. What Forman does not inform the audience
is enough about Kaufman's life off of the camera or off the stage. There are a
few scenes examining his childhood and his later years in which he suffered
from cancer, but certainly not enough. The conclusion of  this film could be
the same from seeing a documentary on Kaufman. Both just focus on his
performances, the slight difference is that `Man on the Moon' has several shots
of the audience's reactions to Kaufman's shenanigans, from confusion to
drunkenness. This difference between the film and a documentary already made on
 Kaufman is very small and useless because it does not matter how the audience
reacts to it but rather how you, yourself, react to it emotionally. Another
problem with `Man on the Moon' is that it gives away too much information about
Kaufman's acts. Prior to this film, the acts had a perfectly ambiguous feel to
them because you never knew exactly what was going on or who was behind them.
This feel was mainly what makes Kaufman so amusing to watch and listen to. When
the film displays each act, later it inevitably discusses how they were done
and unfortunately takes a little away from the enjoyment of the actual Kaufman.
I do not know how Forman could have avoided explaining situations, so I am a
little confused about why this film was even made. Maybe because Kaufman's life
was a perfect formula for a Hollywood tale; he was funny, iconoclastic, and
died at an early age. But the film ruins some of Kaufman's mysteriousness and
it doesn't explain Kaufman's background, which is the only information not well
known by the older aged public.
 Still `Man on the Moon' is entertaining nonetheless thanks to an incredible
performance by Jim Carrey who becomes Kaufman. His mannerisms and voices are so
incredible that it is obvious Carrey did a vast amount of research for his
role. This is by far Carrey's best role ever and with his previous film, `The
Truman Show,' Carrey is hushing critics who have once derided him. He is now
the master of dramatic comedies since Robin Williams has been lagging lately
with some unsatisfactory titles to his name. Another snub by the Academy Awards
against Carrey would be completely unacceptable. He should not only be
nominated but he should also win for best actor.
 Jim Carrey is also helped  by some fine supporting actors in Paul Giamatti and
Danny Devito. Playing Bob Zmuda and George Shapiro respectively, they allow
Carrey to soar even more with some witty one-liners and some fine acting.
Courtney Love was unfortunately wasted in her role. It was simply too brief and
ineffective. It seemed like the movie would not have been any better or worse
without her. Also deserving credit are a number of actors playing themselves in
cameo roles. To see them as they did fifteen years ago was humorous, especially
a zany Christopher Lloyd doing his Taxi character with the hair and everything.
 `Man on the Moon' is as entertaining as any movie this year. It is funny and
extremely accurate in its portrayal. It may be a great educational film for
younger generations not introduced to Andy Kaufman's strange world. They see
that this comedian was wilder and funnier than his time and maybe even the
present time. The world has yet to catch up to Kaufman's eccentricity. For
older generations however, the film presents nothing new. Kaufman's life
outside of the entertainment  industry is very brief. He was one of the great
introverts of entertainment and unfortunately remains one into the year 2000.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox Arquette , David Arquette, Parker Posey,
Emily Mortimer, Jenny McCarthy, Patrick Dempsey, Scott Foley, Deon Richmond,
Lance Henriksen, Matt Keeslar, Patrick Warburton, and Liev Schreiber.
Back in 1996, director Wes Craven and screenwriter Kevin Williamson teamed up
to create the witty and original Scream, a scary movie that simultaneously
derided the cliches of other scary movies. Four years later, a third Scream has
been released, except this time without the wit, originality, or Williamson.
What once was at the top of its class now has become what it was so good at
mocking: a pointless, violent slasher-flick. The surviving members of the first
two films find themselves being stalked again in the middle of Hollywood, where
Stab 3 is being shot, a fictional sequel to the Woodsboro Murders.  But the
question is who's committing the crimes and why?
There is no doubt that Scream 3 is a truly scary film, the numerous scenes in
which the ghost-faced killer stabs his (or her!) innocent victims were all very
intense and well paced. To be honest, this certainly is one of the scariest
movies of the 1990'sbut was the aim to just make a scary movie or to prove a
point in the process? Unlike the original Scream, and more like the second
Scream, the movie only completes half of its goal. The humor, ardently
attempted, just does not work (maybe because the previous movies killed off the
funniest characters or maybe because new screenwriter Ehren Kruger just isn't a
funny guy, we will never know). Some potentially clever cameos and a number of
entertainment references were not completely developed and most of the jokes
were just flat-out unfunny. The best part of the film is when Randy (Jamie
Kennedy), who unfortunately does not survive the second film, leaves on
videotape, the rules of a trilogy. This brief ten- minute section only reminds
us how great the first film was at using other movies' clichés to tell its own
jokes. Randy mentions more movies and stereotypes in his small appearance then
the rest of the characters in the whole film combined.  
Another fault in the script is the disastrous last ten minutes, which nearly
ruin the whole movie. I spent the whole time trying to figure out who the
killer was by carefully observing facial expressions and discovering hidden
clues, only to find out that there is absolutely zero evidence and an
unconvincing motive for this random "surprise" of a killer. They could have
picked anyone else and I would have been satisfied, anyone at all.  The
discovery of the person behind the ghost-faced mask also leaves numerous plot
holes that are never answered. Scream 3, supposedly the act in the trilogy that
answers any questions and fixes any mistakes, left me more confused than any of
the past films. 
Remember when Scream was about a couple of guys hanging around a video store,
with nothing to do except talk about the movies? It was so simple, yet so
perfect.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
Starring Ben Affleck, Gary Sinise, Charlize Theron, Dennis Farina, Danny Trejo,
Clarence Williams III, and Isaac Hayes.
What makes Reindeer Games even more disappointing than just a predictable,
lifeless action flick is the cast and crew who signed onto the project. Most of
the people involved in Reindeer Games just came off terrible slumps with
excellent comeback performances in their most recent films. John Frankenheimer,
who made the unforgettable Cold War drama The Manchurian Candidate way back in
the early 60's, recently showed critics and fans alike that he still had some
magic left in his directorial skills when he created the brilliant car chase
scenes in Ronin. Screenwriter Ehren Kruger gave a remarkable first impression
when he wrote the script for the underrated Arlington Rd.  Ben Affleck
displayed his comedic talents in Dogma and Boiler Room, and even on Saturday
Night Live directly after the horrible Forces of Nature and 200 Cigarettes.
Even Charlize Theron, who I was convinced couldn't act, did a decent job in
Cider House Rules. When all of these bright stars come together, one would
assume that the movie will have great potential to be entertaining. After
coming out of the theater showing Reindeer Games, disbelief was my first
reactionthen frustration. The movie could have premiered on Cinemax at two in
the morning starring an all-rookie cast and still would have been equally
lacking in entertaining. The acting is so pitiful and the script so dull, I may
have to rethink some of my opinions on how talented these actors actually are.
It seemed like everyone was restricted to just the script and not given a fair
amount of improvisational rights. We have all seen Ben Affleck have some fun on
the set, it is so apparent in a number of scenes in Good Will Hunting when he
exchanges jokes with his friends at a bar. The actors in that movie were having
fun and, from that, the audience had fun. Reindeer Games is the complete
opposite; the actors don't seem to want to be their characters (even Danny
Trejo, who will do practically anything, doesn't look like he is enjoying
himself), causing the audience to quickly lose interest. Evidence of public
disapproval was noted when a woman behind me yelled "Boy this movie is
horrible!" and when there were scattered giggles during the most dramatic
moments.
The story follows a man, Rudy (Ben Affleck), who is leaving prison in a few
days along with his best friend and cellmate Nick (James Frain). Nick has been
exchanging love letters with a beautiful woman, Ashley (Charlize Theron), and
cannot wait to leave prison and meet her in person. When Nick is killed in a
prison riot, Rudy decides to pretend to be Nick and take Ashley out on a date
for the Christmas holidays. Unfortunately Ashley's brother, Gabriel (Gary
Sinise) interferes with their relationship. Thinking Rudy is Nick, he kidnaps
Rudy and threatens to kill him unless he helps rob a casino, which Nick use to
work at as a security guard. Now Rudy must pretend to be Nick so he can protect
Ashley from her brother Gabriel. Confused? The movie only gets more complex as
it goes on, until it gets way, way too complex at its climax. 
But Reindeer Games makes its first serious mistake during the first half an
hour. The hero commits a greedy, selfish act when he decides to pretend he is
his dead cellmate in order to date Ashley. Some hero. The point of a hero is to
do the morally correct thing, a person for the audience to relate to or admire.
When Rudy lies and cheats his way into trouble, instead of gathering support
from me for him to ultimately succeed in getting the bad guys, I felt more like
he was getting what he deserved and even wanted to see him fail at times. The
most irritating part of the film (besides the fact that this is a Christmas
movie released in February) is the number of chances the bad guys get to kill
Rudy but fail or delay for some idiotic reason. The routine in which the bad
guy must explain his genius plan to the hero before attempting to kill him with
some elaborate machine is getting so tired nowadays, especially when I eagerly
want to see the hero dead. 
The only saving grace keeping this movie from receiving zero stars is an
amusing but pointless cameo from Isaac Hayes as a prisoner upset with his food.
Why he was in this movie for such a pointless role beats me. Why any of these
people had anything at all to do with this movie beats me.  

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Dennis Quaid, Jim Caviezel, Elizabeth
Mitchell, Andre Braugher, and Noah Emmerich.
Frequency n., The number of times a specified
phenomenon occurs within a specified interval as the
number of repetitions of a complete sequence of values
of a periodic function per unit variation of an
independent variableetc
Don't worry. When watching the thriller Frequency, you
won't have to know what the heck frequency means. The
premise, although it may sound complex, is very basic
on the big screen. A New York cop, John, (Jim
Caviezel) finds a radio in his house, which allows him
to communicate with his New York firefighter father,
Frank, (Dennis Quaid) who died thirty years ago.
Immediately John warns his father that he will die
trying to stop a fire in an abandoned warehouse. When
Frank takes his advice and survives the accident he
wasn't supposed to, the two eventually realize that by
changing that one moment in the past, they have
created a whole new future in which a serial killer
murders John's mother and nine other women. It is now
up to John and Frank to use their special connection
and save thirty years ago to make present time a
better place. (I told you that wasn't confusing).  
Overall, I was very pleased with Frequency. It's
occasional sappy moments perfectly synchronized with
its suspenseful serial killer scenes. I usually don't
buy those cheesy "I love you dad" segments in movies,
but this one surprisingly satisfied me. Maybe because
the plot is so creative and universal that I believed
that this is how most people would act when talking to
a dead relative. Frequency's creepy premise left me
thinking once the film ended, what if? What would I
do? Would I help my own family or save a historical
figure from being assasinated? Or stop some kids from
shooting other kids? Or buy stock from Yahoo!? (a
character in the film does the latter with humorous
consequences). 
Frequency also reminded me of the fantastic Back to
the Future. Both share that "change the past slightly,
and you'll change the future heavily" warning. The
changes between the present and the past, such as
different newspaper headlines or people disappearing
and reappearing in photographs, are very similar. Both
are also wonderful feel-good family films that can
attract to a number of generations. The only
difference worth noting is that Frequency's final
scene doesn't set up a possibility for a lucrative
sequel already in the making. 
There are some problems with the film though. First,
there is a major flaw in the story towards the end
that is somewhat distracting (Email me if you have
seen the movie and want to know what I think it is).
The plot must have confused even the filmmakers who
frequently (no pun intended) switch from 1969 to 1999
while telling the story. Another problem is that the
supporting cast, including Noah Emmerich and Andre
Braugher, are underused. While in the film, which is
not enough, the aforementioned actors steal every
scene they are in.
Frequency was a pleasant surprise for me and the
audience I saw it with who cheered at the end. Even if
you know what is going to happen or if you think the
preview ruined the movie for you, like it almost did
for me, check this movie out. You may be surprised as
well.

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Starring Kyle MacLachlan, Laura Dern, Isabella Rossellini, Dennis Hopper,
George Dickerson, Hope Lange, Brad Dourif, Jack Nance, and Dean Stockwell.
David Lynch's "Blue Velvet" begins and ends with colorful, bright shots of
flowers and happy Americans mowing their lawns in a seemingly perfect American
town. However, what lies inside this nominally safe atmosphere is a "strange
world" of drug dealers, sadists, and murderers. The opening and closing shots
are a wonderful contrast to the rest of the gloomy, disturbing film. They show
not to make assumptions from first glance and that oddness is common in all
places under all circumstances. Odd would be a perfect adjective to describe
this film, its characters, its direction, and its story. Thankfully,  the
obscurity that "Blue Velvet" relies on is enough to make this film enjoyable.
Since its elements are so originally weird, you never know what will happen
next. This is the main goal of a movie; to be spontaneous and surprising. "Blue
Velvet" miracuously succeeds at this even though it contains mediocre acting.
Lynch creates such a hypnotic world that it is hard to resist his style of
story telling.
The film starts off with the discovery of a severed ear by a college boy (Kyle
MacLachlan). From this point MacLachlan finds himself involved with a lounge
singer (Isabella Rossellinia) who has lost her son and husband to a kidnapping.
The plot is much more detailed than the aforementioned and this is what makes
David Lynch's story telling so amazing. MacLachlan becomes involved in a
forbidden relationship, in another relationship that could have been taken
straight out of a high school flick, and he is put into the shoes of a drug
dealer who has some wild adventures with some wild friends. Through these
multiple stories, MacLachlan lives multiple lives and as we follow MacLachlan,
we are introduced to a variety of interesting subplots. Lynch masterfully
builds these subplots but he does not piece them all together in the very end
and make a convenient crowd pleasing conclusion. Instead he leaves some
ambiguity and forces those curious enough to get the real meaning to watch the
film several several times.  Lynch has been known to do this with a number of
his films meaning he may be too esoteric for some hoping to get a Hollywood
ending where the good guy gets the girl and everything turns out fine. However,
for fans of odd difficult indies, "Blue Velvet" could be just what they are
looking for.
It is very hard to discuss "Blue Velvet" without discussing the performance of
Dennis Hopper's sadistic Frank. Most of the other actors in the film were not
very memorable. Kyle MacLachlan lacked one important aspect for his role, a
personality. Laura Dern was consistently annoying. But Dennis Hopper stole
every scene he was in. His evil character was just plain old frightening in his
mannerisms from his obsession to velvet to his incessant breathing from a gas
mask. Frank is a character that comes along once in a blue moon. Many producers
know this and have inevitably begun to typecast Hopper as the bad guy. Just
like his villain in "Speed", Hopper is over the edge with cursing and screaming
every chance he has to speak. This harshness is exactly what Frank is, so weird
and twisted that it is hard not to look at him, even if he theatens you to look
away.
"Blue Velvet" has characters and stories you will never see in a movie again.
For this sole reason it is recommended. But also see it to admire Lynch's
obsession to avoid the norm. Even if this film is a little too weird for you,
it's hard not to congratulate a guy for trying something new and sticking to
it.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Directed by Jay Roach
Written by Mike Myers
Starring Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Mindy Sterling, Seth Green, Robert Wagner,
Rob Lowe, Elizabeth Hurley
It makes perfect sense why Mike Myers decided to make another "Austin Powers"
film.         The original was a box office hit which introduced new phrases into
our pop-culture vocabulary. It made Mike Myers an independent household name
without the accompaniment of Dana Carvey or the black baseball cap and the torn
blue jeans he wore in "Wayne's World". With "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged
Me", Myers has permanently left his name on a select list of comedic geniuses
of the 1990's. Genius is an appropriate word. Only geniuses would use the same
jokes that earned them big bucks in the past for future events. This strategy
takes advantage of the pleasures of target audiences and gets as much money as
it can out of these viewers until their act grows tiresome. Myers has followed
this lucrative code by appearing as his Austin Powers creation in a number of
ads, an MTV awards show, a Madonna music video, a trivia computer game and now
in the sequel "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me". Luckily for him, his
British spy has not grown tiresomeyet. 
The sequel is almost a carbon copy of the original. The same characters and the
same gags are used in both films. In the sequel, however, the jokes are taken
to a higher level meaning the duration of time each joke requires to execute is
a bit longer. This makes the film enjoyable but it leaves an uncomfortable
feeling of déjŕ vu. Although the title ostensibly suggests that Austin Powers
is the star of the film, Mike Myers' second creation, Dr. Evil, is the main
focus of the film with numerous jokes, one after the other. Austin's titular
character is just a formulaic character who inevitably gets the girl and saves
the day. Dr. Evil is also formulaic indeed, as he is destined to attempt to
take over the world but fail in the last ten minutes, but he is responsible for
the true laughs in the film. His clueless rhetoric on how to use slang in his
sentences is very memorable. He's just trying to fit in. When he incorrectly
makes a statement or when he embarrasses himself physically, he uses his
powerful status to try to prove what he is doing is right, no matter how wrong
he is. For example, when he gets some foam from his Starbucks drink on his nose
and chin, Dr. Evil immediately replies, once realizing it is there, that that
is how they drink it in Belgium. "We call it the Belgium Dip." Dr. Evil is so
frightening that no one could argue with him. What is so amusing is Dr. Evil, a
supposedly powerful and audacious, is like a little Teddy Bear, innocuous and
fearful. In order to hide this secret, Dr. Evil hires a number of hilarious
henchmen. Mustafa (Will Ferrell) plays a hit-man who can not stand to be asked
a question three times in a row. Mini-Me (Verne Troyer) is an exact replica of
Dr. Evil, except he is one eighth of his size. Fat Bastard (also played by
Myers) weighs a metric ton who eats because he is sad and is sad because he
eats. These characters are all highlights of the film as they add their own
unique personalities.
Come to think of it, "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" when compared to
"Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery" is almost like Dr. Evil when
compared to Mini-Me. It's an identical copy, but bigger and more powerful. 

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Breckin Meyer, Seann William Scott, DJ
Qualls, Paolo Costanzo, Amy Smart, Rachel Blanchard,
Fred Ward, Andy Dick, and Tom Green 
First off: I'm young. I'm 16 years old. Road Trip was
made for people my age and people my age will enjoy
it. If you're not a teenager, you probably won't like
this movie. There is a reason too - it wasn't made for
you to like it. Now on to the review. 
In my mind, raunchy films such as American Pie, the
recently released Road Trip, and (to some extent) the
"adult" comedy There's Something About Mary will
always be compared with the original gross-out comedy
classic National Lampoon's Animal House. One of the
few movies to literally take my breath away with
laughter, Animal House helped introduce a genre that
would sicken overprotective parents for decades to
come. After enjoying the excessive nudity, cursing,
prankster behavior, and all out college party
atmosphere that the 1978 trendsetter created, it
really was a shame that the 80's failed to aid in
continuing this dumb-fun style of filmmaking, just one
bomb after another. However, in the last three years
with the addition of Road Trip, the lewd comedy era
seems to be relishing a strong rebirth. First in 1998,
the Farrelly Brothers introduced Mary, a post college
tale filled with indecent behavior and penis jokes so
disgusting laughter was the only form of response that
made sense. In 1999, the Weitz Brothers' American Pie
told the story of a pre-college group and there
experiments in the field of sexual intercourse. Once
again, the offensively funny, crude style seemed
heavily borrowed from Animal House. Finally with Road
Trip in 2000, we get a movie much closer in both plot
and obscenity to my favorite comedy of the 20th
century. 
Road Trip seems like more of an homage than a rip off
of Animal House. Twenty years ago, it was very
difficult to get away with the smallest amount of
lasciviousness. I like to think of Road Trip as an
updated version of Animal House - this time with the
possibilities explored and utilized to their fullest
potential. At times, Road Trip does exactly what you
think it won't do; something so outrageous and
unexpected that it becomes shockingly hilarious. To
show how Road Trip goes step further than Animal
House: remember when Otter and the gang decades ago,
with all eyes watching them, uncomfortably sat in a
bar knowing they were the only white people in the
room? Well in Road Trip, the four main characters are
the only white guys in a fraternity house that they
crash at, but the scene doesn't end there - the frat
plays a prank on one of the boys by claiming they
found a Klan Mask in his duffel baguh oh. Would this
have happened in a movie twenty years ago? Probably
not. 
The story of Road Trip has little significance. It
merely serves as an excuse for pointless but humorous
jokes, one after the other. All you really need to
know to understand this movie is that a college
student accidentally sends a tape to his longtime
girlfriend that shows him having sex with another
girl. To prevent a disaster, the boy and three of his
friends must travel by car from their college in
Ithaca, New York to the University of Austin in three
days. A hilarious supplement to the film is a
character named Barry played by the insane Tom Green.
Much like the John Belushi character of Animal House
(except instead of crushing beer cans on his forehead,
puts live mice in his mouth), Barry has no real point
in the movie but to make you laugh at his unique
qualities. Doing gags very similar to the ones on his
self titled television show, fans should get a kick
out of him, while others may be a little confused at
his odd approach towards comedy.  Unfortunately, at
times, he interferes with the central characters and
slows the film down a bit, but mostly he is a positive
contributor. 
Other members of the cast are excellent as lively
caricatures of your stereotypical college student
(loves to smoke weed, party, and have sex, hates to
study). Seann William Scott is great as one of the
travelers. Almost identical to his character in
American Pie and to Tim Matheson's Otter in Animal
House, he is such a jerk that he eventually becomes
fun to watch. It's hard not to watch him steal a bus
from a blind lady and wonder what kind of childhood he
must have had. DJ Qualls is also great as another one
of the travelers. He's puny, gets pushed around by
everyone, and is only on this trip because the others
need his car. He's like Jason Biggs except much more
ignorant and helpless. 
Unfortunately, the ending of Road Trip is very
disappointing. A weak, empty finish climaxes all of
the crazy adventures that lead up to it. Predictable
and boring, it certainly can not stand up against the
parade ending in Animal House. 
Otherwise, you'll have a fun time viewing Road Trip.
Let your brain take a time out for once, you won't
need it to understand what is going on during the
movie and you won't need it to think about the movie's
message afterwards. This is the kind of movie, where
you don't know what will happen, you laugh really hard
with everyone else in the theater, and then you talk
about it with your friends the next day. That's it.
Enjoy it - then move on with your life until the next
one comes out in 2001.           

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Small Time Crooks" (2000) **1/2 (out of four)
Starring Woody Allen, Tony Darrow, Hugh Grant, George
Grizzard, Jon Lovitz, Elaine May, Michael Rapaport,
Elaine Stritch, and Tracey Ullman.
In Small Time Crooks, writer/director/star Woody Allen
heavily depends on irony to provide big time laughs.
In the beginning it works. A thief who hates the
thought of owning too much money, a plan made by a
couple to energize their relationship ends up
seriously endangering it. It's original, unpredictable
funat first. But after a while, Allen throws so many
ironic situations into the simple plot, it inevitably
becomes annoying and ultimately unfunny. What starts
out as a pleasant light comedy complete with a rapid
fire of fresh jokes and characters, ends in a dull,
monotonous manner that must end immediately. The film
just loses steam a third of the way through. 
Don't miss the first ten minutes of Small Time Crooks
or else you'll miss all of the excitement. Woody Allen
plays Ray "The Brain," a dishwasher (with a sarcastic
nickname) who used to be a thief before going to jail
for two years. But imprisonment did not change Ray. He
has his eyes on a bank and with the help of three
neurotic friends, he plans on robbing it, splitting
the money, then going to Florida. Renting out a store
half a block away from the bank, Ray's master plan is
to drill an underground passageway from the store to
the vault. In order to make the situation not look
suspicious, Ray begs his wife to act as a cover by
selling cookies in the store as the guys drill
downstairs. Ironically, the "cookie store"
unexpectedly becomes a popular and lucrative shop - so
popular that it makes them millionaires without having
to rob anything. The trouble is Ray and his wife, now
harshly thrown into the world of the high class, feel
uncomfortably out of place. Small Time Crooks dies
down just after the couple becomes rich. Except for a
few scenes, it's not worth seeing.
Competing this weekend against a totally different
kind of comedy, Road Trip, this one is more dialogue
driven and should attract older viewers. It's simple
and innocent storytelling (the movie is rated PG) is
reminiscent of older films and you have to tip your
hat to a writer who can make a movie funny without a
semen joke. I just expected Small Time Crooks to be
funnier, especially compared to the opening thirty
minutes when something actually happens. 
Two things almost saved this movie from eventual doom.
First, the cast does a brilliant job. Woody Allen and
Tracey Ullman are perfect for their roles; the
chemistry they share is especially unique - whenever
together they incessantly argue and deride but you can
still sense that they love each other. And with their
equally whiny and high-pitched voices ringing together
in a chaotic form of harmony, it's obvious this is a
match made in heaven. The supporting cast does a
fantastic job of playing a slow-witted but amiable
bunch. Michael Rapaport, Jon Lovitz, and Tony Darrow
are very funny as Ray's "we-didn't go to high school"
partners in crime. The only problem is that this trio
is terribly underused; they completely disappear after
the satisfying first act and we never hear from them
again.  Elaine May is a scene-stealer as Frenchy's
cousin who according to Ray is as dumb as a cow or a
dog. She delivers the most laughs with her inane
comments and questions, and the dumbfounded look
plastered on her face throughout is classic. The only
complaint regarding the cast is Hugh Grant. Being one
of the only other major characters in the final
two-thirds of the movie, Grant faces the burden of
having to fill the shoes of Ray's friends. He is
neither funny nor emotional and, supposedly playing
the bad guy, he isn't too convincing.  
The second near-rescue effort from failure is small
but crucial. Small Time Crooks has one of the few
trailers in a long time not to give very much away
from the movie's plot. Thanks to that, there was a bit
of unpredictability that made watching a little more
interesting. But not interesting enough to recommend. 

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Jim Carrey plays Truman Burbank, a man who lives in a perfect world with a
perfect job and a perfect wife.  Little does he know that his life is the
center of a 24 hour widely popular television show known as The Truman Show. He
is surrounded by actors in one huge dome studio and is constantly watched by a
variety of cameras, which are hidden throughout the city. 
"The Truman Show" is a creative and enjoyable movie which is wonderfully acted
and directed.  Jim Carrey, known mostly for his rubber faced gags and his
talking rear end, takes a surprising and effective turn to drama as Truman,
similar to how Robin Williams has succeeded in the last decade.  Carrey is so
believable and likeable that you feel shame for his character and cheer him on
during the film.  He also uses humor to his advantage, making The Truman Show
even more entertaining.  
Ed Harris gives one of his best performances, as well, as the creator of The
Truman Show, who is extremely picky about using the right cameras, the right
actors, and the right scenery.  Harris adds a powerful god like appearance to
the movie as his obsession towards the show and Truman's life for over thirty
years makes him a creepy villain unlike the average "bad guy" of current
movies. 
Peter Weir masterfully directs The Truman Show using unordinary camera angles
to emphasize that the cameras are watching Truman no matter where he goes. Weir
also creates a magnificent set from an elaborate city to a sea that never seems
to end. He cleverly displays advertisements in random places and errors of the
show's production ( a studio light falls from the sky) reminding the viewer
that it is live television and some faults will occur.  Throughout the movie he
asks the viewer whether the city should continue to entertain the world or  if
it should halt for the sake of one innocent, unknowing man.  The Truman Show is
not your ordinary movie. Its detailed 1984-ish plot, its powerful acting, and
its phenomenal directing make it one of the
best movies of the 1990's. 

Title
Review for King Gimp (1999)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Most people think 'gimp' means someone with a lame
walk. But 'gimp' also means a 'fighting spirit.'" 
And Dan Keplinger easily fits that role. His
determination, courage, and strength won filmmakers
Susan Hannah Hadary and William A. Whiteford Academy
Awards for Best Documentary Short and won the hearts
of millions of viewers according to the voluminous
message board on the official HBO site. King Gimp is
thirteen-years-condensed-to-forty-minutes in the life
of Keplinger, a passionate and intent student who has
suffered from cerebral palsy since birth. Formerly
unable to write his name on a piece of paper,
Keplinger miraculously builds the patience and skill
levels to paint (using a paint brush attached to a
helmet on his head) elaborate pictures that impress
initial skeptics. Developing adversity and friendships
along the way, Keplinger fights to become a
professional artist. 
A feel-good film minus Robin Williams and a
thunderously cliched score, King Gimp boldly uses
Keplinger as narrator. Mainly from him typing on a
keyboard, his words surpass your everyday monotonous
voice-over. Sporadically discussing love, life, and
the pursuit of happiness, this documentary depends on
its visuals to consume its audience - and each frame
is as hypnotizing as the next. Every time Keplinger's
motivated eyes look into the camera, the word 'king'
immediately comes to mind. 
As a supplement to the film, visit
www.hbo.com/kinggimp for a better understanding of
cerebral palsy, how amazing his artwork his, how
insightful his words are, and how inspirational his
story is. 

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"American Psycho" (2000) ** (out of four)
Starring Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Jared Leto,
Justin Theroux, Reese Witherspoon, Chloe Sevigny, Cara
Seymour, Guinevere Turner, William Sage, Matt Ross,
and Samantha Mathis.
That was the first question I asked myself after
seeing American Psycho. 
is still my reaction writing this review a few days
later. The ending of American Psycho is so
over-the-top, so unlike the rest of the movie, so
catastrophic, that it just becomes confusing. Neither
me nor the six people I saw it with understood what
the overall message was trying to say. The sloppy
ending disproved any conclusions we came up with.
American Psycho may be fun to watch but its ending
seriously damages all of the characters' introduced
including the protagonist/serial killer Patrick
Bateman (Christian Bale). Surprise endings work
extremely well when the surprise actually makes sense
with the rest of the movie (like Sixth Sense, Fight
Club). On the other hand, they are extremely ruinous
when films use them as an easy way out to end a movie
that is difficult to finish. When American Psycho
ends, it is not over; there are one too many questions
left unanswered. 
What was the point of American Psycho? Does Patrick
Bateman represent all of our gruesome fantasies come
true? As a rich Wall Street type living sometime
during the 1980's who acts as a serial killer on his
off time, Bateman gets away with everything he does.
He doesn't just escape the murders unharmed, he also
cheats on his "fiancée" (Reese Witherspoon) with his
friend's fiancée, pays prostitutes, tortures animals,
and snorts cocaine all during an average weekday. This
all coming from the same man who obsessively takes
care of his skin with a series of lotions, who goes
insane when he stains a blanket, and who idolizes the
music of Whitney Houston. Patrick is like no other
character you have seen before thanks to an incredible
performance by former child-star Christian Bale. Bale
saves this movie from being a total disaster with his
ability to make Bateman into a two-faced character who
loves the sight of blood but can't stand seeing it on
his bed sheets. Thank god Leonardo DiCaprio did not
take the title role, he would have been terrible
miscast. The only problem with Bale's magnificent
accomplishment is that he appears in every scene,
meaning he makes every other actor in the movie look
terrible. It felt like director/co-writer Mary Harron
left every other supporting character underdeveloped.
Several excellent actors are all wasted in their
roles. Witherspoon, Willem Dafoe, Samantha Mathis, and
Chloe Sevigny all have potential to be interesting
characters but, due to the terrible ending and
Bateman's dominance, are never given a chance. We
never learn anything about their lives, who they
actually are, what they hide behind their social
appearance. The beauty of Bateman is that he acts one
way in front of society but another, unbelievable to
his friends, way when by himself. And slowly, as the
movie progresses, his "mask of sanity begins to slip."
Besides Bale's performance, there is not much to
recommend about American Psycho. Rumored to be
extremely controversial and unforgettable, the movie
is far from that. The jokes, sometimes hilarious, are
mostly muted by the extreme violence. Maybe the MPAA
ruined the moviewho knows? 
What was the point of American Psycho? Was it a
clever, satirical examination of the 1980's? Bret
Easton Ellis' novel, which the movie is based on, may
be just that but I don't see why the film couldn't
have taken place during the 60's, 70's, 90's, or the
2000's. Pop culture has affected society as much in
these periods (if not more) than in the 1980's. 
With a decent ending that wrapped up the plot and
expanded the potential of the supporting characters,
American Psycho could have been much more. Bale does
his best to make this movie work but in the end it
just seems like the viewer is being forced to watch a
crazy man kill a bunch of innocent people and get away
with it and nothing else. Overall, American Psycho was
a disappointment.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
"Shanghai Noon" (2000) *** (out of four)
Starring Jackie Chan, Owen Wilson, Lucy Liu, Roger
Yuan, Walt Goggina, and Xander Berkely.
When Rush Hour became a surprise box office hit in
1998, Jackie Chan simultaneously became a household
name in America. Much like his character in the film,
Chan was someone different - a welcome change from now
fading stars like Dolph Lundgren, Jean-Claude Van
Damme and Sylvester Stallone. Completing his own
stunts, Chan's dexterity is a marvel to watch, and
with a quiet, gentle manner of speaking, he is also
unstoppably amiable. Rush Hour, for Hollywood and
audiences alike, was too good to be true - everyone
and their dogs knew a follow-up was inevitable. Enter
Shanghai Noon, a bright, enjoyable action comedy that
isn't a sequel to Rush Hour but might as well be
considered one. With Chan, an identical plot, and the
same East-Meets-West-With-Hilarious-Consequences feel
to it, if you didn't like Rush Hour you won't like
Shanghai Noon, and vice-versa. 
Gone is the comedic sidekick Chris Tucker of Rush Hour
(what has happened to Tucker these past couple of
years anyway?), his replacement: the equally
loquacious and hilarious Owen Wilson. An actor who is
finally getting the recognition he deserves, Wilson
had blandly humorous supporting roles in Armageddon,
Anaconda, and The Haunting but his greatest
accomplishment remains his involvement in the fresh
comedies Bottle Rocket and Rushmore as co-writer.
Coming into the movie, I felt that the performance of
Wilson would crucially make or break the film. Since
Chan's fighting scenes were near-guaranteed to be
entertaining (they were), would the rest of the movie,
which Wilson dominates, be as exciting? Happily,
Wilson came through. As a two-timing wannabe outlaw,
his acting was exactly what the role demanded; a
combination of confidence and low self-esteem - a guy
who can talk the talk but comes nowhere close to
walking the walk. Wilson impressively completed the
difficult task of filling huge gaps of plot with witty
subplots and one-liners. His job was to hide the fact
that Chan's English vocabulary is somewhat limited,
and he succeeds with high honors.
But, then again, without Jackie Chan, this movie would
be nothing. He is a true expert at what he does - cool
stunts without the commanding aid of special effects,
and his good old fashioned fighting skills (no matter
how often he does them) never get old. But the actor
Jackie Chan is developing as well. He seems much more
mature and comfortable here then in Rush Hour,
sporting a long pony tail hanging below his
fashionable cowboy hat. 
Shanghai Noon, poking fun at the old time Westerns in
which pardners are inseparable (until it comes to gold
or women, that is), relies on the chemistry between
Wilson and Chan is excellent, although it does take a
little too long for them to finally team up. The story
follows Chon Wang, an 18th century imperial guard who
is sent from China to the Wild Wild West in order to
rescue the kidnapped princess (Lucy Liu) he has a
crush on. On his way, he stumbles into some trouble
and eventually is helped by the suspicious Roy
O'Bannon (Wilson). The real challenge for the two is
whether they will survive each other before they
attempt their rescue mission.
With numerous references to older classics (the movie
is called Shanghai Noon, get it? Shang-High Noonhaha,
also a shot similar to the famous final scene of Butch
Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) and names (Wilson's
birth name was Wyatt Earp, Chon Wang conveniently
sounds just like John Wayne), the smaller jokes work
best. 
A small predictable comedy, occasionally sprinkled
with gigantic laughs and "how-did-they-do-that?"
action scenes, Shanghai Noon does run a bit too long,
but otherwise is great, clean fun. Oh and don't forget
to stay for the infamous bloopers at the end of the
movie, they're very funny. 

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C.
Reilly, Diane Lane, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, William
Fichtner, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Janet Wright, Rusty
Schwimmer, Dash Mihok, Michael Ironside, and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio
Wolfgang Petersen's latest, The Perfect Storm, is like
a pineapple. It only tastes good after arduous peeling
and digging - if you try to eat the fruit, spikes and
all, it's going to hurtquite a bit. OK, maybe that
was a confusing analogy, so here's my main complaint
about the latest man battles nature flick: there isn't
really much of a story to tell. Basically, a
Massachusetts fishing crew goes out to sea on a small
boat, called the Andrea Gail, and gets stuck in the
middle of "the storm of the century." How much time
does it take for Petersen to tell this story? Not
nearly enough. So he spends the majority of the film
developing pointless side stories which all eventually
become superfluous. Audiences want to see the storm,
they want to see a fight for survival but what they
get is a lot of cliched, maudlin drivel. The last
quarter of The Perfect Storm is utterly perfect in
every aspect, but just try lasting the first
three-quarters. 
I have yet to read Sebastian Junger's The Perfect
Storm, but from what I have heard it is an
unforgettable tale. Based on a true story, the book
must have found some other way to introduce the
characters because in the movie version, the approach
is weak. Using a wonderfully patriotic score by James
Horner, Petersen almost hides the in-your-face
banality. Right away the central characters are
introduced: the gritty, determined captain (George
Clooney), the ingenue (Mark Wahlberg) torn between his
job and his girlfriend (Diane Lane), the loving father
(John C. Reilly), the comic relief who's always trying
to get laid (John Hawkes), the new guy (William
Fichtner) who immediately antagonizes a crewmate and
the quiet, French guy (Allen Payne). So many problems
strike the opening segment of the film that the
remaining portions directly suffer. It is not the
all-star cast's fault, just the characters designed
for their portrayal. Allen Payne's character never
speaks in the entire movie, not because he is mute,
but because he's never given any lines! Are we
supposed to root for a guy whose face and voice we are
never given a chance to interact with? Fichtner's
character is terribly underdeveloped - we don't know
what he's doing there, where he's from, or who he's
supposed to be. The remaining four fishermen are all
cardboard stereotypes (Hawkes says to a female
stranger in one scene "You know what would look good
on you? Me!" Ooooh real creative).
As the script advances and the Andrea Gail floats
farther out into the waters, the crew continues to not
feel human. Only when the storm takes center stage
does the movie jump out of its sleepwalk. The
computer-generated images of gigantic waves crashing
against a helpless boat are thunderously real. I can
only imagine if this was an IMAX film, this city kid
would surely never go in the water again. This is
loud, jolting entertainment - adjectives that
completely negate the rest of the film. 
The Perfect Storm was unfortunately a disappointment.
The maelstrom lived up to its potential but everything
else failed to do so. I guess I'll stick to that other
Survival spectacleyou know the one on CBS?

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Starring Rob Schneider, William Forsythe, Eddie Griffin, Arija Bareikis, Oded
Fehr, Richard Riehl, and Norm MacDonald.
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" is a film that gives star Rob Schneider a perfect
chance to meander the streets with no clothes on. This heinous image is
sprinkled throughout the film to everyone's chagrin. Why would we want to see
thisespecially on the big screen? If this image is triggered to disgust its
audience, it certainly succeeds. There are points where it is almost impossible
to stare at the screen. Some films of this same gross-out genre are highly
entertaining for one reason. They disgust and entertain simultaneously because
they are either innovative or hilarious. "Deuce Bigalow" lacks these two
qualities causing the disgust factor to greatly outweigh the entertainment
factor. Most of the jokes were unoriginal, either tired spoofs from other films
(there were two idiotic Matrix spoofs in two different scenes) or blatantly
stolen from its predecessors (an angry dog bangs against a door almost
identically to the dog in "There's Something About Mary"). If I wanted to see
funny gags just like those of past movies, I would see past movies. It's
cheaper and much simpler. The saddest thing about "Deuce Bigalow" is that its
mentor is an unfunny Adam Sandler flick. By copying off unsatisfactory movies
like "Happy Gilmore" or "Billy Madison" in which the loser does something crazy
but winds up getting a hot girl at the end, Rob Schneider's movie is even more
unsatisfactory. Now I know why Sandler himself produced this film; he is trying
to make his pictures look better. 
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" tells the story of sad, pathetic Deuce, a
worthless pervert who also happens to be a fish freak who cleans fish tanks.
Under some wacky circumstances, Deuce finds himself making money as a gigolo so
he can pay off debts to a real gigolo whose house he ruined. As a "man-whore,"
as they call male prostitutes, Deuce ends up tagging along on dates with
bizarre women who no one else will go out with. He escorts an incredibly large
woman, an incredibly tall woman, a narcoleptic, a woman with Tourette's
syndrome, and of course the woman of his dreams. It is hard to root for
Schneider in his role. He is just so pathetic and slimy to start out with, that
when he begins to date these women the enthusiasm to see him succeed is very
low. At least Sandler is like the guy next door you go to sports games with.
Schneider's character is just such a jerk that eventually he becomes
excessively irritating. 
The film follows a one-joke premise that dies off half way through. Although
this may be one of the shortest movies of the Winter, with the openings of
nearly a dozen three hour plus films, it seemed a lot longer than an hour and a
half. Its predictable plot is mostly responsible for this. Also its terrible
acting from the talented William Forsythe, who spends the whole film
complaining about the size of his private part, to Norm MacDonald, who had a
quick and forgetful cameo as a bartender.  
The saddest thing about this movie is that it, and the many others like it, are
successful at the box office meaning they will continue to multiply and top
more deserving films. The scariest, and only real thought that popped into my
brain after watching this movie (besides the fact that I think it made me
stupider) is that if this movie copied off the very disappointing Sandler
flicks, then will future films copy off "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo." I
continue to shiver at the thought.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
Written by Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone ,
Starring Eddie Murphy, Martin Lawrence, Obba Babatunde, Ned Beatty, Bernie Mac,
Ric James, Bokeem Woodbine, Clarence Williams III, Miguel A. Nunez Jr., R. Lee
Ermey, Noah Emmerich, Ned Vaughan, Brent Jennings, Michael Taliferro, Nick
Cassavetes 
          "Life" is a confused film that could have been more pleasing if it
stuck to an idea. The film presents its audience with a 1930's gambling
adventure (beginning), comic violence  in a prison full of the depressed
(middle), and dramatic issues of racism (end). These plots individually could
be great movie ideas but together in one film it seems as if the writer could
not decide which one to use so he crammed all three into one story. "Life"
follows this doomed formula of mediocre story telling because it does not know
which type of audience it wants to attract. However, once it tries to mix all
different kinds of attractions, it does not please anyone. The film could have
been a lot funnier, especially with the presence of Eddie Murphy and Martin
Lawrence, but instead it attempts to remain serious with a slight comic twist
to it. The problem is every time it tries to be funny it is not and every time
it tries to be serious it is funny. With Murphy and Lawrence in this film, it
is expected that these two characters will cause comedic havoc wherever they go
and brighten up the environment around them. "Life" tries to do this but fails
because not enough scenes are devoted for the two jokers to show their skills.
The film tries too hard to prove that racism is bad, with a number of foolish
stories to show this, that we never learn about any of the characters suffering
from it. Tons of characters are introduced but never developed so that when
they eventually disappear, they are not missed like they are supposed to.
Murphy and Lawrence are supposed to receive sympathy from their viewers for
being put in jail for life but they never do because not enough of their lives
are shown in jail. It takes too much time for director Ted Demme to explain how
and why they were put in jail. Demme uses an unnecessary unpredictable subplot
during this time slot which inevitably comes back at the end to no one's
surprise. If this section was edited down and more information was given about
the prison life and prisoners, then maybe the film would have worked. 
        "Life" follows two black men Claude Banks (Lawrence) and Ray Gibson (Murphy)
as they are framed for murder by racist police officers in 1930's Mississippi.
They must spend the rest of their lives in an all black prison for a crime they
did not commit. In this prison they don't really learn anything but instead the
whole time they try to find a way out. I am not sure if the characters were
supposed to be changed men after this whole experience but it certainly did not
appear this way. When they entered, they were cursing scheming young men, and
towards the end, they were cursing scheming old men. The plot about these two
men does not completely sum up the movie because there are so many unnecessary
subplots with other characters (a mute and the warden's daughter have a child
together, a gay man tries to discover who he really is) that completely ruin
the film. These subplots are repeatedly brought back into the picture and
because they are so forgettable the first time around, they must be explained
the second time around as well. The film gets so confused at times that when it
tries to execute its most dramatic moment, as a prisoner commits suicide by
getting shot while escaping the prison, the viewer is puzzled as to what is
happening.  This puzzlement is, luckily, somewhat cured by the chemistry Murphy
and Lawrence have in the few scenes they are given to shine together. There is
an incredibly inane part in which the two stop talking, for 40 years (!!). This
does not make any sense because the reason why this film is attractive at all
is because of the interesting chemistry these two comedic talents might
develop. In some of the more successful scenes, Lawrence and Murphy just seem
to be having fun together and consequently make the movie more fun. These few
and far apart scenes most likely were improvised on the spot by the actors.
Especially when compared to the many and close together scenes in which cliched
and forced lines are put into their mouths. This movie should have been their
movie, their own play house where anything could happen. This unpredictability
could have created a more interesting result than this sometimes on, mostly off
film.

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Starring Denzel Washington, John Hannah, Live Schreiber, Deborah Kara Unger,
Viscellous Reon Shannon, Dan Hedaya, Harris Yulin, David Paymer, Clancy Brown,
and Rod Steiger.
Directed by Norman Jewison
Written by Armayan Bernstein and Dan Gordon
Denzel Washington is among the many actors this holiday season to give very
impressive milestone performances. This perhaps may be Washington's very best
to date. He joins Matt Damon and Jim Carrey in having the talent, this season,
to become his character, copying mannerisms and personal styles perfectly. His
very believable performance makes the long and uninteresting "The Hurricane" a
much better film than it actually is. When his Rubin "Hurricane" Carter feels
pain and is tormented by racism, he creates for the audience a great sense of
sympathy, disgust, and maybe even some embarrassment from the fact that this is
our very own country that is breaking laws to support silly prejudices. The
horrific true events Carter suffered from all of his life are slightly more
disturbing and terrifying because they only took place a few decades ago. The
powerful expressions of Denzel Washington alone, as his tortured Carter, sum up
the troubles of racism in America's history. He is that amazing. The problem
with "The Hurricane" is that when compared to Washington, all of the other
actors are not nearly as memorable in their roles. Mainly because the script
focuses so much on Carter, that it leaves little interest or room for the other
actors. This is, without a doubt, Washington's movie but in order for any film
to be completely satisfying, it must utilize everyone in the cast to their
highest potential not just the stars.  
Denzel Washington is the only reason to see this film for his inspirational and
very depressing tour de force performance. As Rubin Carter, we see a black man
whose existence has been a punching bag for the white American court system.
>From the age of eleven to twenty one he was sent to a juvenile prison for a
crime he did not commit. Then after a successful marriage and boxing career, he
was harshly imprisoned again for life after being framed for a triple murder.
Carter's second term in prison seemed almost inevitable when faced off against
jealous, powerful white men who refused to let him succeed. From these past
experiences in jail, Carter realized that he must make his case heard for all
of America. After several court appeals, an autobiography, and many public
marches for his freedom, Carter remained locked in prison. It was not until a
young black boy from Brooklyn being educated in Toronto read Carter's book in
the 1980's, that a serious battle for freedom took place. The young boy and his
three Canadian guardians decide to dedicate all of their time to the case until
Carter is released. 
The greatest scenes in the film are when Carter begins to lose his mind after
spending three months in isolation. Washington really shows the breakdown of
Carter when after swearing he would never go to jail again, he is unfairly
framed at the height of his innocent career. The devastation in Washington's
eyes show a man who has struggled to do the right thing his whole life only to
be punished for it. In the hole, Carter attempts to maintain emotional balance
but he cannot. His anger is heightened to a point of no control. We see
multiple Carters, a violent angry one, a silent passive one, and a mediator. We
see an emotional boxing match inside Carter's head. From this point in the hole
to the end of the film, this fight continues. It is very apparent at times
which side is winning the battle and in some scenes there is a direct switch
from angry to caring or the opposite. When Carter sees that white Canadians
want to help him get out of prison, the angry Carter at first erupts. White
people have been trying to hurt him his whole life, this reminder leads to
anger in his head. However, as the film continues and the Canadians continue to
help Carter we see the calm side him. He realizes that society is changing.
That racism is decreasing and now Carter wants to leave jail immediately and
become a part of this world. Very rarely have I seen such determination to
perfect his role as Washington has done here. If only the other actors had this
same determination.
Dan Hedaya, ridiculously plays the man who sends Carter to prison twice by
forcing witnesses to lie and switching evidence around. It felt like his
character was taken straight out of a "Scooby Doo" episode; he would have
gotten away with it if it wasn't for those annoying little kids. "The kids" in
this film are the three Canadians who are terribly underused making their
relationship with Carter underdeveloped and unbelievable. The lawyers who help
release Carter also are underused, as is Clancy Brown as a kind prison guard
(the complete opposite of his character in "Shawshank Redemption"). There is a
great amount of talent in this supporting cast but it just never appears.
Hedaya was superb in "Clueless," same for David Paymer in "Get Shorty," Harris
Yulin in "Ghostbusters" and Liev Schreiber in "The Daytrippers." It is a
mystery how this many actors signed on to such shallow roles. On the other
hand, it is absolutely no mystery why Denzel Washington agreed to play Rubin
"Hurricane" Carter. This role is about as far off from shallow as you can get.

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"Double Jeopardy" (1999) * (out of four)
Tommy Lee Jones chases an innocent victim around
America who is trying to prove that she did not kill
her spouse.  The Fugitive? Not quiteThis is the plot
for Double Jeopardy, another Fugitive copycat without
the action, excitement, and good acting that the
original had. There are other slight differences
besides one movie being bad and the other good; this
time Tommy Lee Jones plays a parole officer not a US
Marshall, clever huh? Oh and the fugitive Ashley Judd
was framed by her own husband (Bruce Greenwood) who
needed to collect two million dollars in life
insurance money not a one armed man. Both movies are
on video. Make the wise choice and pick The Fugitive. 
There are so many flaws in Double Jeopardy, it is
laughable. While serving time in prison, Libby Parsons
(Judd) discovers that she can never be charged for
committing the same crime twice. Learning that her
husband is still alive, she decides to serve her time
in prison, find him, retrieve her son, and kill her
husband if necessary. When the strict Parole Officer
Travis Lehman (Jones) stands in her way, Libby decides
to break the rules (who knows why?) and continue her
plan, despite the fact that if she gets caught, she's
going back to jail. 
Director Bruce Beresford spends way too much time
trying to convince the audience that Libby misses her
son. Every other scene, we are given a shot of Libby
staring and crying at his picture. In an action movie
like this, valuable time wasted on these shots takes
away more opportunities for Libby to get up and do
something. All that is needed in this type of movie is
a short scene in which Libby tells herself or a friend
"I miss my son." Nothing more, nothing less. Dr.
Kimble of The Fugitive didn't look at one picture of
his dead wife, his primary concern was to save
himself. Libby at times shows this same determination
but not nearly enough. 
Ashley Judd and Bruce Greenwood both are excellent
actors but if they continue to do movies like this,
they will be typecast for the rest of their careers,
kind of like their doomed co-star Tommy Lee Jones.
Winning an Oscar for The Fugitive must have convinced
Jones that audiences will never get tired of his
I-do-my-job-whether-they-are-innocent-or-guilty roles.
People still pay to see his movies and he makes plenty
of money so I guess he was right. Though I don't think
he will win another Oscar again.
The ultimate mistake in the script is what eventually
becomes of Libby Parsons. Even if she was excused for
disobeying her Parole Officer, the number of other
crimes she commits while on the run are too numerous
to count. Burglary, assault, grand theft auto are some
of Libby's slipups. The message of the movie is you
can break all of the small laws as long as you're
innocent of the major crime. Hopefully criminals won't
use Double Jeopardy as a reference in court for why
they are innocent. That would just be plain stupid. 

Title
Review for Third Man, The (1949)
Starring Joseph Cotten, Orson Welles, Alida Valli, Trevor Howard, Bernard Lee,
and Wilfrid Hyde-White
"The Third Man" tells the story of a writer, Holly Martins, searching for the
true details regarding the mysterious death of a close friend Harry Lime. This
brief outline of the plot makes "The Third Man" sound like the majority of
films in the noir genre. However, Carol Reed's masterpiece is far from the
norm. The setting takes place in post World War 2 Vienna, Austria, a very
chaotic atmosphere in which the Allied Powers police the streets and the black
market dominates the economy. Since Vienna contains a number of different
nationalities living in the same region, there are various communication
problems and because of this, it is difficult to tell who is on whose side.
Reed takes full advantage of this chaotic, paranoid environment. His
unbelievable control over light and dark is what specifically makes this film
stand out from others. His use of shadows in dark alley ways or sewers creates
some memorable chase scenes. In these scenes, Reed mainly displays shadows
chasing after shadows, with very few shots of the actual humans. This is
extremely clever because with shadows you never know exactly where someone is
and also with dark figures it adds to the mysteriousness of the environment.
Reed presents some of the most beautiful black and white shots have ever seen.
It is truly amazing how detailed he makes some of the night scenes.
"The Third Man" is also strongly supported with an excellent script by novelist
Graham Greene. As the film progresses, we learn more and more about the
supposedly accidental murder of Lime (Orson Welles) and who Lime really is. The
film begins with Martins (Joseph Cotten) learning about Lime's accidental death
but when he reaches the funeral there is a very strained and dubious mood. This
mood shows that Lime's death certainly has another story to it. Thus the
mystery begins with Martins interviewing Lime's friends. Through these
interviews Lime and the viewer simultaneously discover more evidence until a
porter informs us that there was a third man carrying Lime's body when everyone
else swore there were only two. At this point in the film, paranoia reaches its
zenith. It is very difficult to tell what exactly is going on. Who is lying?
Who is telling the truth? Who is to trust? Who is the third man?? Greene asks
these questions and does not give the answer until you least expect it.
The performances in the film are also flawless. Cotten plays Martins perfectly
as your not-so-average hero. He drinks heavily, he is a failing writer, and he
does not get the girl. You may not even agree with some of his final moral
decisions. Martins' appearance just shows that the effects of the war were
devastating and virulent on all. Since Martins, once very successful, was
obviously hurt by the war even though the film never really adresses the topic.
The outcome of Welles' Harry Lime is another effect of the war. Driven away
from democracy, Lime goes against his friends and loved ones to succeed.
Welles' short but sweet performance answers all of the film's questions about
Lime in a heartbeat.
As this film turns fifty years old, it incredibly still contains the same
adrenaline. A must-see for film noir fans and to those looking for another
masterpiece starring Orson Welles and Joseph Cotten.
visit new web site by Lars Lindahl - Lars Attacks
http://www.angelfire.com/ny3/larsattacks

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
"The Iron Giant" (***1/2) (out of four stars)
Directed by Brad Bird
Written by Brad Bird and Tim McCanlies
Starring the voices of  Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel, Jennifer Aniston, Harry
Connick Jr., Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, James Gammon, Cloris Leachman,
M. Emmet Walsh 
"The Iron Giant" is a great achievement in feature length animation. It is one
of the few this decade to simultaneously teach a valuable lesson, entertain all
ages, and accurately reenter an era of America's regretful past. The best part
about this film is that it actually captures a number of distinct emotions and
characters of our recent past half a century ago. Through the reaction to the
entrance of this foreign giant, paranoia and trust battle each other out and
determine the fate of the situation. This battle creates an intense,
depressing, and humorous outcome. The stable balance of these three factors
makes "The Iron Giant" so special. It contradicts the spreading trend of just
using animation to create wacky and unimaginable characters. The characters
most definitely have existed in this time of American history and "The Iron
Giant" uses this reality to create real emotions and understandable decisions
from both perspectives. The film is also an argument that the government is
mainly to blame for the Cold War. By making the army and a government agent the
villains, the film shows that America is fighting America. One part of this
country did not blow situations out of proportion and examined them before
making decisions. Another part of this country decided before they examined
that anything foreign or new was a threat to the country. A number of times the
film tells the giant (and the audience) to choose who they are for themselves
without outside interference. "The Iron Giant" mainly is an argument against
the use of violence to solve issues. It asks the question of who to follow in a
time of crisis, yourself or the mass majority (in this case the government and
army). 
These messages are given within the plot which is mostly formulaic except for
its fantastic, heart pounding ending. This is not to say that formulaic is bad.
"The Iron Giant" can be easily compared to "E.T." and equals it in its process
of story telling and lesson teaching. The story takes place in a small town in
Maine during 1957, a time when nuclear attacks were feared and B-horror movies
thrived. A number of spoofs involving the culture of the time are cleverly
added into the script which should entertain adults who grew up during that
time period. A young boy, Hogarth Hughes, (Eli Marienthal in a wonderful vocal
performance) discovers an iron giant (Vin Diesel) near his town and develops a
secret friendship with it. Hogarth teaches the giant how to say basic words, he
teaches him that killing is bad and death should be natural, and he teaches him
to behave like superman protecting the innocent citizens from danger. However,
this relationship is endangered when the army sets out to destroy it no matter
who gets in the way. Christopher McDonald, who always seems to play the bad guy
nowadays, voices Kent Mansley, the man determined to bring the robot down at
all costs by calling in the army once he receives evidence.  
This film proves that animated feature length films can definitely appear on a
film critic's top ten list of movies of the year. Its spectacular ending wraps
together a large amount of the Cold War. The paranoia, the control of the
government, and the fear of foreigners entering the home front. The animation
in the film also deserves credit for its great story telling. Brad Bird
masterfully uses close ups and long shots in a number of scenes. He focuses on
a close up, then slowly blurs it out and closes in on an image farther away.
This style of drawing is very effective because it makes the scenery more real
and as a result makes the content more believable. "The Iron Giant" is the best
animated film since "The Lion King" and it deserves even more credit because it
does not have the comfortable cushion of Disney marketing and advertising. A
wonderful film only held back by some hackneyed lines and scenes. The positives
greatly outweigh the negatives in every category. 

Title
Review for From Here to Eternity (1953)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
"From Here to Eternity" (1953) ***1/2 (out of four)
Starring Burt Lancaster, Montgomery Clift, Frank
Sinatra, Donna Reed, Deborah Kerr, Philip Ober,
and Ernest Borgnine 
"We may seem all alike. We ain't all alike." Private
Robert E. Lee Prewitt (Montgomery Clift) tells his
newly found lover in the middle of a crowded Hawaiian
bar. Prewitt is representing men in society - how they
ostensibly are exactly the same, but in actuality are
as individual as can be.  The 1953 classic From Here
to Eternity dedicates its entire running time to
proving this quote, and with all of the interesting
male characters it introduces - it succeeds. From the
loner, to the alcoholic, to the adulterer, to the
torturer, to the gentleman, the only thing that links
these unique individuals is the military suit they
wear to work everyday. Living in the same vicinity
just prior to the attack on Pearl Harbor, the
cooperation of these men seems infinitely more
difficult to them than fighting in the war. 
Between these five central characters preparing for a
world war, a powerful emotional war takes place. And
when the Japanese surprise attack on Pearl Harbor
occurs starting World War II in America, it provides a
thunderous conclusion to this war. The film opens with
the arrival of the sensitive Prewitt, a former
professional bugle player and boxer for the army who
inexplicably wants to become a private. This is all
sounds perfect to Captain Dana Holmes (Philip Ober), a
man eager to become a major and finds the only way to
move up a rank is to have a winning boxing team. But
Prewitt has quit boxing and says there is nothing in
the world that will convince him to do so again. This
angers Holmes who has his officers, including Sergeant
Milton Warden (Burt Lancaster), train Prewitt
especially hard until he finally changes his mind. The
only soldier who supports Prewitt is Angelo Maggio
(Frank Sinatra), a man who knows all the hot spots in
town and regularly gets drunk for entertainment. So
drunk at times that it gets him an enemy named
Sergeant "Fatso" Judson (Ernest Borgnine) who swears
he will get Maggio one day. Meanwhile Sergeant Warden
is having an illicit affair with his Captain's
depressed and lonely wife (Deborah Kerr). 
Did that just sound like an example of your everyday
soap opera? Yes, there are a lot of characters in From
Here to Eternity (in fact I left out Lorene (Donna
Reed), a woman Prewitt meets and falls in love with at
one of the clubs he stops by at). Do not be mistaken,
this movie is a soap opera, several things are
happening at the same time - but unlike something on
CBS at 2 P.M., the acting and directing in this movie
is amazing. Also despite the large cast, impressively
there isn't one confusing moment and the script, based
on the controversial novel by James Jones, ingeniously
connects everyone with everyone. By the end, there
will be a large collision.  
The mistake the film makes is that the female
characters stand in the way. The relationships between
Prewitt and Lorene, and Warden and the Captain's wife
Karen, are both unconvincing due to expedient set ups
by director Fred Zinneman. Just when you start to
believe that these people actually are beginning to
love each other, the movie is already ten steps ahead,
raising the possibility of marriage. Both love affairs
are so melodramatic and predictable that they hold
back the entire movie. 
Winner of 8 Academy Awards in 1953 including Best
Picture, Best Supporting Actress (Donna Reed), and
Best Supporting Actor (Frank Sinatra), I was somewhat
shocked that Reed won. She just didn't amaze me as
much as other winners of the prestigious award (at
least she was better than Beatrice Straight in
Network). Sinatra, on the other hand, really surprised
me as Angelo Maggio. Simultaneously hilarious and
depressing, he single-handedly shifted this film's
status from good to classic. 
Zinneman, to show his range, directed this movie just
before Oklahoma! and just after High Noon. He
skillfully hints at the upcoming Pearl Harbor attack
with newspaper articles, dates, and images scattered
everywhere that tease the audience and build up
suspense for the unavoidable incident. And when the
moment finally comes, the execution is satisfyingly
accurate.  You can tell this was a surprise attack by
men running back and forth for cover with just towels
on. 
>From Here to Eternity revolves around a war yet to
happen. It looks at American society right before the
country's entry in the war; a quiet period compared to
the disorder that soon follows. But the beauty of the
film is that it is far from quiet. The emotional
dilemmas that these characters face is as powerful and
realistic as any battle sequence in a World War II
film such as Saving Private Ryan.

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Starring David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Drew Barrymore, Skeet
Ulrich, Jamie Kennedy, Rose McGowan, Matthew Lillard, W. Earl Brown, Henry
Winkler, Live Schreiber, and Linda Blair.         
When I first heard about Scream in 1996, I was told that it was a spoof of
horror movies. From the master of the horror himself, Wes Craven, it ridiculed
the cliches of the genre by overemphasizing them, by making the teenagers do
what they know they're not supposed to do when a serial killer is stalking them
(don't run up the stairs when you can easily go out the front door, never say
"I'll be right back," etc.). When I first heard this description, I figured
that it was an easy way out of making a bad movie. How hard is it to make an
extremely terrible film but claim it is actually a mockery of other bad movies.
Was this Wes Craven's remedy from making "real" bad movies such as Vampires in
Brooklyn? It just seemed cheap to me. 
Then I actually saw the movie and the first twenty minutes, involving Drew
Barrymore and a nail-bitingly intense phone conversation, completely changed my
attitude. Scream is not only a clever parody of your standard horror flick,
it's also a pretty scary movie. If you've seen a million of these kinds of
films, you know exactly what is going to happen. This is part of the fun of
watching Scream. The movie reminds avid horror fans how similar and repetitive
the genre is and it also reminds them how great a guilty pleasure it can be to
watch pointless and predictable violence to innocent, attractive teenagers. To
those who rarely see these types of movies, Scream is a thrilling unpredictable
ride that could be mistaken as a serious slasher film. There's nothing wrong
with that misjudgment though. I have witnessed viewers from both sides of the
audience, the newbies to horror and the fanatics. Their opinions on the film
were so different but both very positive. From these varied reviews, I am
convinced that Scream has not only revived the teen horror movie and the normal
teen romance movies but also the hilarious parodies of these and other
categories. Films that both deride and celebrate genres like Galaxy Quest and
The Big Hit would not have existed, in my opinion, if it was not for the
outstanding success of Scream. The low - budget 1996 gem may, alongside Pulp
Fiction, be the most influential film of the 1990's. This influence may exist
to the chagrin of some moviegoers who despise movies like Teaching Mrs. Tingle
or television programs such as Dawson's Creek but to others such as myself, we
congratulate the movie that has opened new doors for excellent young actors,
screenwriters, and directors. 
Scream is also an extremely funny movie thanks to its quickly-paced script by
Kevin Williamson. Within the film are characters who tell other characters, as
well as the audience, the basic rules and cliches of a horror movie. Mainly
from the rants of Randy (Jamie Kennedy) and Stu (Matthew Lillard), we are
reminded not only of the obvious and hilarious rules but also some of the more
subtle stereotypes that when thought over are mostly true as well (the virgin
always survives; have sex and you're dead meat). Not only are we treated these
rules on a plate but also the rules are referenced to a number of different
films and actors. The script feels like an obsessive essay from a college film
geek who has nothing better to do but find every little blunder from every
little film for his own self-satisfaction.  In this case, Williamson finds
these errors for the audience's satisfaction and amusement. I hear there is a
new movie coming out called Scary Movie which is a spoof of Scream, which is a
spoof of scary movies. I will certainly see the film but I have the feeling
that this parody will be more obviously ridiculing the genre rather than
Scream's perfect subtlety. However my last gut feeling about this stuff,
Scream, was dead wrong... so who knows.

Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
Liberty Heights. Copyright Š 1999. Rated PG-13.
Starring Joe Mantegna, Adrien Brody, Ben Foster, Bebe Neuwirth
by Lars Lindahl, high school student
     Barry Levinson can safely be called "the master of Baltimore
cinema". He has done exceptional work in the past focusing on this city, from
"Tin Men" to "Avalon" to "Diner". And he has also been able to bring this sixth
sense to the small screen with the mesmerizing "Homicide: Life on the Streets".
It's no wonder Levinson has written and directed yet another film to his
recognized collection. 
"Liberty Heights" follows two generations of an average Jewish family living in
Liberty Heights, Baltimore in the 1950's. The family faces racism and rejection
at the local swimming pool, in the court house, and by the police. The
nostalgia presented is a terrifying look at how are society was function less
than half a century ago. The film contains some hilarious and some heart
wrenching scenes but over length seriously hurts the mood and nothing big
happens to keep the audience truly entertained and attentive. It plays like an
episode of a dramedy television show-however it is like the episode before the
finale, where everything is built up very specifically but nothing huge comes
out of it because it will be shown in the finale next week. However, this is a
movie. There are no episodes and therefore the plot must not only be developed
but something must come out of this development. In "Liberty Heights" there is
no distinct climax.  
 The film is broken up into three sections, following three members of
the family. The father, Nate, (Joe Mantegna) runs a strip joint which is not
drawing profits from its desired range of customers. In order to change the
gloomy future of his failing business, Nate decides to add gambling for his
customers to enjoy. This plan, however, backfires when an unemployed man wins
five hundred thousand dollars and Nate is unable to pay. This section of the
movie was the least developed and seemed out of place from the other teen
romance subplots. If Levinson was trying to make the film about the Jewish
family as a whole, then why did he leave out a section focusing on the mother
(Bebe Neuwirth) and her interaction with society? Instead Neuwirth is an
automaton who's only purpose in the film is to comfort or scold the male family
members when they are misbehaving or troubled. 
The oldest son, played by Adrien Brody, is seriously in love with a girl he is
not supposed to go near. After he and his friends sneak into a non-Jewish
party, Brody is swept away by a mysterious girl who he soon after cannot stop
thinking of. This story, at first starts out very vibrant and vivacious, but as
it drags on there are no surprises to maintain interest. Brody is excellent in
another wonderful performance, but the supporting cast is very cliched and
dull. 
        Ben Foster plays the youngest son fittingly named Ben. This is
the most interesting of the three stories because it is funny, tragic, and
romantic without one of these elements dominating the others. Ben is a curious
boy who wonders what the world is like outside of the Jewish community. This
curiosity leads to a forbidden friendship with an African American girl played
superbly by Rebekah Johnson. Together they learn more about each other and
about themselves. Racism plays an important role in this subplot as the
characters must fight against it in order to remain bonded. A powerful message
is given by Levinson stating that the youngest generation is the most open-
minded and the most mature. One obvious problem is that Levinson, out of
nowhere, adds a completely unnecessary scene containing, you guessed it, bodily
fluids. Is this a requirement now for films in the 90's? You know there is a
serious problem when a film trying to explain the seriousness of discrimination
adds a scene which can be directly compared to a scene in "There's Something
About Mary."
  Levinson's most recent film contains many superb performances and an
important story line which educates the audience. There were just too many
scenes with no importance and too many characters with no importance. If
Levinson had cut some of these scenes and characters out and had focused more
on creating a better ending, then "Liberty Heights" would have been an
interesting, entertaining, educating movie.
Email: sidspaced@aol.com
Liberty Heights. Copyright Š 1999. Rated PG-13.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
Directed by Mike Nichols
Written by Michael Leeson, Garry Shandling, Ed Solomon, and Peter Tolan 
Starring Garry Shandling, Annette Bening, Greg Kinnear, Ben Kingsley, Linda
Fiorentino, and John Goodman.  
What Planet Are You From? can be divided into three distinct segments. First we
follow alien Harold Anderson (Garry Shandling) on his mission to impregnate a
woman on earth. Far and away the funniest segment of the film (despite the fact
that it is one long extended joke), it remains consistently amusing. We don't
know exactly why he is trying to woo an earth woman but it is still funny. The
dialogue is fresh, the characters are well introduced, and the premise is
original. The most hilarious and ironic joke of this segment is that this
clueless alien, just trying to complete a revolutionary mission for his planet
is indistinguishable from some obnoxious earth jerk just trying to score. 
For this reason, Harold finds himself interacting and bonding with sexist
perverts such as Perry (Greg Kinnear) at his fake job. His relationship with
these characters makes up the second segment of the film. At this point, What
Planet? begins to lose some of its fresh humor and originality as it shifts
from Harold's desperate search to succeed for his planet to a disappointing
who's-sleeping-with-who-and-why ensemble piece. The segment contains way too
many pointless side stories that would have made the movie better if they did
not exist at all. Who cares if Perry and Harold are competing for a vice
president position at their job? Or if the man trying to find out exactly who
Harold is (John Goodman) is having marital problems at home? The answers to
these questions only distract the viewer from the central point.
The third segment has Harold taking the next step by marrying a former
alcoholic,  Susan, (Annette Bening) in hopes of improving his chances to have a
child. There are some very memorable scenes between Susan and Harold, but these
pleasant moments surprisingly lead up to one of the most idiotic endings I've
seen in a long time. The characters become excessively cartoonish and, out of
nowhere, the script gives them extremely foolish lines. It gets mushy and
overly dramatic in some areas and way too slapstick in other areas. It almost
seems like a different screenwriter or director contributed at this point with
completely opposite ideas of how the characters should act and talk. 
When examining the film as a whole, it is a disappointment, because only one
segment is totally satisfying. Despite some lively performances from the
talented cast, the script does not have enough energy to keep up. It seems like
there was only one real joke within What Planet? and that joke was quickly
overused just as the first segment was ending. If only the movie was a 40
minute short in which Harold gets the girl, has sex, gets the girl pregnant,
and leaves. It might have worked, and if not, the short would have been a lot
better than the real thing, a 120 minute movie that didn't work. For true
entertainment in which aliens pretend to be humans with hilarious consequences,
watch Third Rock from the Sun. It's amazing how that show has been funny for
years now using the same joke that What Planet Are You From? couldn't make
funny for two hours. 

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Directed by Tim Burton
Written by Kevin Yagher
Starring Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Michael Gambon, Miranda Richardson,
Michael Gough, Jeffrey Jones, Lisa Marie, Christopher Lee
Tim Burton has quite a talent of finding a multitude of creepy, dreadful
looking actors to fill roles in his creepy, dreadful films. These actors are so
perfect for roles in Burton's normal dark, bleak style of telling a story that
they rightfully so appear in a number of his movies. Their mannerisms could
scare a child or even an adult, for that matter. Without these actors, Burton
could only complete half of what he is trying to accomplish. Jeffrey Jones, one
of America's greatest character actors, is a member of this unique entourage of
frightening thespians. He holds such odd characteristics with his facial
movements, especially the wicked glare that always seems to be on his face. His
disturbed look is perfect for Burton's disturbed movies and that is why Jones
has appeared in "Beetlejuice", "Ed Wood", and now "Sleepy Hollow" Burton
especially uses Jones' distinct glare in "Sleepy Hollow". Every time powerful
figures of the upstate New York town discuss the gruesome murders by the
headless horseman, there is a certain uneasiness among these men. Jones' glare
shows they are up to no good. Along with Jones, the posse of frighteners
includes Christopher Walken, Michael Gough, Martin Landau, Lisa Marie, and
Johnny Depp.
Depp, in his third Tim Burton film ("Ed Wood" and "Edward Scissorhands" were
the first two), always plays a guy who is over the edge but seems normal to the
audience when compared to the other characters in the film. "Sleepy Hollow" is
no exception to this description Depp does a wonderful job playing Icabod
Crane, a constable from New York City sent to investigate mysterious murders in
Sleepy Hollow in which the murdered victims are found decapitated, their heads
nowhere to be found. The townspeople think it is a headless horseman who has
come back to haunt the area where he was killed. Crane refuses to believe this
and tries to solve the case with logic and common sense. Depp portrays the main
character with excellent acting. We know Crane is haunted by something in the
past the first time we seem him, thanks to the cautious, frightened look
eternally plastered on his face. We know Crane is different from everyone else
because of past experiences. Due to this difference, Crane never seems to fit
in with the people or the environment. A great distinction between the heroic
Crane and the heroic action star is that Crane is actually afraid of things
worthy of fear. Depp shows this fear by fainting after every action sequence,
constantly babbling when he wakes, and even jumping on a chair to avoid a
harmless tarantula. However, Burton could have gone farther with the phobia
stricken protagonist. A number of times Crane tells his helpers to "wait here"
or "I'll go ahead" while he enters the mysterious region. If Crane is so
frightened of a tarantula, why does he suddenly gain enough courage to face the
headless horseman? That miniscule portion of the film was not too believable. 
The action scenes "Sleepy Hollow" were first rate. The powerful Headless
Horseman was like an ancient Michael Myers. No matter how hard you hit him or
shot him or burned him, he'd get up and keep chasing you. This invincibility
made scenes unpredictable and entertaining. The film was suspenseful, scary,
and gory. Innumerable characters lost their heads in bloody, loud, and
disturbing ways. Burton did an outstanding job of showing characters with heads
one moment and no heads the next. The way he completed some of these murder
scenes were ingenious works of art. The sounds alone of the sword cutting off
the head could run a chill down the spine. Danny Elfman's score also helped
create an eerie background to the already eerie environment. 
The only major problem with "Sleepy Hollow" was the romantic side story between
Crane and Katrina Van Tassel (Christina Ricci), the daughter of a wealthy
resident of Sleepy Hollow.  The relationship was rushed and unbelievable. The
speed of the two characters falling in love made absolutely no sense. There was
no surprise of what would happen later on concerning these two in the end of
the film. The performances by the two actors was still fine work. Ricci, who
was perfect in "The Addams Family" films, seemed destined to appear in a Burton
film. It would not be surprising if she appeared in another in the future. 
"Sleepy Hollow" is another fine Burton film. Although it contained a few
imperfections, like most of Burton's repertoire, the positives greatly
outweighed the negatives. The visuals I the film were breathtaking and vividly
accurate. The woods were more frightening in this picture than in "The Blair
Witch Project". Are recent films trying to tell viewers to stay out of the
woods and stay in the movie theaters?

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Jason Isaacs, Joely
Richardson, Tcheky Karyo, Chris Cooper and Tom
Wilkinson
As a revolutionary war hero in The Patriot, Mel Gibson
provides another macho man performance for Hollywood
audiences. You know the type: his shirt is always
shredded, his face always scarred, he has a soft spot
for his loved ones and a "to kill" list for his
enemies. Oscar-hungry director/executive producer
Roland Emmerich did not intend to, but he made the
stereotypical action hero for the 18th century. As
Gibson delivers lines like, "Before this war is over,
I am going to kill you," Schwarzenegger in Commando or
Stallone in Cobra immediately come to mind. Oddly
enough, The Patriot is as much an epic
three-hour-tear-fest like Gladiator, as it is a
ninety-minute guilty pleasure. At times absorbing, at
others enjoyably insipid, this is good, bloody Summer
fun. 
I probably would have despised this film had it not
been released over the July 4th weekend. Some of the
images are so zealously Americanized (the flag is used
as a lifesaving weapon for example), that Independence
Day seems the only appropriate time of year to
wholeheartedly accept it. Like Emmerich's ID4, this is
obvious propaganda where the Americans are the hapless
underdogs motivated by freedom for all. Sure it's
predictable and melodramatic, but for a moment after
leaving the theater, I was dumbfounded with
patriotism. And isn't that the point of The Patriot? 
Gibson plays Benjamin Martin, the lionized French and
Indian War veteran, who, at the beginning of the film,
is emotionally suffering after his loving wife passed
away. He is left to father seven children at his South
Carolina estate along with black servants (not
slaves!). As the Revolutionary War rumbles miles away,
Martin swears to keep his family close and away from
the battlefields. But when the oldest son enlists
anyway and another is murdered by a wicked Redcoat
colonel (Jason Isaacs), Martin quickly decides to save
the day (or save the fate of America as presented by
Emmerich). Forming a band of aggressive farmers and
using guerilla tactics considered unfair in the art of
war, Martin becomes the number one target of the
British Army. 
The best parts of The Patriot are the scenes in which
Martin and his rugged militia men outsmart the British
armies left and right. Every time the farmers attacked
the unsuspecting enemy, to see the disbelief on
British General Cornwallis' (Tom Wilkinson) face was
priceless entertainment. And as the tension gradually
formulates with the running time, a final battle is
inevitable. 
As for the numerous battle scenes, they are expertly
done. Clearer and more realistic than those of
Gladiator, the gruesome images are what give this film
an R rating. You really get a sense of how warfare was
performed during that time period. Everything is
performed in an orderly (but still quite gory) fashion
- one side shoots, then the other side, then the
remaining soldiers charge. It's organized, strategic
and, according to Martin, ineffective. There is a very
interesting contrast between the traditional battle
style and Martin's take-no-prisoners method. 
What drives Martin to these supposedly unfair actions,
are the originally brutal tactics of Colonel
Tavington. Played wonderfully by Jason Isaacs,
Tavington is the type who loves to glare down from his
horse at civilians, who nervously avoid eye contact.
This character is viciously evil; he kills women and
children and then laughs about it on the way home;
even his eyes are evil. His portrayal has sparked some
controversy in Britain, some claim that he falsely
represents his countrymen as "cowardly" and
"sadistic." I disagree with this accusation. Tavington
does not represent his country; his unnecessary
executions shock his own colleagues and even anger his
General. Besides Tavington, the Redcoats remain stick
figures that are neither glorified nor patronized. And
stick figures make the easiest enemies in these kinds
of movies - why give the audience a reason to love the
bad guys? Heck, why not spend the entire film glossing
up the good guys?
The Patriot is three hours of fictional fireworks.
With an action hero seeking revenge and a comic book
villain ready to take him down, it's a Lethal Weapon
for the colonial times. God Bless America! And God
Bless The Patriot!

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Starring Steve Martin, Eddie Murphy, Heather Graham, Christine Baranski, Jamie
Kennedy, Robert Downey Jr., and Terrence Stamp. 
The last Steve Martin film I saw, The Spanish Prisoner, was a very different
approach for the comic actor. As a millionaire leading a massive conspiracy in
order to rob "a process" from a clueless businessman, Martin's character did it
all for money. In his most recent movie, Bowfinger, Martin plays yet another
con man except this time he does it to succeed in the film industry. He wants
to direct a successful picture that will force people to remember his name,
that will make him more popular at the parties, and, most importantly, that
will cause Fed Ex to deliver important business packages to his front door.
Playing the title role, Martin is once again the good guy; the one we cheer for
to complete his low budget action movie. This con man is very likeable for some
reason, even though he is doing the same exact thing as the malicious Jimmy Del
from The Spanish Prisoner. Maybe the message is that, in Hollywood, to win over
the trust and friendship of others, you have to be a little evil. 
Bowfinger is a very clever comedy with great performances from its two stars.
Martin, who also wrote the screenplay, is perfect as a jerk with a conscience
and Eddie Murphy does his best "Peter Sellers" in two different, but equally
hilarious, roles; one as a big time move star and the other as his nerdy,
Burger King employee brother. The story follows aging and failing
director/producer Bobby Bowfinger as he makes one last attempt to become a
respected member of his field by creating a B-action movie called Chubby Rain.
In order to attract actors and crew members, Bowfinger promises them that hot
shot actor Kit Ramsey will star in the movie. The only problem is that Kit
refuses to be in it. But this won't stop the aggressive Bowfinger. He is so
determined to complete his film that he decides to put Kit in it without even
telling him. He has his actors approach Kit on the streets of Los Angeles in
character with a hidden camera filming the footage. Will Bowfinger be able to
make his film? Or will Kit Ramsey discover what exactly is going on?
Bowfinger is a very cartoon-like movie that pokes fun at Hollywood and its
famous residents while simultaneously holding a very solid story line. The only
area where the film really lacks is the cameo department. This is the kind of
movie that cameos are all about, it is always funny to see
actors/directors/producers making fun of themselves or co-workers especially in
a playful movie such as this. Besides the very repetitive and superflous
ending, Bowfinger is a joy to watch.  If you take a movie like this seriously
then you will never enjoy it. If you accept the incredulous plot and the
extreme caricatures of real entertainment figures, the movie is great fun. 
